 Brunswick, Bishop ran a logging and sawmill business in Queens County prior to his election to the legislature. 
He served in the Executive Council of New Brunswick as Minister of Natural Resources, Minister of Transportation and President of the Executive Council in the government of Richard Hatfield. Following the 1987 provincial election, in which the opposition Liberals won every seat in the legislature and left the Conservatives seatless, Bishop was a candidate for the interim leadership of the party, but lost to Malcolm MacLeod. 
Melognathus is a genus of tarantulas (family Theraphosidae) with the sole species Melognathus dromeus, native to the  Philippines. 
Cary Harris (born March 22, 1987) is an American football safety who was most recently a member of the Edmonton Eskimos. He was drafted by the Buffalo Bills in the sixth round of the 2009 NFL Draft. He played college football at Southern California as a cornerback. He currently is the head football coach at Calabasas High School (Calabasas, CA). 
Harris prepped at Notre Dame High School in Sherman Oaks, California where he played running back and cornerback and ran a 10.75 100 meter dash in track. 
Harris was a three-year starter between 2006 and 2008.  He played reserve in 2005.  He was a two-time All-Pac-10 honorable mention player in 2007 and 2008 and was considered a top cornerback for the 2009 NFL Draft. 
Harris was drafted by the Buffalo Bills in the sixth round (183rd overall) of the 2009 NFL Draft. He was waived during final cuts on September 5, 2009, but was re-signed to the team's practice squad on September 6. He was promoted to the active roster on November 20, and recorded two interceptions in the final game of the 2009 season against the Indianapolis Colts. He was re-signed on March 29, 2010. 
He was released by the Bills on October 22, 2010, and worked out for the Philadelphia Eagles shortly afterward, but was not offered a contract. 
On November 24, 2010, Harris was signed to the Minnesota Vikings' practice squad, but was released on December 1. 
Harris signed a reserve/future contract with the New York Giants on January 13, 2011. He was waived/injured on August 16 and later reverted to injured reserve. He was released with an injury settlement on August 28. 
This list is for lists of places of worship in Wealden in the United Kingdom. There are more than 170 current and former places of worship in Wealden, the largest of six local government districts in the English county of East Sussex. Several former places of worship have been demolished. 
Nicole de Weever (born 1979) is a dancer and choreographer from Sint Maarten. After completing her primary schooling in the Caribbean, she moved to the United States, completing education. She has performed in film, on television and appeared on Broadway in  the musical Fela! during its initial run in 2009 and reprise in 2012, after a world tour. She was honored as a cultural ambassador by the government of Sint Maarten in 2009. 
In addition to her work in dance, de Weever founded a non-profit organization, Art Saves Lives, on Sint Maarten in 2012. The NGO uses art therapy to assist troubled youth and helps them learn creative means of expression. It also organizes workshops for students to learn from noted Caribbean artists and provides cultural exchange programs where students can visit other islands in the Caribbean or in the United States to develop their skills. 
Doctor Armenian is a Professor in Residence at the University of California in Los Angeles, President Emeritus of the American University of Armenia, and Professor Emeritus at Johns Hopkins University. 
Haroutune Armenian started painting in Beirut in 1976 during the civil war in Lebanon. His works have been exhibited in Beirut, Los Angeles and Yerevan. 
The screenplay of the film was written by director Lucrecia Martel. Martel said, "The film isn't strictly autobiographical, but what I put in it is my personal experience in life, my memories. When I was in my teens, I was a very religious person. I thought I had a special relationship with God, or anything that was up there. Now, I don't believe in miracles, but I do believe in the emotion you feel in front of a miracle - the emotion of something unexpected revealed to you." 
As part of the way she uses the camera the film has few establishing shots or transition shots because she makes the case it physically separates a space from its moment in the film. 
Filming location The film was shot entirely in Salta, in the Salta Province, Argentina.  The director/screenwriter was born in Salta. 
The film first opened in Argentina on 6 May 2004.  It was selected for competition and featured internationally at the 2004 Cannes Film Festival on 16 May. 
The film was also shown at various film festivals, including: the Karlovy Vary Film Festival, the Toronto International Film Festival, the Helsinki International Film Festival, the London Film Festival, the Hong Kong International Film Festival, and the Reykjavik International Film Festival. 
In the United States it was presented at the New York Film Festival on 10 October 2004, and the Seattle International Film Festival on 20 May 2005. Fine Line Features gave it a limited US theatrical release on 29 April 2005. 
Kevin Thomas, critic for the Los Angeles Times, wrote, "[the film] reveals the style, insight and confidence that are the marks of a major director."  He also said of director Martel, "[She's] a subtle artist and a sharp observer, Martel manages a large cast with an ease that matches her skill at storytelling, within which psychological insight and social comment flow easily and implicitly." 
Film critic Ruth Stein also credits director Martel for capturing the mood of the film, and wrote, "Martel is especially good at capturing a claustrophobic environment, and she wisely leaves ambiguous the question of the doctor's complicity in Amalia's frenzied state. He fails to recognize her when she starts stalking him -- an indication of the randomness of the act done to the accompaniment of a theremin." 
The film currently holds a 77% approval rating at Rotten Tomatoes, with 43 of 56 reviews being favorable. 
The Group Bravery Citation is a bravery decoration awarded to Australians. It is awarded for a collective act of bravery by a group of people in extraordinary circumstances that is considered worthy of recognition. The Group Bravery Citation was created in 1990. The decorations recognise acts of bravery by members of the community who selflessly put themselves in jeopardy to protect the lives or property of others. 
The Australian Government "It's an Honour" database contains 695 entries of people who have been awarded the medal. 
Bundibugyo General Hospital, also Bundibugyo District Hospital or Bundibugyo Hospital, is a hospital in the Western Region of Uganda. 
Hu Liu (a/k/a Tiger Liu; born July 6, 1961, in Xining, Qinghai, China) is a retired FIFA referee and the current Canadian Soccer Association's Director of Referees. 
This biographical article relating to Canadian soccer is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Heart, Mind and Soul is the fourth album by American recording artist El DeBarge. It was released in 1994 on  Reprise Records, and was produced by El DeBarge, Babyface, and Jermaine Dupri. 
The album contains the hit singles "Can't Get Enough," which peaked at #21 on the Billboard Hot R&B Singles chart, and "Where Is My Love," which peaked at #19. 
The Washington Post wrote that "the unwavering intensity of DeBarge's voice, even in the highest octaves, gives his claims of tender devotion a rare credibility." Vibe praised DeBarge's collaborations with Babyface, writing that "while Heart, Mind and Soul might not find a star fully reborn, most of its better tracks point to the inception of a promising partnership." 
Peter Seitz (born 1931) is a graphic designer, author, teacher and business owner who served as the first design director at The Walker Art Center (Minneapolis, MN), and helped establish the graphic design program at the Minneapolis College of Art and Design. 
After Yale, Seitz was hired by the architectural firm, I.M. Pei & Associates. In 1964, Walker Art Center director Martin Friedman appoints Seitz design curator and editor of the Design Quarterly, a national publication of applied arts, architecture, and design. 
In 1971, Seitz began teaching graphic design classes part-time at the Minneapolis College of Art and Design. He served as Chair of the Design Department from 1977 to 1978, and as Acting Chair of Design from 1998 to 1999. Seitz assembled one of the first computer graphics laboratories at MCAD in 1981. Seitz retired and became MCAD professor emeritus in 2002. His life and work is chronicled in "Peter Seitz: Designing A Life". 
This article related to a British film of the 1900s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The project of Tucuruvi station arose in 1978, during the first update of HMD plan (originally contracted by Metro in 1968), after receiving the data from the 1977 "Origin-Destination" research. Besides the definition of the expansion directives to Tucuruvi, the construction was contracted only in 1986, not before being target by two controversies. 
Pleurotomella expeditionis is a species of sea snail, a marine gastropod mollusk in the family Raphitomidae. 
Johnny is a Canadian drama film, directed by Carl Bessai and released in 1999. Inspired by the Dogme 95 movement, the film stars Chris Martin as Johnny, a young man who is making a film about squeegee kids around Toronto, but begins to manipulate them into performing increasingly dangerous stunts. 
The cast also includes Gema Zamprogna, Kris Lemche, Vanessa Shaver, Clinton Walker, Rainbow Sun Francks, Kyra Harper, Hrothgar Mathews, Sabrina Grdevich and Hugh Dillon. 
The film was inspired by Bessai's prior work on a documentary about street kids, during which he found that many of them had difficulty expressing themselves until he gave them video cameras and asked them to film something that represented their own first-person views of their lives. 
The film premiered in the Perspective Canada program at the 1999 Toronto International Film Festival, where Martin was one of three actors, alongside Liane Balaban for New Waterford Girl and Karine Vanasse for Set Me Free (Emporte-moi), given special jury citations by the Canadian film jury for their performances. 
This article related to a Canadian film of the 1990s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Indian Aces were a tennis team based in New Delhi, India that competed in the International Premier Tennis League (IPTL). It is one of the four charter franchises which had participated in the IPTL's inaugural 2014 season and are champions of the first edition. 
The Mumbai franchise (as the Aces were still known at the time) participated in the IPTL inaugural draft on 2 March 2014, in Dubai, United Arab Emirates. 
On 25 July 2014, the Aces announced that their home matches would be played at Indira Gandhi Indoor Stadium in New Delhi, Delhi. 
On 16 October 2014, IPTL announced it had reached an agreement for the Indian television broadcasting rights with STAR Sports. 
The Born Free Tour is the second headlining concert tour by English stage actress and singer Kerry Ellis with Brian May. The original 2012 tour comprised 11 dates in and around the home counties of England, beginning on 5 November 2012 at the Apex in Bury St Edmunds, and finishing at the Swan Theatre in High Wycombe. 
A second leg will tour further venues in England, and also visit Ireland and Wales. It will begin on 17 June 2013 at St John Evangelist Church, Oxford, and finish at the Dublin Olympia on 30 June 2013. A third leg will see Ellis and May taking The Born Free Tour to mainland Europe, for one date in France, one in Austria and four in Italy in July 2013. 
Unlike the previously extravagant Anthems: The Tour (2011), this tour is presented as a series of intimate and acoustic shows performed under candlelight where the pair perform to raise awareness of their work for the Born Free Foundation. Receiving positive reviews, the tour was complimented by critics for the pairing of May's sound and Ellis' vocals. 
Ellis and May released a live album from the first leg of The Born Free Tour, Acoustic by Candlelight, available digitally, on CD, and on vinyl. The album was released on 17 June 2013 to coincide with the second leg of the tour. 
Karakoumi (Greek: Karakoumi; Turkish: Karakum) is a village in Cyprus, located about 2 kilometers from Kyrenia. De facto, it is under the control of Northern Cyprus. 
Norton Junction was a railway junction and goods yard that served multiple coal lines and mineral lines to and from the local collieries and other industrial-related businesses, most notably Pelsall Steelworks and Walsall Wood Colliery. 
Traffic into the junction began to decline in the 1950s following closure of many local mines and collieries. The lines to Ryders Hayes, Brownhills and Hednesford closed in 1964 along with the entire junction.  
The entire site has been built on by housing and roads but some of the trackbed can still be followed as far as Pelsall and Brownhills. 
Hope Morgan Ward (born September 18, 1951) is a bishop of the United Methodist Church, elected and consecrated to the episcopacy in 2004. She has served as the Bishop of North Carolina since 2012. 
Hope Morgan Ward was raised on the Morgan family farm in Corapeake, North Carolina. She graduated from Duke University in 1973 with an A.B. degree in English and Religion. She entered seminary at Duke Divinity School and completed the M.Div. degree in 1978. 
Bishop Ward married career educator Michael E. Ward in 1977. Mike served as the North Carolina Superintendent of Public Instruction  from 1997 - 2004.  The Wards have two children, Jason and Brooke. 
Perezi Karukubiro Kamunanwire is a Ugandan academic and diplomat. He was Ambassador of Uganda to the United States from 2006 to 2013. He was appointed to that post on 15 May 2006 and served until June 2013. 
The Prizefighter and the Lady is a 1933 pre-Code Metro-Goldwyn-Mayer romance film starring Myrna Loy and the professional boxers Max Baer, Primo Carnera, and Jack Dempsey. The film was adapted for the screen by John Lee Mahin and John Meehan from a story by Frances Marion. Marion was nominated for an Academy Award for Best Writing, Original Story. 
While working as a barroom bouncer, sailor Steve Morgan impresses alcoholic ex-boxing manager "the Professor" with his skills. The Professor talks Steve into entering a prize fight with an up-and-coming boxer to make money for both of them. 
Steve quickly rises through the boxing ranks. However, he cannot keep from fooling around with other women. When Belle catches him in a lie, she tells him that she loves him, but if he cheats on her once more, she will leave him. While waiting for a bout for the heavyweight championship of the world, Steve performs in a musical revue. When Belle unexpectedly goes to his dressing room, she finds a woman hiding there. It is the end of their marriage. She gets her old job back with Willie. 
Anxious to see the overconfident Steve humiliated, Willie finds out what is holding up the match with the current champion, Primo Carnera (playing himself), and pays $25,000 to set it up. When the Professor tries to get Steve to train properly (without women and liquor), Steve gets angry and slaps him, ending their partnership. 
Later, Willie enters Belle's nightclub dressing room and tells her she is fired. Then he brings Steve in and leaves the couple alone to reconcile. 
This movie was the film debut for Baer and Carnera. Dempsey, on the other hand, had already appeared in a number of films, dating back to 1920s Daredevil Jack. 
Howard Hawks was the initial director, but left the set when he found he would be working with non-actor Baer, not Clark Gable. MGM replaced Hawks with W. S. Van Dyke. 
The film grossed a total (domestic and foreign) of $933,000: $432,000 from the US and Canada and $501,000 elsewhere resulting in a loss of $105,000. 
Carnera was the world heavyweight boxing champion at the time of the film's release. Baer defeated Carnera in their real-life June 14, 1934, fight, knocking him down a record 11 times. He was supposedly able to do this after watching Carnera's fighting style during the movie's filming.[citation needed] 
Roxane Batoul Farmanfarmaian (born February 1955) is a British lecturer in international politics at the University of Cambridge. 
She obtained her BSc from Princeton University, and her MPhil and DPhil from the University of Cambridge. 
This biography article of a United Kingdom academic is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Idaea fuscovenosa, the dwarf cream wave, is a moth of the family Geometridae. It is found in the Palearctic, 
Idaea fuscovenosa prefer warm and dry habitats. In the North of the range the species is usually limited to sun-exposed hedge rows, dry forests and forest edges, grassy areas, gardens and uncultivated land. 
The USA South Athletic Conference (formerly the Dixie Intercollegiate Athletic Conference or the Dixie Conference) is an athletic conference which competes in the NCAA's Division III.  Member schools are located in North Carolina, Virginia, Georgia, Tennessee, Alabama, and Kentucky. 
Shenandoah University left the USA South on the above date, to become a full member of the Old Dominion Athletic Conference (ODAC), a league in which it held associate membership in several sports. 
Christopher Newport University left the USA South after the 2012-2013 season to join the Capital Athletic Conference in all sports except for football which will remain a USA South affiliate member through the 2015 season. 
On May 10, 2012, Covenant College and Huntingdon College announced plans to leave the Great South and join USA South Athletic Conference beginning in the 2013-2014 season. 
The most recent change to the USA South membership was revealed on March 8, 2021 when Averett University announced its intention to leave the USA South and join Ferrum College in the ODAC as a full member in 2022. 
In 2021, in a report by U.S. News & World Report, Middleton High School was named as the best high school in Dane County and it was also named 11th best high school out of around 540 in the state of Wisconsin. 
Middleton High School has four school orchestras, the Cardinal Orchestra for freshmen, the Sinfonia Orchestra for sophomores and juniors, the MHS Philomusica Orchestra playing music from many different musical genres from outside the world of regular orchestra music, and the Symphony Orchestra with winds, brass, and percussionists selected from the Wind Ensemble for the full orchestra experience. 
Middleton High School has three school bands, the cardinal band for freshman, the concert band for sophomores and juniors, and the wind ensemble for seniors and juniors by audition. The MHS marching band was invited to perform in London in the 2011 and 2015 New Year's Day Parade. 
Science bowl is an academic competition ran through the Department of Energy (DOE). This club was founded by David Jiang. 
 Middleton high school has qualified for the national competition in the year of 2021 after winning their state competition. The team that year consisted of David Jiang, Hansen Jin, Jonah Guse, Sanjay Suresh, and Trevor Chau. The team that year was coached by Erik Johnson, a science teacher at Middleton High School, and Bruce Koeller, a retired middle-school science teacher and plant pathologist.
"Heads Will Roll" is a song by American indie rock band Yeah Yeah Yeahs, released as the second single from their third studio album, It's Blitz! (2009). The CD and 7-inch singles were released in the United Kingdom on June 29, 2009. The song is sung from the viewpoint of the Queen of Hearts in Lewis Carroll's Alice's Adventures in Wonderland. 
The song was remixed by Canadian DJ A-Trak for the film Project X. The remix has over 159 million views on YouTube. 
Rantic.com (formerly SocialVEVO and Swenzy) is a social media marketing website that sells fake likes, followers, views and web traffic. 
In 2014, an online threat to release nude photos of actor Emma Watson turned out to be a hoax orchestrated by Rantic. Following Watson's launch of a UN gender equality campaign, a website emerged claiming photos of the actor would be released via 4chan. When the countdown ended the site redirected users to Rantic.com where a message claimed the group aimed to shut down 4chan. 
In April 2015, a Facebook engineer said the site's effort to crack down on the "small problem", coupled with an effort to help pages gain authentic followers instead, had shut down most of the fake "like" sellers. Rantic called itself one of fewer than a dozen such companies remaining, and has promised to refill any "likes" or followers lost to account sweeps by the operators of sites including Facebook and Instagram. 
Glenelly St Joseph's (Irish: Gleann Eallaigh Naoimh Seosaimh)  is a Gaelic Athletic Association club. The club is based in Plumbridge, County Tyrone, Northern Ireland and serves the parish of Badoney Upper, which includes the villages of Plumbridge and Cranagh. The club concentrates on Gaelic football, with ladies Gaelic football also provided for.  
The men's senior team in 2017 will compete in Division 3 of the Tyrone All-County Football League and will play in the Tyrone Junior Football Championship. 
The ladies senior team in 2015 will compete in Division 2 of the Tyrone Ladies All-County Football League and will play in the Tyrone Senior Ladies Football Championship. 
Bryan Hurlburt (born June 9, 1979) is an American politician who has served as the Connecticut Commissioner of Agriculture since 2019. He previously served in the Connecticut House of Representatives from the 53rd district from 2007 to 2013. 
Via Margutta is a narrow street in the centre of Rome, near Piazza del Popolo, accessible from Via del Babuino in the ancient Campo Marzio neighborhood also known as "the foreigner's quarter".  Mount Pincio is nearby.  Via Margutta originally was home to modest craftsmen, workshops and stables, but now hosts many art galleries and fashionable restaurants. 
From Piazza di Spagna, one can take via del Babuino, turn right on via Albert, and via Margutta will be on the left. 
The name probably originates from the word "Marisgutta", meaning "Sea Drop", a gentle euphemism for a dirty stream that came down from the hill of the villa of the Pincii, used like a natural Roman Cloaca. Via Margutta was behind the palaces of Via del Babuino (Baboon road), where warehouses and stables were found.[citation needed] 
Via Margutta today is a charming, quiet lane.  Although it is fully in the city centre, it still maintains its garden atmosphere, perfumed by trees and vineyards, which has made it a perfect choice for artists, painters, sculptors, and antiquarians, even though many of former artists' studios have been converted into flats and apartments. 
Among the historical inhabitants of the street were Giulietta Masina, Federico Fellini, Renato Guttuso, Marina Punturieri, and Amerigo Tot. 
Babb was educated at Stellenbosch University and at Oxford having been awarded the Joerg Gosteli bursary. While at Oxford, he rowed with the Lincoln College VIII and was part of the first crew to attempt to beat the Guards' record of fifteen and half hours for rowing from Oxford to London. Thereafter he joined South Africa's Department of Foreign Affairs. He also earned a law degree from the University of South Africa with a distinction in Constitutional Law. 
Babb worked as a schoolteacher in 1964 before continuing his education at Oxford University (Lincoln College). In 1967, he joined the Department of Foreign Affairs where he produced the book "Prison Administration in South Africa" while in the legal division of the Department. In 1969 he had his first overseas posting when he was assigned to the South African embassy in Paris where he served as secretary for three years. 
During this time he was made Chairman of the Young Diplomats Association of Paris. He returned to Pretoria in 1972 and was Training Officer with the Department. He authored the book "Training for the Diplomatic Service". 
In 1975, he returned to Paris where he was the embassy's counsellor and then in 1978, he moved to the South African embassy in Rome. Here he was asked to play cricket for the first Italian international team against the Indian Globetrotters and played in two matches. In 1981, he again returned to South Africa to become head of the Africa Desk at the Department of Foreign Affairs and held that position for four years. 
Babb's mission as Ambassador to Canada began in 1985 while South Africa was in crisis and international pressure on Pretoria was mounting. Canadian Prime Minister Brian Mulroney threatened to break off diplomatic relations with the country when he spoke at the United Nations. 
In 1987 he addressed the Royal Military College, Kingston, Ontario on the "Strategic Value of South Africa". 
In 1987, Babb was recalled to South Africa to take over as head of the Africa division and deputy director-general of the Department of Foreign Affairs. As such, he initiated, after a meeting with President Sassou Nguesso of the Republic of the Congo, the Brazzaville talks for the withdrawal of South African troops from Angola and ending the country's involvement in the South African Border War. 
Babb subsequently left parliament after two years, in 1991, and returned to the Department of Foreign Affairs, serving as South Africa's ambassador to Italy During that time, South Africa established diplomatic relations with Albania, Malta and San Marino, to which he was accredited as ambassador. He was appointed the first South African Permanent Representative to UN Food and Agriculture Organisation since 1963. 
He also served as Commissioner of the Commonwealth War Graves Commission in Italy. In 1995, Babb left government service. Later that year he became chairman of AGIP Lubricants. From 1995 to 2002 he was a trustee of the Arthur Childe Army Award Trust. 
In 1997 he was appointed Director of the Cape Philharmonic Orchestra. A year later, he was appointed consultant to the government of the Western Cape and he continued in that role till 2002. In the same year, he was appointed Honorary Consul General of the Republic of Turkey with jurisdiction for the Western, Northern and Eastern Cape Provinces. 
In 2005, his firm Babrius was appointed by the Secretariat of the African, Caribbean and Pacific Group of Countries [ACP] aligned to the EU to write a report, "Study on the Future of the African, Caribbean and Pacific Group of Countries" which was published in French and English by the ACP in Brussels on 13 February 2006 
In 2010 he authored the monograph "Abubakr Effendi - A young Turk in Afrikaans" relating to the work of the Islamic scholar sent in the 19th Century by the caliph to instruct the Muslims of the Cape. He has also been active with various business pursuits such as long-lasting milk [PARMALAT], oil lubricants, manufacturing, a tourism service, manufacturing wine vats and owning an office support and internet service. 
In January 2009 Babb was shortlisted for the position of Chief Executive Officer of NEPAD in the African Union. 
In December 2012 he published an article in the African Yearbook of Rhetoric on rhetorical action in diplomacy with specific reference to the relative fortunes of Indians in Canada and indigenous peoples in South Africa. This led to an interview on CBC Radio. 
In July 2014 Babb was appointed chairman of the Ethics Committee of Southern Wind Shipyard and non-executive director of the company. 
In September 2015 Babb organised the international Sol d'Oro Southern Hemisphere Olive Oil competition in Cape Town which ended with a gala prize-award evening at the residence of the first Italian ambassador to South Africa, Casa Labia.  It was attended by the Premier of the Western Cape, Helen Zille, and the Minister of Agriculture, Alan Winde. 
He was elected Chairman of the Muizenberg Historical Conservation Society in December 2016. In October 2018 he was elected Trustee of the Fish Hoek Valley Museum. 
Babb has published short stories and poetry, articles on legal subjects, and numerous other reports and articles, including: 
Until 18 July 2020, Stavnytsia belonged to Letychiv Raion. The raion was abolished in July 2020 as part of the administrative reform of Ukraine, which reduced the number of raions of Khmelnytskyi Oblast to three. The area of Letychiv Raion was merged into Khmelnytskyi Raion. 
The ruins of the Nevitske castle  - "Castle Rakoczy" are preserved in the village. This is the only monument the 16th century of fortification that has been preserved in Ukraine. The first mention of the castle appeared in the 1274th year. In 1644, the castle was destroyed by the Hungarian Monarch Ferenc Rakoczy. 
On the outskirts of the village were found Scythian settlements and settlement Cherniakhivska culture. 
Smashed Gladys were an eighties glam metal band, formed in 1984, with Sally Cato on vocals, Bart Lewis on lead guitar, J.D. Malo on bass, and Matt Stelluto on drums. The band also had a succession of secondary guitar players (who, according to available credits, played some leads as well as rhythm): Tommy Wah in 1986, then Roger Lane from 1987 until the band's career ended. Cato and Lewis met in Canada, then moved to New York City, where they completed the line-up and built their career. 
Ozzy Osbourne provided backing vocals for their song "Cast of Nasties". Lewis, Malo and Stelutto  made cameo appearances in the music video for the Run-D.M.C. cover of "Walk This Way". 
Smashed Gladys's self-titled YouTube channel was curated by Sally Cato, the band's primary songwriter. 
Charles Wilkes called the river the "Upthascap River", but after the discovery of coal along its banks in 1876 the river was renamed "Carbon". 
The source of the Carbon River is the Carbon Glacier on the north side of Mount Rainier in the Cascade Range. The river's upper reach is contained within Mount Rainier National Park. Some of the river's headwater tributary streams include Cataract Creek and Spukwush Creek. The Carbon River quickly enters a broad glacial valley in which it deposits thick layers of glacial sediment. This causes the river to meander and become braided. 
Having run generally northwest, the Carbon River turns more directly west until it is joined by Evans Creek just before the small settlement of Fairfax. From Fairfax to Carbonado the Carbon River flows north through a narrow gorge, with Gleason Hill to the east and Wingate Hill to the west. 
After passing Carbonado and receiving the tributary Lily Creek, the river valley broadens again and the Carbon River resumes its generally braided and meandering pattern. It turns west, flowing through an increasingly broad floodplain to the town of Crocker, where the river is joined by one of its main tributaries, South Prairie Creek. Just below Crocker another major tributary, Voight Creek, joins. 
Below Crocker the Carbon River flows northwest to join the Puyallup River. The city of Orting is located at the confluence, in the floodplain between the Carbon and Puyallup rivers. 
Flooding occurs frequently in the upper Carbon River valley. In 2006, a major flood resulted in the river forming new stream channels and in the process washing-out a portion of the Carbon River Road. The road is the main entrance to the northwestern part of Mount Rainier National Park. Part of the road essentially became a new channel of the river. Other parts of the road were washed away. 
As with other rivers flowing from Mount Rainier's glaciers, the Carbon River valley is at risk of lahars. 
The following represents the major supporting cast associated with the show.(Source: The Complete Directory to Prime Time Network and Cable TV Shows, 1946-Present (Ninth edition)) 
In 1941, the Nelsons joined the cast of The Red Skelton Show, also providing much of the show's music. The couple stayed with the series for three years. They also built their radio experience by guest appearances, together and individually, on many top radio shows, from comedies such as The Fred Allen Show, to the mystery titan Suspense, in a 1947 episode called "Too Little to Live On". 
Before the television series aired, Ozzie Nelson persuaded ABC to agree to a 10-year contract that paid the Nelsons whether the series was canceled or not. The unprecedented contract and Ozzie's insistence on perfection in the series' production paid off in the series' remarkable longevity. 
In the decades since the series' cancellation, it has been continuously shown on stations in public domain prints. Between 1985 and 1994, The Disney Channel aired the series as remastered from original 35mm film elements, with new introductions by Harriet Nelson. 
PBS member station KVCR-TV in San Bernardino, California (in the Los Angeles market) aired the series as late as May 2010, connected to the station's nostalgic television series, I Remember Television.                  In addition, the majority of the series can be found on YouTube, most with original commercials. 
Collector/historian Martin Grams Jr. presently owns the production materials, scripts, casting call sheets, contracts, telegrams, letters and other materials significant to the radio and television series. 
Author Jim Cox addressed the radio program's cultural significance in an article that appeared in SPERDVAC's Radiogram in early 2008. 
Ozzie's Girls premiered on local stations, including New York's WABC-TV, in September 1973. It ended in September 1974 after one season. (Though never a major hit, Ozzie's health was beginning to fail at the same time, and he would die in June 1975, less than a year after Ozzie's Girls ended.) 
Ozzie Nelson continued to work in show business after the failure of the short-lived sitcom Ozzie's Girls. He took on the role of producer and director for some of TV's popular series, most notably Adam-12, The D.A., and Bridget Loves Bernie. In 1975, Ozzie Nelson died of liver cancer at the age of 69. 
Following Ozzie's death in 1975, Harriet grew reclusive. In 1989, she made her last onscreen appearance in her granddaughter Tracy Nelson's TV series, Father Dowling Mysteries. Harriet never fully recovered from Rick's death and died of congestive heart failure and emphysema in 1994 at the age of 85. 
Ozzie, Harriet, and Rick are interred together at Forest Lawn, Hollywood Hills Cemetery, in Los Angeles, California. 
David Nelson continued to produce feature films and television commercials and owned his commercial production company. David died from colon cancer on January 11, 2011. 
The series attracted large audiences and became synonymous with the 1950s ideal American family life. Although it was never a top-ten hit, Nelson's long-term contract with ABC and the lower expectations that came with being on the lowest-rated of the Big Three television networks at the time ensured that the show accrued enough episodes to remain the longest-running live-action sitcom in United States television history by number of episodes aired to the present day. 
Reptilian humanoids are fictional organisms of varied species in folklore, science fiction, fantasy, and conspiracy theories. 
Victor Kremer (born June 1870 in Germany) was a music publisher, film producer and distributor, as well as a real estate developer in the U.S. An immigrant from Germany, Kremer established a music publishing company. He later acquired studio space to produce his own films and acquired film rights from Essanay as it shut operations. His company reissued several Charlie Chaplin films. 
Kremer was production manager for W. H. Clifford's short-lived film company. After it failed, he distributed the company's Shorty Hamilton western films from his namesake film company. 
Texas Guinan made two films with his production company. He also made a film with opera sensation Lina Cavalieri. 
Two directors attempted to bring suit for improper allocations of money after being removed from the company. 
His music publishing company produced several songs by Theron Catlen Bennett. He reported success selling the he song "Tattle Tales" he composed by Bert Peters with words by Harold Atteridge. 
The British Families Education Service (BFES) was an organisation set up by the British Government in 1946 to run schools for the children of British military and government personnel serving in West Germany. 
Over the years, the BFES and its later incarnations opened schools at British Armed Forces bases around the world, such as in Hong Kong, Singapore, Cyprus, Malta, Gibraltar, Mauritius and Malaya. 
During the early 1970s, BFES became the Service Children's Education Authority (SCEA), an agency overseen by the British Army. In 1989 it came under a new administration and was renamed Service Children's Schools (SCS) before adopting its current name Service Children's Education (SCE). 
Left was born in a Detroit suburb to a Jewish family and later moved with his family to Coral Springs, Florida. He attended Coral Springs High School where he was a member of the debate team and president of the Jewish youth group. He attended Northeastern University in 1993. 
Left became active in short selling by the age of 24. He has cited his experience with Universal Commodity Corp as the reason he started short selling stocks promoted by boiler-room scams. When the boiler rooms eventually went out of business, Left started shorting stocks from bulletin-board scams, in which people would send out email blasts saying, "Buy this stock now or you'll miss out." 
In April 1999, Left became president and CEO of Detour Media. He was named director of the company in November 1999. In 2002, his then employer Detour Media sued Left and prevailed on a $25,000 default judgment against him. 
Left switched to shorting the stocks full-time, using his own research to publish free reports on firms he feels are overvalued or engaged in fraud. In 2001, he founded StockLemon.com, now known as Citron Research. According to Left, he has made profits every year since he started short selling. He was a keynote speaker at the 2017 and 2018 Harvard Business School Investment Conference. 
Left initially started StockLemon.com in 2001 as a self-published blog containing reports on controversial companies. He rebranded the site as Citron Research in 2007. Left researches and short sells companies he believes to be engaged in fraud, have been suspiciously promoted, or have been mistakenly overpriced by the stock market. 
According to a Wall Street Journal analysis of 111 Citron short-sale reports spanning from 2001 to 2014, there was an average share-price decline of 42 percent in the year after Left's report was released. Of those shares, 90 were lower one year later while 21 gained, according to data from S&P Capital IQ. 
GTX Global Corp. sued Left for defamation after a 2005 article he published through Citron about GTX Global. In 2007, the case was dismissed under California's anti-SLAPP statutes which cover writings about publicly traded companies as matters of public interest. 
In October 2015, The Globe and Mail of Toronto, quoted independent research firm 5i Research Inc CEO Peter Hodson, as stating that "What they seem to do quite well is they're able to spin existing facts into a horrible scenario. It reads very badly," and that "Their job as a company is to create the most amount of panic so they and their clients can make the most amount of money." 
In January 2021, Citron Research stated in an interview held by Andrew Left that the company has covered the majority of its short positions after the GameStop short squeeze in the $90s/share at a loss of 100%, now having a small manageable position. The Wall Street Journal reported Left being targeted online, including an incident where Left's social media accounts were hacked to text his children and used "threatening, profane and personal language". 
In 2011, Left released a report through Citron about Longtop Financial, a financial software house based in China, accusing it of defrauding shareholdings, over-reporting revenues, and lacking transparency in the company's acquisition process. The report pointed out Longtop's outsized margins and unexplained stock grants and pointed out Longtop's relationship with China's largest banks. The company was later issued a Wells notice of impending criminal charges from the SEC. 
In 2019, the Hong Kong Court of Appeal dismissed Left's appeal against the decision of the Market Misconduct Tribunal. The Court of Appeal dismissed Left's application for leave to appeal to the Court of Final Appeal. On 8 July 2020, the Court of Final Appeal also dismissed Left's application for leave to appeal. 
Left has two children from his previous marriage. He shared custody of the children with Alan E. Salzman and his ex-wife Andrea. 
In 2018, following the Stoneman Douglas High School shooting, Left created a scholarship for students of the school. The award provides five seniors per year between 2018 and 2021 a $10,000 scholarship. 
Confluentibacter  lentus  is a Gram-negative, aerobic and rod-shaped bacterium from the genus of Confluentibacter which has been isolated from water from Hwajinpo from the Sea of Japan. 
In 1931, he began teach at the Art Students League. His work was part of the painting event in the art competition at the 1932 Summer Olympics. He taught until 1958. He died of a heart ailment in Addison Gilbert Hospital in Gloucester, MA, at the age of seventy-nine on September 26, 1963. 
Scary Movie is an American film series that comprises five parody films mainly focusing on spoofing horror films. The films have collectively grossed almost $900 million worldwide at the box office. The two recurring actresses are Anna Faris and Regina Hall as Cindy Campbell and Brenda Meeks, appearing in all installments except the fifth film.  
Scary Movie is the first film of the franchise. It was the highest-grossing film of the series, with $278,019,771 worldwide. It is a spoof of several films and television shows, with a primary focus on Scream and I Know What You Did Last Summer. 
After a group of teenagers (consisting of Cindy Campbell (Anna Faris), Bobby Prinze (Jon Abrahams), Buffy Gilmore (Shannon Elizabeth), Greg Phillipe (Lochlyn Munro), Ray Wilkins (Shawn Wayans), and Brenda Meeks (Regina Hall)) accidentally hit a man with their car, they decide to dump his body in a lake and never talk about it again. A year later someone wearing a Ghostface mask and robe kills them one by one. 
Scary Movie 2 is the second film of the franchise. It grossed $141,220,678 worldwide with $71,308,997 in the U.S. This is the last installment to receive an R-rating and also marks the end of the Wayans siblings' involvement with the franchise. 
The film starts with a parody of The Exorcist, in which Megan Voorhees (sharing the same last name as the fictional serial killer Jason Voorhees) is possessed by Hugh Kane, and two priests, Father McFeely and Father Harris (James Woods and Andy Richter) have to force Hugh Kane out. But after Megan insults McFeely's mother he shoots her in the head. 
Cindy, Brenda, Ray, and Shorty return in this film. Greg, Buffy, and Bobby are replaced by Buddy (Christopher Masterson), Theo (Kathleen Robertson), and Alex (Tori Spelling). 
The film then merges into a parody of The Haunting with the story beginning when a perverted college professor, Professor Oldman (Tim Curry) and his wheel-chair bound assistant, Dwight (David Cross), plan to study ghosts inside a haunted mansion with the clueless teens as bait. 
At the house, strange things happen: Ray gets attacked by a clown (whom he also rapes), Shorty gets attacked by a living marijuana plant, Cindy gets in a fight with a possessed cat, and Dwight gets into an argument with a foul-mouthed bird. When they find out about the professor's plan they try to escape the house, finding out that there is a ghost who still lives in the house. They must defeat the ghost in order to escape. 
Scary Movie 4 is the fourth film of the franchise. The film opened with $40 million at the weekend box office, making it the third best opening in the series. With a $178,049,620 at the worldwide box office, Scary Movie 4 ranks as the third highest grossing entry. The main target of spoof was War of the Worlds, Saw, The Village and The Grudge. The film concludes the story-arc that began with the first film and is also the last in the series to feature any of the original cast members. 
Scary Movie 5 is the fifth film of the franchise. It is the only film in the series to not feature Anna Faris and Regina Hall. The film was panned by critics and fans alike, and grossed $72,992,798 worldwide in the box office, thus being the least successful film in the franchise. 
Jody (Ashley Tisdale) and Dan Sanders (Simon Rex) move into a new home after adopting three mysterious children. There are video cameras to record the events, and Jody and Dan soon discover that a powerful creature known as "Mama" is haunting them, trying to claim their newly adopted children. 
Scary Movie's main parodies are of Scream and I Know What You Did Last Summer, with elements of The Sixth Sense, The Matrix, and The Usual Suspects. 
Scary Movie 2's primary target is The Haunting, while the rest of the film contains traces of The Exorcist, What Lies Beneath, Poltergeist, Titanic, The Amityville Horror, Hollow Man, and Charlie's Angels. 
Scary Movie 3's general parodies are of The Ring and Signs. It also features elements of The Others, Airplane!, 8 Mile, The Matrix Reloaded, The Texas Chainsaw Massacre, and Minority Report. 
Scary Movie 4's parodies are of the Saw films, The Village, The Grudge, and War of the Worlds, as well as Million Dollar Baby and Brokeback Mountain. 
Scary Movie 5's central areas of satire are the Paranormal Activity films, Mama, Black Swan, and Rise of the Planet of the Apes. Other notable parodies are those of The Cabin in the Woods, Evil Dead, Fifty Shades of Grey, Inception, Sinister, and Madea. 
Gyton Stephen Grantley (born 17 July 1980) is an Australian actor and comedian, best known for his portrayal of convicted murderer and drug trafficker Carl Williams in the hit Australian television show Underbelly, for which he was nominated for both Most Outstanding Actor in a Drama Series and Most Popular Actor for the 2009 TV Week Logie Awards and the 2008 AFI award (winning for Most Outstanding Actor in a Drama Series). Grantley won the 2009 Logie Award for Most Outstanding Actor. 
Grantley was educated at the Anglican Church Grammar School in Brisbane, where he graduated in 1997. During his school years, he was a rugby union player and a rower. He was also heavily involved in drama and theatre-sports, and won the Headmaster's Prize for Drama in his senior year. He later attended the Queensland University of Technology. 
Grantley began his television acting career in 2003, starring in Fat Cow Motel. Over the next two years, he had small guest roles in Marking Time, Small Claims and The Cooks. In the summer of 2005 / 2006, he had a role in the short lived series headLand. In 2006, he had a small role in Foxtel's Supernova series and in 2007, had a 10-episode guest role in Home and Away. 
In 2008, Grantley shot to fame in the high rating drama, Underbelly, where he played antagonist and criminal Carl Williams. With this role he won the 'Most Outstanding Actor' award at the Logies. 
In 2012, Grantley was cast in a new series, House Husbands, playing the character Kane Albert. In 2015, Grantley left the series after its fourth season, however returned in the fifth-season finale for a brief appearance. 
He was announced in late 2013 that he would be reprising his role of Carl Williams in the sequel/spin-off series Fat Tony & Co. which was not placed under the Underbelly franchise (for financing reasons) and focused on the rise and fall of Tony Mokbel, who also featured in the original series, played by Robert Mammone. 
In 2017 Gyton took on his first TV presenting role as Host of TEN's Pooches at Play, a lifestyle show all about dogs and our relationship with them. In 2018 he is performing in the theatrical production Hand to God and continues his hosting role on Pooches at Play. 
He appeared in two short film entries for the 2009 Tropfest Short Film Festival, including Being Carl Williams where Grantley, playing himself, is abducted by two criminals who mistake him for Carl Williams after his role in Underbelly. 
He appeared as Ron Weasley in the Australian production, in Melbourne, of Harry Potter and the Cursed Child. 
Grantley is actively involved with the Australian organisation, Polished Man, which helps support and raise awareness for children affected by violence. 
On 20 March 2012 the exterior of the building was awarded protected building status - added to the "Denkmalliste des Landes Brandenburg". 
"Crawl" is a song by American recording artist Chris Brown. It is the second single from his third studio album Graffiti, released as a digital download on November 24, 2009. The song was produced by The Messengers and was written by Brown. The song is about yearning to rebuild a failed relationship and was interpreted by critics as being about Brown's former relationship with Barbadian singer Rihanna. However, Brown has stated the song is not about any of his previous relationships. 
Brown performed the song on his 2009 Fan Appreciation Tour, and on Black Entertainment Television's SOS Saving Ourselves: Hope for Haiti Telethon, to raise money for the country after the 2010 earthquake that devastated the area. Eric Ditzian of MTV News noted that although the song was rumored to be about Rihanna, "the lyrics also at times seemed to fit the evening's focus, like when Brown sang, "If we crawl till we can walk again/ Then we'll run until we're strong enough to jump." 
After the song's premiere on Brown's MechanicalDummy.com website, "Crawl" made its official debut on the R&B/Hip-Hop Songs chart at number ninety-nine. After its release for digital download on November 23, 2009, it later peaked at fifty-nine. On the week ending December 12, 2009, "Crawl" debuted on the Billboard Hot 100 at sixty-eight and peaked at fifty-three. 
Central Bedfordshire is a unitary authority in Bedfordshire, England. It was created on 1 April 2009 replacing Mid Bedfordshire, South Bedfordshire and Bedfordshire County Council. 
Since the first election to the council in 2009 political control of the council has been held by the following parties: 
When the Norway U18 team met Turkey twice in three days in August 2007, Fellah was badly injured in a challenge with Serdar Aziz in the second game and broke his calf bone. He required surgery, and lost the rest of the 2007 season. The injury would not heal properly, and during the fall of 2008 he had to operate again. Fellah came back fully in the 2009 season playing a total of 23 games in Tippeligaen.[citation needed] 
Utku Asuroglu (born 1986 in Istanbul, Turkey) is a Turkish composer of acoustic and electro-acoustic music. He currently resides in California. He is the recipient of various awards including the 40th Irino Prize for Chamber Music and the Outstanding Artist Award for Music of the Austrian Ministry of Culture. In 2014, Beat Furrer wrote: "The craftsmanship and form of his music unite to create an extraordinarily inspired art". 
A selection of his works can be found on the website of German contemporary music publisher Edition Gravis. 
Holtan-Hartwig and Folstad met in 2010 at Liverpool Institute for Performing Arts (LIPA), and started working together as producers and songwriters for other artists. They have worked on songs for and with artists such as SVAL, Julie Bergan, Ylvis, Norah Benatia and OMVR. They their debut single "Alright Right Now" was released in 2015. They are known for their specific combination of Scandinavian melancholy and club music. 
The duo has performed at the Norwegian industry festival and showcase by:Larm two years in a row. First in 2016 and again as featuring artists in 2017. They have performed at the X-Games Hafjell (2017) and Trondheim Calling along with artists like Julie Bergan, Mugisho and TRXD. Since their debut they have also performed at a number of student bars, festivals and local arenas across Norway. 
A Scottish athletics sprint champion born in Cumnock, Ayrshire, and educated at Ayr Academy, Beveridge was capped three times by the Scotland national football team between 1879 and 1880 while studying at the University of Glasgow and playing for Glasgow University F.C. He scored one international goal - against Wales in March 1880. He later moved to the University of Edinburgh to study divinity. 
In 1883 he became the Reverend Beveridge and was ordained as a Church of Scotland minister. He lived and worked in Port Glasgow until his retirement in 1927. Beveridge was an ardent supporter of the Temperance movement in Scotland and published a pamphlet, 'The athlete and alcohol: a message to young men', now held in New College Library (Special Collections) Edinburgh University. 
This biographical article related to an association football player in Scotland is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article relating to Scottish athletics is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Dharmanagar railway station is the main railway station in North Tripura district, as well as Tripura state also.  It is the oldest railway station in the state. It serves Dharmanagar and nearby cities of the district. The station consists of 3 platforms. The platform is not well sheltered. It lacks many facilities including water and sanitation. 
This article about a railway station in the Indian state of Tripura is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Paget became a Candidate of the College of Physicians on 17 October 1643 and was elected a Fellow on 4 November 1646. Six months later he presented the College with a copy of the works of Francis Bacon, the most important 17th century philosopher of science, signalling a commitment to his empirical method. 
On 3 May 1655 Paget was elected for the first time to the prestigious post of Censor of the College of Physicians, responsible for policing its monopoly of medical practice and accreditation. He replaced the distinguished and recently deceased Christopher Bennet. He was re-elected to the post in 1657 and 1659. 
Paget remained connected with wide networks of savants, both within his professional life and in his wider interests in science, politics and culture. 
Early in 1651, the year after publication of De Rachitide, Paget is known to have corresponded with Samuel Hartlib On 7 December he lent manuscripts on alchemy to Elias Ashmole, who was at that time working on his most important compilation, Theatrum Chemicum Britannicum. 
Paget was a friend of John Milton, whose third wife Elizabeth Minshull was Paget's cousin, once removed. It was Paget who introduced them. Around the same period, in 1662, he also found, as reader for the blind Milton, Thomas Ellwood, who reported his first meeting with the poet: 
Pennington was a notable early Quaker and evidently an associate of Paget: he employed Ellwood as a tutor to his own children, at least once disrupting Milton's progress. The earliest biography of Milton is anonymous: Paget has been suggested as the author. 
Paget's library was celebrated, and contained over 2,000 titles. It contained Milton's own works, both prose and poetry,  a large collection of pamphlet literature from the period, including many publications relating to the Quakers, and a collection of the works of Fausto Sozzini (Socinus), who initiated an important strain of Nontrinitarianism in Protestantism. According to Christopher Hill 
Nathan Paget must have been a man congenial to Milton in many ways. His literary taste seems to have been Spenserian; he was at least strongly interested in anti-Trinitarianism and mortalism; he may have been one of the Socinian Baptists to whom Sewel refers in 1674. His very special interest in Boehme, whom he appears to have read in the original German (he had several German dictionaries) makes it likely that he would have discussed him with the poet.
Thomas Paget died in October 1660. His will, proved on 16 October, divided his property between his two surviving sons, Nathan and Thomas, but mentions also three surviving daughters, Dorothy, Elizabeth and Mary. Paget nominated as supervisor of the will Thomas Minshull, an apothecary of Manchester, who was Nathan's cousin and uncle of Elizabeth Milton. 
Paget's lecture itself seems to have disappeared but, to meet Harvey's terms, it must have been delivered in Latin and included "an exhortation to the Fellows and Members to search and study out the secrets of Nature by way of experiment." 
Paget was named an Elect of the College of Physicians on 8 May 1668. He was also  elected Censor again in 1669 and 1678. 
Paget's famous library was sold off by William Cooper, an auctioneer of books who specialised in the occult sciences. A full catalogue was published in 1681, under the title: Bibliotheca medica, viri clarissimi Nathanis Paget, M.D., cui adjiciuntur quamplurimi alii libri theologici, philosophici, &c.; quorum omnium auctio habebitur Londini, ad insigne Pelicani in vico vulgo dicto Little-Britain 24 die Octobris1681. 
Born in California, Sumney was raised by pastor parents, and moved with his family back to Ghana at the age of 10. He described his childhood as "Americanized" by this age and had difficulty adjusting to the culture of Ghana, especially the rural nature of his new environment. There he grew up on a goat farm in Accra and commuted by public bus to school. His family returned to Southern California when Sumney was 16, settling in Riverside. 
He did not learn to play any instruments until he was older, writing a cappella music for years instead. Sumney did not perform his musical compositions publicly until he was 20. 
After high school, he moved to Los Angeles in 2010 to attend the University of California, Los Angeles. He majored in creative writing and studied poetry, which helped him improve his songwriting. 
He has performed at venues such as the Hollywood Bowl and alongside artists such as Dirty Projectors, Junip, St. Vincent, and Local Natives. Sumney sang on the opening track of Beck's album Song Reader. On September 30, 2016, Sumney released Lamentations, an EP which featured a guest appearance from Thundercat. 
In December 2020, Sumney's single "Me in 20 Years" was featured in a special episode of the HBO drama Euphoria. Sumney contributed a cover of the Metallica song "The Unforgiven" to the charity tribute album The Metallica Blacklist, released in September 2021. 
In 2018, Moses Sumney's self-directed music video "Quarrel" won a SXSW Film Festival Special Jury Award, and was nominated for a Camerimage award and UKMVA. In 2020, his self-directed video for "Cut Me" was nominated for a UKMVA for Best Alternative Video - International. Both of his albums have topped the year-end lists of Pitchfork, NPR, New York Times, Stereogum, and more. 
This is the list of awards and nominations received by Senegalese-American singer, rapper and record producer, Akon. 
The MTV Video Music Awards is an annual awards ceremony established in 1984 by MTV. Akon has the record for most nominations in the Most Earthshattering Collaboration category. 
Edgar Breau is a musician in Ontario, Canada. He was a member of the Hamilton-based band Simply Saucer in the 1970s, and has explored a solo career in recent years. 
In 1974, Simply Saucer recorded a demo tape of music under the supervision of Robert Lanois which combined psychedelic, Krautrock and early punk influences (Syd Barrett, the Velvet Underground and Iggy Pop have been cited as among the band's influences). The band broke up in 1979, and their recording was not released until 1989 as Cyborgs Revisited. 
Cyborgs Revisited was first issued on CD in 1992, by the Chicago-based Fistpuppet label. A remastered edition, with additional material from the 1977-1979 version of Simply Saucer, was issued in 2003 by Hamilton's Sonic Unyon label. 
In 2004, Breau issued a solo album entitled Canadian Primitive.  Recorded over a period of 14 years at Grant Avenue Studios in Hamilton, the album was generally described as folk-psychedelia. On September 16, 2006, the 1978-79 line-up of the Saucer, featuring ex-Teenage Head guitarist, Steve "Sparky" Park, reunited for a six-song cameo appearance at the Corktown Tavern in Hamilton. 
A new edition of Saucer has been created featuring original bassist Kevin Christoff, guitarist Steve Foster, theremin/electronics/guitarist Dan Wintermans, and drummer Joe Csontos.  A new album, Half Human, Half Live, was released in 2008. 
Breau campaigned for the Legislative Assembly of Ontario in the 1999 Ontario provincial election, as a candidate for the right-wing, socially conservative Family Coalition Party. He received 386 votes (1.16%) in Hamilton East, finishing well behind the winner, Dominic Agostino of the Liberal Party. 
Fingar received his B.A. in Government and History from Cornell University (1968), and his M.A.(1969) and Ph.D.(1977) in Political Science from Stanford University. His principal languages are Chinese and German. 
"Dr. Fingar oversaw preparation of the landmark 2007 National Intelligence Estimate (NIE) on Iran, in which all 16 U.S. intelligence agencies concluded with "high confidence" that Iran had halted its nuclear weapon design and weaponization work in 2003. The Estimate's key judgments were declassified and made public, and have been revalidated every year since. 
Fingar's academic career has been primarily at Stanford University, where several research appointments included Senior Research Associate in the Center for International Security and Arms Control (CISAC), and Director of the Stanford U.S.-China Relations Program. 
He served as Assistant Secretary and head of the Bureau of Intelligence and Research (INR) for the United States Department of State from 23 July 2004 until May 2005. He is a career member of the Senior Executive Service. His principal foreign languages are Chinese and German. Dr. Fingar has published dozens of books and articles, mostly on aspects of Chinese politics and policymaking. 
He currently serves on the board of directors of the National Committee on United States-China Relations. 
Fingar's political views are primarily discernible from his published works on China, where he promoted a policy of strategic cooperation. 
The Rag first hit the streets in Austin on October 10, 1966. Thorne Dreyer and Carol Neiman were the original editors of the paper.  (They were called "funnels" in keeping with the paper's democratic structure.)  The Rag was closely associated with SDS and played a major role in bringing together the anarchist-leaning New Lefties and Austin's rich countercultural community, helping to merge them into a major political force.[citation needed] 
Former staffer Alice Embree recalls that "The Rag covered what was not covered by the 'straight' press.  The writers participated in the political and cultural uprising and also wrote about it.  And they told you where to get a chicken dinner for 35 cents." The Rag featured the writing of major New Left figures like Gary Thiher, Jeff Shero, Robert Pardun, and Greg Calvert.  It covered the Austin rock scene which was one of the birthplaces of the psychedelic music phenomenon. 
According to John McMillian, author of the 2011 book Smoking Typewriters, The Rag "was a spirited, quirky, and humorous paper, whose founders pushed the New Left's political agenda even as they embraced the counterculture's zeal for rock music, psychedelics, and personal liberation," and, according to historian Douglas Rossinow, the paper was "enormously important to local activists." 
The Rag featured news coverage and commentary on the War in Vietnam and the movement opposing it, the Civil Rights Movement, the student freedom movement, the development of the New Left and SDS, the psychedelic rock and folk music scenes, and the sixties counterculture movement, of which Austin was a major outpost. It also carried national and world news and opinion from Liberation News Service (LNS) and from other underground newspapers around the country. 
Many of the underground newspapers met with establishment opposition, harassment and even legal action. In Austin, the regents at the University of Texas sued The Rag to prevent circulation on campus. David Richards, attorney for the American Civil Liberties Union, successfully defended The Rag's First Amendment rights before the U.S. Supreme Court.[citation needed] 
The Rag Blog is an Internet news magazine with roots in the Sixties underground press and New Left. A digital rebirth of Austin, Texas' influential underground paper, The Rag, The Rag Blog features commentary on news, politics, and cultural affairs, and many of its contributors are long-time alternative journalists and veterans of Sixties underground journalism. 
Founded in 2006 by Richard D. Jehn, The Rag Blog is edited by Thorne Webb Dreyer and is published by the New Journalism Project, a Texas 501(c)(3) nonprofit corporation. It is affiliated with Rag Radio, a weekly public affairs program produced in the studios of KOOP 91.7-FM, a cooperatively run community radio station in Austin. 
In a June 2012 feature article on Austin's leading political bloggers, CultureMap Austin put Thorne Dreyer and The Rag Blog at the top of its list. 
The Rag Blog features commentary on contemporary politics and culture and has been an original internet source on subjects like Occupy Wall Street, the environmental and sustainability movements, and other issues of social activism, and also provides original reporting from Latin America, Europe, and the Middle East. The Rag Blog has featured the work of over 150 bloggers, many of whom are veterans of the original Rag and the Sixties underground press and New Left. 
The Rag Blog has also been a target of right wing bloggers and conspiracists, including Trevor Loudon, Cliff Kincaid, and WorldNetDaily, who characterize The Rag Blog as "radical leftists" and as a media arm of "former Weatherman terrorists," and suggest that it is connected to President Obama through the groups Progressives for Obama and Movement for a Democratic Society (MDS). The right wing KeyWiki has an article on The Rag Blog, with individual links to more than 50 of its contributors. 
Qualifying was set by a metric qualifying system based on the previous race, the 2021 Rackley Roofing 200 and owner's points. As a result, Todd Gilliland of Front Row Motorsports would win the pole. 
CLG Na Rossa is a Gaelic football only GAA club based in Leitir, County Donegal, Ireland. The club fields both men's and ladies' teams at underage to senior level. 
Na Rossa have won the Donegal Junior A Football Championship once (1982) and the Donegal Intermediate Football Championship twice (1989 and 1999). 
Rupandehi 1 one of three parliamentary constituencies of Rupandehi District in Nepal. This constituency came into existence on the Constituency Delimitation Commission (CDC) report submitted on 31 August 2017. 
A quartic equation, or equation of the fourth degree, is an equation that equates a quartic polynomial to zero, of the form 
Sometimes the term biquadratic is used instead of quartic, but, usually, biquadratic function refers to a quadratic function of a square (or, equivalently, to the function defined by a quartic polynomial without terms of odd degree), having the form 
Since a quartic function is defined by a polynomial of even degree, it has the same infinite limit when the argument goes to positive or negative infinity. If a is positive, then the function increases to positive infinity at both ends; and thus the function has a global minimum. Likewise, if a is negative, it decreases to negative infinity and has a global maximum. In both cases it may or may not have another local maximum and another local minimum. 
The degree four (quartic case) is the highest degree such that every polynomial equation can be solved by radicals. 
Lodovico Ferrari is credited with the discovery of the solution to the quartic in 1540, but since this solution, like all algebraic solutions of the quartic, requires the solution of a cubic to be found, it could not be published immediately. The solution of the quartic was published together with that of the cubic by Ferrari's mentor Gerolamo Cardano in the book Ars Magna. 
Each coordinate of the intersection points of two conic sections is a solution of a quartic equation. The same is true for the intersection of a line and a torus. It follows that quartic equations often arise in computational geometry and all related fields such as computer graphics, computer-aided design, computer-aided manufacturing and optics. Here are examples of other geometric problems whose solution involves solving a quartic equation. 
In computer-aided manufacturing, the torus is a shape that is commonly associated with the endmill cutter.  To calculate its location relative to a triangulated surface, the position of a horizontal torus on the z-axis must be found where it is tangent to a fixed line, and this requires the solution of a general quartic equation to be calculated. 
A quartic equation arises also in the process of solving the crossed ladders problem, in which the lengths of two crossed ladders, each based against one wall and leaning against another, are given along with the height at which they cross, and the distance between the walls is to be found. 
In optics, Alhazen's problem is "Given a light source and a spherical mirror, find the point on the mirror where the light will be reflected to the eye of an observer." This leads to a quartic equation. 
The characteristic equation of a fourth-order linear difference equation or differential equation is a quartic equation. An example arises in the Timoshenko-Rayleigh theory of beam bending. 
Letting F and G be the distinct inflection points of the graph of a quartic function, and letting H be the intersection of the inflection secant line FG and the quartic, nearer to G than to F, then G divides FH into the golden section: 
Moreover, the area of the region between the secant line and the quartic below the secant line equals the area of the region between the secant line and the quartic above the secant line. One of those regions is disjointed into sub-regions of equal area. 
where p and q are the coefficients of the second and of the first degree respectively in the associated depressed quartic 
In either case, the roots of Q(x) are the roots of the factors, which may be computed using the formulas for the roots of a quadratic function or cubic function. 
Detecting the existence of such factorizations can be done using the resolvent cubic of Q(x). It turns out that: 
In fact, several methods of solving quartic equations (Ferrari's method, Descartes' method, and, to a lesser extent, Euler's method) are based upon finding such factorizations. 
For solving purposes, it is generally better to convert the quartic into a depressed quartic by the following simple change of variable. All formulas are simpler and some methods work only in this case. The roots of the original quartic are easily recovered from that of the depressed quartic by the reverse change of variable. 
This depressed quartic can be solved by means of a method discovered by Lodovico Ferrari. The depressed equation may be rewritten (this is easily verified by expanding the square and regrouping all terms in the left-hand side) as 
Then, we introduce a variable m into the factor on the left-hand side by adding 2y2m + pm + m2 to both sides. After regrouping the coefficients of the power of y on the right-hand side, this gives the equation  
As the value of m may be arbitrarily chosen, we will choose it in order to complete the square on the right-hand side. This implies that the discriminant in y of this quadratic equation is zero, that is m is a root of the equation 
This is the resolvent cubic of the quartic equation. The value of m may thus be obtained from Cardano's formula. When m is a root of this equation, the right-hand side of equation (1) is the square 
This equation is easily solved by applying to each factor the quadratic formula. Solving them we may write the four roots as 
Descartes introduced in 1637 the method of finding the roots of a quartic polynomial by factoring it into two quadratic ones. Let 
which is done elsewhere. This resolvent cubic is equivalent to the resolvent cubic given above (equation (1a)), as can be seen by substituting U = 2m. 
If u is a square root of a non-zero root of this resolvent (such a non-zero root exists except for the quartic x4, which is trivially factored), 
The symmetries in this solution are as follows. There are three roots of the cubic, corresponding to the three ways that a quartic can be factored into two quadratics, and choosing positive or negative values of u for the square root of U merely exchanges the two quadratics with one another. 
A variant of the previous method is due to Euler. Unlike the previous methods, both of which use some root of the resolvent cubic, Euler's method uses all of them. Consider a depressed quartic x4 + px2 + qx + r. Observe that, if 
Substituting the si by their values in term of the xi, this polynomial may be expanded in a polynomial in s whose coefficients are symmetric polynomials in the xi. By the fundamental theorem of symmetric polynomials, these coefficients may be expressed as polynomials in the coefficients of the monic quartic. If, for simplification, we suppose that the quartic is depressed, that is b = 0, this results in the polynomial 
These expressions are unnecessarily complicated, involving the cubic roots of unity, which can be avoided as follows. If s is any non-zero root of (3), and if we set 
We therefore can solve the quartic by solving for s and then solving for the roots of the two factors using the quadratic formula. 
There is an alternative solution using algebraic geometry In brief, one interprets the roots as the intersection of two quadratic curves, then finds the three reducible quadratic curves (pairs of lines) that pass through these points (this corresponds to the resolvent cubic, the pairs of lines being the Lagrange resolvents), and then use these linear equations to solve the quadratic. 
These four points are not collinear because they lie on the irreducible quadratic y = x2 and thus there is a 1-parameter family of quadratics (a pencil of curves) passing through these points. Writing the projectivization of the two quadratics as quadratic forms in three variables: 
After the credits, Big Bird pretends to be a statue. He encourages the viewers to visit their local museum, and comments on how staying perfectly still is tiring and wonders how statues can do it. 
The title song from Don't Eat the Pictures begins with Cookie Monster and his human friend, Bob McGrath in front of Still Life with Ham, a painting by Philippe Rousseau which Cookie Monster tries to devour. Bob holds Cookie Monster back and reminds him that he promised not to eat anything in the museum. Then Cookie Monster breaks into song, with angelic choral accompaniment, about paintings, statues, and mummies, and how he understands how important it is to not devour them. 
Kate Thill (born 25 January 2002) is a Luxembourger footballer who plays as a forward for NCAA Division II team Bridgeport Purple Knights and the Luxembourg women's national team. 
This biographical article related to women's association football in Luxembourg is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Mandarin rat snake (Euprepiophis mandarinus) is a species of nonvenomous colubrid snake endemic to Asia. It is closely related to Euprepiophis conspicillata, the Japanese forest rat snake. Mandarin rat snakes are one of the most popular rat snakes found in the pet trade. 
India (Arunachal Pradesh), Myanmar, Laos, Vietnam, Taiwan, China (Anhui, Beijing, Chongqing, Fujian, Gansu, Guangdong, Guangxi, Guizhou, Hainan, Hebei, Henan, Hubei, Hunan, Jiangsu, Jiangxi, Liaoning, Shaanxi, Shanghai, Shanxi, Sichuan, Tianjin, Tibet, Yunnan, Zhejiang) 
Type locality: China: Chekiang, Chusan island (modern transliteration: Zhejiang, Zhoushan) (Cantor, 1842). 
In recent years there has been some taxonomic controversy over the genera of rat snakes.  Based on mitochondrial DNA, Utiger et al. (2002) argued for a splintering of the genus Elaphe and suggested a reworking of the genera. 
Agonopterix fruticosella is a moth of the family Depressariidae. It is found in southern France and on the Iberian Peninsula. 
The larvae feed on Bupleurum rigidum species. They initially mine the leaves of their host plant. The mine has the form of a broad, brownish, full depth corridor. Later, the larva vacates the mine and continues window feeding. There are often several mines in a single leaf. Even later, the larva lives free under a spinning and eventually folds a leaf margin fastening it with silk. Larvae can be found at the end of June. 
Live from Death Row, published in May 1995, is a memoir by Mumia Abu-Jamal, an American murderer, journalist, and activist from Philadelphia, Pennsylvania. He is known for having been convicted of the murder of a city police officer and sentenced to death in 1982, in a trial that Amnesty International suspected of lacking impartiality. Abu-Jamal wrote this book while on death row. He has always maintained his innocence. Publishers Addison-Wesley paid Abu-Jamal a $30,000 advance for the book. 
Reports that Abu-Jamal would be paid for the book resulted in protests. In a case decided in Federal appeals court, it ruled that he had the right to be paid for commentary and writings. This is the first of several books that he has published which were completed in prison. His sentence was commuted to life in prison without parole in 2011, after he had been held for 29 years on death row. 
Abu-Jamal structures the book as anecdotes, most exploring the prison system. In an end section titled "Musings, memories, and prophecies", he discusses past events in his life, and he commemorates some prominent black people in America. 
Abu-Jamal had started providing commentaries to Prison Radio and other outlets. Addison-Wesley paid Abu-Jamal a $30,000 advance for the book. 
The notoriety of Abu-Jamal for his case and protests related to his book deal resulted in considerable coverage of this book at publication. 
In August 2018, Philander was sworn in as a Member of the Western Cape Provincial Parliament, succeeding Lennit Max. She was assigned to serve on the Social Cluster committees. Following the May 2019 general election, she was sworn in for her first full term on 22 May 2019. She is the only parliamentarian from the Drakenstein municipality. In June 2019, Philander was elected chairperson of the Standing Committee on Health. 
Philander is a senior member of the Democratic Alliance Women's Network (DAWN). She is the network's provincial chairperson. She is also a member of the provincial executive committee of the Democratic Alliance. 
"Drug abuse in Maldives has reached alarming levels, and, according to several ministries and high ranking officials, is now the most serious problem the country is facing." 
Threat of terrorist attacks is a matter of concern. The Department of Foreign Affairs and Trade (DFAT) of the Government of Australia advises travelers "to exercise caution" because of the high threat of terrorism. According to the Foreign and Commonwealth Office (FCO), "Attacks could be indiscriminate, including in places frequented by expatriates". 
Rate of criminal homicide and assault in the Maldives declined by 30% between the years 1997-2002. Crime involving bribery and fraud also declined by 33% during this time. The Corruption Perceptions Index in 2007 ranked the Maldives 84th best out of 179 countries in terms of corruption. On a scale of 0 to 10, with 0 being the least and ten being most transparent, Transparency International rated the Maldives 3.3. 
Jan Ziolkowski (born November 17, 1956) occupies the Arthur Kingsley Porter Professorship of Medieval Latin at Harvard University. From 2007 to 2020 he served as Director of the Dumbarton Oaks Research Library and Collection. His scholarship has focused on the literature, especially in Latin, of the Middle Ages.  
In the United States, he was elected a Member of the Medieval Academy of America in 2008, the American Academy of Arts and Sciences in 2010, and the American Philosophical Society in 2017. Abroad, he was appointed a corresponding member of the Austrian Academy of Sciences in 2006 and of the Academia Europaea in 2015. In 2015 he was awarded an Austrian Decoration for Science and Art, the Austrian Cross of Honor for Science and Art, First Class. 
He held a National Endowment for the Humanities Summer Stipend in 1983, an American Council for Learned Societies Fellowship in 1986, and a John Simon Guggenheim Fellowship in 1987-1988. In 2005-2006 he was a Fellow-in-Residence at the Netherlands Institute for Advanced Study. Since becoming U.S. representative to the International Medieval Latin Committee in 1988, he has served as Vice President from 1993-1999 and as President from 2000.  
From 2007 through 2020, Ziolkowski directed the Dumbarton Oaks Research Library and Collection, a Harvard institution for advanced research in Byzantine, Pre-Columbian, and Garden and Landscape studies. 
His later investigations include examinations of Medieval Latin literature associated with folk literature, such as Talking Animals: Medieval Latin Beast Poetry, in 1993, and Fairy Tales from Before Fairy Tales: The Medieval Latin Past of Wonderful Lies, in 2007. Both studies are notable for extensive appendixes of translations.[citation needed] 
Ziolkowski's other critical editions of medieval Latin texts, with translations and substantial commentaries, include Jezebel: A Norman Latin Poem of the Early Eleventh Century, in 1989; A Garland of Latin Satire, Wisdom, and History: Verse from Twelfth-Century France (Carmina Houghtoniensia), co-edited with Bridget Balint in 2007; and Solomon and Marcolf, in 2008.[citation needed] 
His best-known work[citation needed] in the genre of edition cum translation and commentary was The Cambridge Songs (Carmina cantabrigiensia), in 1994 (reprinted in 1998), which has been taken as the basis for the recording Lost Songs of a Rhineland Harper by the Sequentia (music group), an ensemble for medieval music directed by Benjamin Bagby, and for Cambridge Songs Suite No. 1 and No. 2 by the composer Jim Taylor of LeTourneau University.[citation needed] 
In English-only volumes, Ziolkowski co-edited The Medieval Craft of Memory: An Anthology of Words and Pictures, with Mary Carruthers in 2002, and translated Letters of Peter Abelard, Beyond the Personal, in 2008. Between these two books he edited and introduced a translation from the French of a still-classic examination of Medieval Latin metrics by the late Swedish philologist Dag Norberg.[citation needed] 
Among his contributions to the study of Dante Alighieri, Ziolkowski edited Dante and the Greeks, published by Dumbarton Oaks Publications in 2014, and Dante and Islam, published by Fordham University Press in 2015. Both books set the Italian poet in broader contexts, along the way helping to connect Dante studies with medieval, Byzantine, and Islamic studies.[citation needed] 
Ziolkowski founded the Dumbarton Oaks Medieval Library and served as its general editor from 2008 through 2020. He edited and co-translated the volume of Satires by Sextus Amarcius and Eupolemius, in 2011.[citation needed] 
Proton Holdings Berhad (PHB; informally Proton) is a Malaysian automotive company and automobile corporation active in automobile design, manufacturing, distribution and sales. Proton was established in 1985 as Malaysia's sole national badged car company until the advent of Perodua in 1993. The company is headquartered in Shah Alam, Selangor, and operates additional facilities at Proton City, Perak. 'Proton' is a Malay acronym for Perusahaan Otomobil Nasional (National Automobile Company). 
Proton was originally owned in majority by HICOM, with minority stakes being held by Mitsubishi Group members. By 2005, Mitsubishi had divested their stake in Proton to Khazanah Nasional, and in 2012, Proton was fully acquired by DRB-HICOM. 
Proton was the owner of Lotus Cars from 1996 to 2017. In May 2017, DRB-HICOM announced plans to sell a 49.9% stake in Proton and a 51% stake in Lotus to Geely Automobile Holdings. The deal was signed in June 2017, and since then, Lotus ceased to be a unit of Proton. 
Proton's sales declined during the late 1980s as a result of the worldwide economic recession, and the lack of technical expertise in Proton's management. Kenji Iwabuchi, a former Mitsubishi Motors executive, was appointed as the managing director of Proton in 1988. In the decade that followed, there were significant developments both domestically and globally and city. 
On 15 August 1992, the Proton Saga Iswara was launched. It shares the older Mitsubishi platform used in the original Proton Saga, but its exterior and interior styling are unique to Proton. The Saga Iswara was widely used as taxicabs in Malaysia during the 1990s and 2000s, and many continue in service.  
The Proton Iriz was unveiled on 25 September 2014 as the company's first B-segment 5-door hatchback. The new Iriz competes directly against the Perodua Myvi in its domestic market. 
On 18 January 2016, Proton unveiled their all-new four-cylinder GDI/TGDI and three-cylinder VVT engines. The new engines, of which there are six in total, are being developed in collaboration with Ricardo and Lotus Engineering, and are slated to enter production by late 2017. 
Proton introduced four new models in 2016. The new Perdana launched on 14 June, followed by the new Persona on 23 August, the new Saga on 28 September, and the new Ertiga on 24 November. The launch of four new Proton models within the span of six months was unprecedented in the company's history. Masazumi Ogawa was recruited as the director of quality control in Proton. 
Proton recruited Yoshiya Inamori as the vice president of manufacturing, who had previously been involved with Proton back in the 80s when it was founded during his time in Mitsubishi from April 1982 until July 2017. 
On 29 September 2017, DRB-HICOM announced changes to the board of Proton Holdings Berhad. Following the signing of a Definitive Agreement with China's Zhejiang Geely Holding Group Limited on 23 June 2017, the Chinese carmaker acquired 49.9% equity in Proton. The announcement on 29 September saw a new board of directors put in place in Proton Holdings, Proton Edar (the local distribution arm) and Perusahaan Otomobil Nasional Sdn Bhd (PONSB). 
The Proton logo in 1983 was a dark blue shield which encompassed a yellow crescent positioned below a yellow fourteen-pointed star, in reference to the Malaysian flag and coat of arms. However, this emblem was only used for Proton cars which were sold domestically. Proton cars exported to other markets received different badge designs. 
In 2000, the new Proton logo was used on the Proton Waja which launched in that year. It featured a stylised yellow tiger head on a green roundel embossed upon a dark blue shield, with the Proton name in yellow capital letters in Frutiger font. The standard text representation of the Proton name was also changed from the lowercase italic text "proton" to the uppercase "PROTON". 
All Proton cars manufactured after 2000 carried the new badge, both in the domestic and export markets. Then its colour was changed into two-tone, silver and black, which was in use since 2008 with the introduction of the second generation Proton Saga. 
In June 2016, a new Proton logo was introduced during the launch of 2016 Proton Perdana, which is only a Malayan tiger head with circle surrounding in three-dimensional style. The new logo is now used on all Proton latest models, including the 2017 Proton Iriz facelift and 2017 Proton Exora Enhanced 
Proton relies primarily on its domestic market for the majority of its sales and revenues. Nonetheless, small volumes of Proton cars are also exported to various other countries in Asia, in addition to the United Kingdom and Australia. The company held a far larger global sales network in the 1990s, spanning all six continents and over 70 countries, but intends to regain a global foothold with 500,000 annual sales by 2018. 
On 24 January 2020, Proton announced that their goal is to export 4,000 vehicles by the end of the year or export 6,000 vehicles if they were offered government incentives. 
Proton began importing cars to the right-hand drive UK market from March 1989, and reached its 12-month sales target of 5,000 cars after just six months. The Proton brand was initially a huge success in the UK, but sales were declining sharply by 2010 and the brand was withdrawn in 2014.[citation needed] 
Proton's presence in Singapore was handled by Cycle & Carriage from 1989 to September 2002 due to failures to make a turn around. It made a comeback in 2003 with Proton establishing a direct branch. 
In the Philippines, Proton was formerly represented by Proton Pilipinas Corp from 1992 with an assembly plant in Alaminos, Pangasinan that manufactured the Proton Wira. 
Proton exported 164,153 cars between December 1986 and December 1997. The United Kingdom is by far the company's most successful export market in terms of cumulative sales volume, and at one point Proton set the record for Fastest Selling Make of New Car Ever to Enter the United Kingdom. In 1992, the Saga was ranked among the Top 20 best-selling cars in the UK, outselling its primary competitors from Hyundai and SEAT. 
On 21 March 2019, Proton has announced that a plant will be built in Pakistan in collaboration with Alhaj Automotive. Proton has already booked cbu versions of Proton X70 in Pakistan. The orders for ckd versions of X70 are also being booked by Proton in Pakistan which are expected to be delivered in Q3 of 2021 after the completion of local assembly plant. Proton Saga is also expected to be launched in Pakistan in January 2021. 
On 21 August 2020, it was announced that the Proton Saga will be exported to Kenya, most built under CKDs shipped to Simba Corp. 
The United Kingdom has been a key export market for Proton since the late 1980s. However, by the late 2000s, British Proton sales had declined considerably as a result of ageing models and depleting stock. In 2013, Proton Cars UK had attempted to relaunch the brand with four all-new models. However, the relaunch was instead postponed indefinitely in view of more stringent European Union emissions and safety regulations. 
Proton is currently developing a range of all-new petrol engines in collaboration with Ricardo and Lotus Engineering. The engines will feature more advanced technology such as direct injection, cylinder deactivation and stop-start idling, and will meet the highest Euro 6c emissions regulations. On 18 January 2016, Proton fired up a prototype in a live broadcast from Ricardo's facility in Shoreham, England. Mass production of the all-new Proton engines will commence in late 2017. 
On 3 December 2014, Proton announced plans to construct a new car factory in Bangladesh. A deal was made public on 6 February 2015 between Kuala Lumpur and Jakarta to help the latter develop the way for their own national car. There are allegations that President Jokowi Widodo is appointing Abdullah Mahmud Hendropriyono as the representative of PT Adiperkasa Citra Lestari, who was known to be associated with ex-President Megawati Soekarnoputri. 
Proton announced that they closed Proton Motor Pars, established in August 2011, since it was dormant and no longer in the company's interest to revive it in any way. 
According to Steven Xu of Proton's International Sales, the company is still in the process of establishing more distributors to increase its presence in Indonesia as of 10 April 2019. 
On 24 April 2019, Proton announced that they'll relaunch again in Australia since sales have declined in 2015 after the company established its presence in 1995. 
According to Li Churong, the company will expand its presence in the ASEAN countries, such as Brunei, Indonesia, Singapore and Thailand. The company announced on 16 June 2021 that its Indonesian and Thai operations will resume in the near future with plans to be the third biggest automobile manufacturer in the ASEAN region. It was reported that Proton's Thai operations could resume by 2022. 
It was announced on 13 November 2020 that Proton vehicles will be sold in Nepal by Jagadamba Mortors. The company will formally launch retail operations by January 2021. 
On 29 October 2012, Proton entered a collaboration with Honda Motor Company, Ltd. Both companies have agreed to explore collaboration opportunities in the areas of technology enhancement, new product line up and the sharing of vehicle platforms and facilities. 
Proton partnered with Suzuki and rebadged the Suzuki Ertiga. Under the June 2015 agreement, 25 of its 3S and 4S Suzuki dealership outlets have been converted into Proton Edar outlets and bearing both Proton and Suzuki logos. 
PROTON Holdings parent company DRB-HICOM announced sold 49.9% stake in Proton to Zhejiang Geely Automobile Holdings. Following the entry of China's Geely as a shareholder of PROTON, PROTON Holdings secured the intellectual properties to the design, development, manufacture, sale, marketing and distribution of the Geely Boyue, Geely Binyue and Geely Jiaji for Brunei, Indonesia, Malaysia, Singapore and Thailand. 
Proton announced the launch of the Proton's first sport utility vehicle which is based on Geely Boyue, with touches of local design elements introduced for the Malaysian market. The first batch of the locally named Proton X70 will be imported from China, with localisation plans afoot with the expansion of their Tanjong Malim plant. 
Proton's presence in international motorsports peaked when the Petronas EON Racing Team won the 2002 Production World Rally Championship with veteran Malaysian rally driver Karamjit Singh in a Proton PERT, a rebadged Mitsubishi Lancer Evolution. The Proton-Karamjit duo also won the 2001, 2002 and 2004 Asia-Pacific Rally Championship titles. 
In 2003, the Proton Motorsports Division, also known as "Race.Rally.Research., R3", was established. R3 assumed the responsibility of Proton's motorsports endeavours, which had been held by Ralliart of Mitsubishi Motors. The first model to benefit from R3 engineering was the Proton Satria R3 which launched in late 2004 with a limited run of 150 units. 
In 2011, UK-based Welch Motorsport contested the BTCC in a Proton Persona NGTC, driven by Daniel Welch. Welch Motorsport competes independently and is not tied to Proton, but indirectly supported by Proton UK The team made its debut in the second half of the 2011 BTCC season and scored a point in the final race at the Silverstone Circuit, placing 22nd overall in the tournament. In comparison, 2011 Drivers' Champion Matt Neal of Honda Racing Team scored 257 points. 
Welch Motorsport's performance improved significantly in the 2012 BTCC season. Daniel Welch had his best race at Oulton Park, where he finished sixth in race one, and held off defending champion Matt Neal to claim fourth position in race two. Welch Motorsport placed 15th overall with 79 points in the 2012 season, with 2012 Drivers' Champion Gordon Shedden scoring 408 points in comparison. 
Welch Motorsport expanded to a two-car team in the 2013 BTCC season. The Proton Persona NGTC returns in the hands of Daniel Welch, whereas the second car is a Super 2000 Mk 2 Ford Focus driven by David Nye. 
Proton and Norwich City F.C signed a 3-year sponsorship deal in 2003, becoming the Canaries's main sponsor for their home kit, whilst Proton-owned Lotus Cars would feature on the away kit. The deal, reportedly valued at a "seven-figure sum", was the largest sponsorship deal in the club's history. Proton's chief executive officer Tengku Mahaleel Ariff said the sponsorship deal would bring more awareness and recognition to the Proton brand, which it currently lacked. 
In 2005, Proton opened a showroom at Norwich City's Carrow Road stadium, featuring products from Proton and Proton-owned brands. It was incorporated into the stadium's Jarrold Stand. 
The Story of Light is the sixth studio album by South Korean boy group Shinee. It consists of 3 EPs that were later collected together in the repackage album, The Story of Light: Epilogue. This album release marks the group's first in South Korea since 1 of 1 in November 2016, and the first since member Jonghyun's death in December 2017 and is the last Shinee release to feature Jonghyun following his death. 
The first part of the album, led by the lead single "Good Evening", was released on May 28. The dance for the song was choreographed by Japanese choreographer Koharu Sugawara, who had previously worked with Taemin on his single "Move" in October 2017. 
The second part of the trilogy was released on June 11 with the single "I Want You". According to group, the second part of the album represents the group's view of themselves, while the first part reflected what others think of them. The third and last part of the album is fronted by the single "Our Page" and was released on June 25. 
The first and second EPs also made a double appearance on Billboard's World Albums Chart on June 20, 2018. The Story of Light: EP.2 debuted at number four, while The Story of Light: EP.1 ranked at number eleven for its third week on the chart. The double appearance of different albums from one act on World Albums makes the group the fifth K-pop act to score two simultaneous entries on the chart for the same week. 
On August 1, 2018, Shinee released the Japanese version of "Good Evening" and "I Want You" as part of their 15th Japanese single, "Sunny Side". 
On September 10, 2018, the group released the finale of their 10th anniversary album series, a repackaged album titled The Story of Light: Epilogue featuring sixteen tracks, including its lead single "Countless" and past singles "Good Evening", "I Want You" and "Our Page". 
Ashleigh Barty and Sally Peers were the defending champions, having won the event in 2012, but Barty chose to participate in the 2013 Birmingham Classic during that week and Peers chose not to participate. 
New Zealand Natural Premium Ice Cream is a global franchise network based in Auckland, New Zealand. It operates as an international franchisor of ice cream, frozen yoghurt, smoothie and juice parlours and mini-parlours, which can be found in shopping centres in Australia, New Zealand, Thailand and other countries. The ice cream is also available at supermarkets throughout New Zealand and Australia. 
New Zealand Natural began as a small ice creamery in Christchurch New Zealand in 1984 that specialized in ice cream with no artificial colours or flavours. By chance, Rael Polivnick, who founded the company, met the owner on a flight crossing the Tasman Sea. Polivnick, seeing the potential, purchased the rights to open a New Zealand Natural store at Sydney's famous Bondi Beach in 1985.[citation needed] 
New Zealand Natural has won the Export Award at the Westpac New Zealand Franchise Awards and the SIAL D'Or Award in France. 
The company's Gold Pure Vanilla was named best in Category at the 14th New Zealand Ice Cream Awards in 2010. 
Pendleton was launched on January 21, 1944 and completed in February. She was built for the United States Maritime Commission. She was owned by the War Shipping Administration. Her port of registry was Portland, Oregon. The United States Official Number 245142 and Code Letters KWAA were allocated. During World War II, Pendleton was a member of convoy ON 249, which departed from Liverpool, United Kingdom on August 18, 1944 and arrived at New York on September 2. 
Pendleton was transferred to National Bulk Carriers of Wilmington, Delaware in 1948. In July 1951, Pendleton ran aground in the Hudson River, New York. She was refloated the next day. The damaged part of the hull would later play a key role in the sinking. 
The rescue of the survivors of the shipwrecked Pendleton is considered one of the most daring rescues of the United States Coast Guard. All four crew of CG-36500 were awarded the Coast Guard's Gold Lifesaving Medal (rather than just the coxswain, the typical treatment). At the time of her loss, Pendleton was insured for $1,690,000. 
The Eagle Awards were a series of awards for comic book titles and creators. They were awarded by UK fans voting for work produced during the previous year. Named after the UK's Eagle comic, they were launched in 1977 for comics released in 1976. 
In 2014, in connection with Stan Lee, the Eagle Awards were renamed, and presented as, the True Believer Comic Awards. They have not returned since then. 
The Eagle Awards were set up by Mike Conroy, Nick Landau, Colin Campbell, Phil Clarke, and Richard Burton. Because the Eagle symbol was perceived (as described by Burton) as "a standard of quality ... seldom reached" in early 1977, the Eagle Awards were named "with official blessing from IPC" (Eagle's then-publisher). 
The Eagles were launched at the British Comic Art Convention, the earliest British fan convention devoted entirely to comics (and usually known by the moniker Comicon). The first awards ceremony was held 3 September 1977, at the Bloomsbury Centre Hotel, London. The 1978 and 1979 awards were also presented at the British Comic Art Convention. Almost from the beginning, the awards included separate UK and US sections. 
After a hiatus in 1982, the Eagle Awards returned in 1983, presented at the London Comic Mart by Alan Moore and Dave Gibbons. 
The awards became almost fully annual in 1987, in conjunction with the United Kingdom Comic Art Convention (UKCAC); they were held at the UKCAC in 1987, 1988, and 1990. 
The Eagle Awards went dormant during most of the 1990s, as organizer Mike Conroy focused on his freelance writing (including becoming an editor of Comics International). From 1990 to 1997, the Eagles were replaced by the UK Comic Art Awards, and then from 1997 until 2003 (with the exception of the year 2000) were supplanted by the National Comics Awards. 
Management of the Eagle Awards was transferred from co-founder Mike Conroy to his teenage daughter Cassandra Conroy in 2009 (although Mike Conroy stayed on as advisor). The previous years' venue the Bristol Comic Expo scaled back that year, and was not available for the evening awards ceremony. After attempting to go forward with the Eagle Awards as an online-only process, the Conroys were forced to cancel the 2009 awards due to a "lack of nominations." 
At the outset of the Eagle Award, ballots were made available to "most dealers, shops and fanzines." The initial method of casting votes was designed to be inclusive and straightforward, with completed forms able to be returned to the same place, rather than a centralized location. An initial ballot formed a list of nominees, from which the voting ballot was created and disseminated in the same manner. 
The awards for 1983 used an open voting system, with no pre-selected nominees. In 1984, the Eagles introduced a new nomination system composed of "prominent British fans, publishers, dealers, and artists," which put forward three names in each category. 
The 2004 awards saw online voting for the first time; over 13,000 voting forms were "received via post, email and website counting centres." 
For the 2007 awards, nominations were made by the general comics-reading public via the Eagle Awards website; the five most popular became nominees for the awards. 
Over the course of their existence, the Eagle Awards were eventually awarded in more than 30 categories. 
The nominations for Favourite Single Comicbook Story and Favorite Continued Comicbook Story were separate from 1977 to 1980 and then again from 2011 to 2014; they were merged as one category from 2000 to 2010. Similarly, the Favourite Cover category was only divided into British and American sections from 1984 to 1990. 
Reflecting an interest in long-form comics, the Best Original Graphic Novel category was added in 1986. The Favourite Team category was dropped after 1990. 
With the revival of the Eagles in 2000, categories for Favourite Writer and Favourite Artist were no longer separated into UK and US sections, and a host of new categories were added: 
The Favourite Comics Related Website (Fan-Organized) category was dropped in 2002, but five more award categories were added: 
The 2004 Eagles dropped awards for the long-running categories Supporting Character and Character Most Worthy of Own Title, as well as the relatively new categories of British Small Press Title, Comic Strip/Newspaper Strip, and Comics E-Zine. It added a Favourite Letterer category as well as the one-off category Favourite Comics-Related Merchandise. 
The 2006 Eagles saw the addition of a Favourite Publisher award, and the 2008 Eagle Awards added categories for Favourite Newcomer: Writer and Favourite Newcomer: Artist while dropping the long-running categories Favourite Character/Hero and Favourite Villain. 
The following is a comprehensive list of the Eagle Award categories and the years they were presented, many of which were divided into British sections and (North) American sections. These categories included: 
2000 AD's Tharg the Mighty won this award four times (with three of those awards going to Matt Smith); Axel Alonso also won the award three times. 
DC's The Joker won this category five times, 2000 AD's Torquemada won four times, and Marvel's Magneto came away with three wins.  
Multiple award-winners in this category included Wizard with six wins, Fantagraphics Books with its publications  Amazing Heroes and The Comics Journal racking up seven wins in total, and the British publication Speakeasy with four wins. 
This article about a location in the Mexican state of Aguascalientes is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
At the FIS Nordic World Ski Championships 2019 Poltoranin was one of five athletes caught doping by Bundeskriminalamt in a police raid in Seefeld, Austria. He was arrested before the start of the 15 kilometre classical race. He admitted to using blood doping. 
Poltoranin competed at the 2006 and 2010 Winter Olympics, the World Ski Championships in 2007, 2009, 2011 and 2013. 
Poltoranin finished fifth in both the individual and team sprint at the 2010 Winter Olympics in Vancouver. 
Description: Great bold strokes uncover composite figures, enveloped in the soft light of the stage. The figure here is just a silhouette, without outlines, and the stroke of colour alone creates the form. The soft gentle tones impart an almost physical sense of light, dispersing and contrasting in the ballet costumes. 
The West River is a river in the Whitefish River and Lake Huron drainage basins in southwestern Sudbury District in Northeastern Ontario, Canada. 
This article related to  a river in Northern Ontario, Canada is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Kevin Murphy (born September 8, 1963) is a former American football linebacker who played for the Tampa Bay Buccaneers, the San Diego Chargers and the Seattle Seahawks in the National Football League. He was converted from defensive lineman to linebacker in the NFL. He played college football for the Oklahoma Sooners. Murphy was an All-Conference selection in 1982, 1983 and 1985 and an All-American in 1985. 
This biographical article relating to an American football linebacker born in the 1960s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Vasiana is a town and commune in Madagascar. It belongs to the district of Mandoto (district), which is a part of Vakinankaratra Region. The population of the commune was 19,992 inhabitants in 2018. 
Only primary schooling is available. The majority 64% of the population of the commune are farmers, while an additional 35.8% receives their livelihood from raising livestock. The most important crop is rice, while other important products are maize and cassava. Industry provides employment for 0.2% of the population. 
Francis was the second son of Francis Howard, 5th Baron Howard of Effingham. On 26 July 1722, he was commissioned captain and lieutenant-colonel in the 3rd Regiment of Foot Guards. Howard succeeded as Baron Howard of Effingham in 1725, with the death of his older brother Thomas Howard. 
This biography of an earl in the peerage of Great Britain is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Sevenes is a 2011 Malayalam-language sports-action film written by Ikbal Kuttipuram and directed by Joshiy. The cast includes Kunchacko Boban,  Asif Ali, Nivin Pauly, Rejith Menon, Aju Varghese, and Vineeth Kumar in lead roles; and Nadia Moidu, Rima Kallingal and Bhama in supporting roles. The film centres on seven young men who play sevens football, popular in Malabar. The film started its shooting in April 2011 at Kozhikode district. 
The film score and soundtrack were composed by Bijibal. The soundtrack consists of three tracks, including one theme music track, with lyrics penned by Rafeeq Ahamed and Santhosh Varma. 
Phyllobacterium leguminum is a Gram-negative bacteria from the genus of Phyllobacterium which was isolated from root nodules from the plants Argyrolobium uniflorum and Astragalus algerianus. 
1937 was by far Hare's most successful year, reaching the quarterfinals of the French Championships and the U.S. National Championships, the fourth round of Wimbledon and playing for Great Britain in the Challenge Round of the 1937 Davis Cup. 
In January 1943 he married tennis player Mary Hardwick in Phoenix, Arizona. Both worked for Wilson Sporting Goods.  
 The Sustainable Water Programme of Action was established in 2003 to address concerns about fresh water in New Zealand. 
Ms. John Soda released the first album No P. or D. on Morr Music in 2002. It is listed by Pitchfork Media as the 45th top album of 2003. 
The While Talking EP was released on Morr Music in 2003. It includes "I & #8217," a remix medley of tracks from No P. or D. by Subtle. 
This article about a German band or other musical ensemble is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
These primarily included film and TV series adaptations, but also original and licensed Marvel characters, and music-related biographies and fictional adventures. 
Issue #7 was withdrawn after completion, and never published in english. Issue #8 was published in two editorially identical editions, one magazine-sized, one tabloid-sized. 
The sole TV series adaptation was of Battlestar Galactica in issue #8 (1978), which was published in two editorially identical editions, one magazine-sized, one tabloid-sized. This special was partially redrawn and expanded into three issues when Battlestar Galactica became a monthly comic book series. The adaptations of Star Trek: The Motion Picture (issue #15) and Blade Runner (issue #22) were also reprinted in standard comic book format. 
AFC Dunstable are a football club based in Dunstable, Bedfordshire, England. The club are members of Division One Central of the Southern League, and are affiliated to the Bedfordshire County Football Association. They play at Creasey Park. 
CNA currently has commercial agreements with Reuters, AFP, ITAR-TASS, RIA NOVOSTI and MENA and cooperation agreements with ANA, SANA, XINHUA, ANSA, IRNA, PAP, APS and ATA. CNA also exchanges news with the Macedonian Press Agency (Thessaloniki), BTA, STA, KYODO and ROMPRES. 
The Cyprus News Agency was officially established on February 16, 1976 at the initiative of the then Director General of the Cyprus Broadcasting Corporation (CyBC) Andreas Christofides, who saw the need for a national news agency for Cyprus.  
Previously, a private news service under the same name had been set up by Miltiades Christodoulou, in 1957. On his appointment as director of the government Press and Information Office (PIO), he handed over to journalist Christakis Katsambas. The operation closed down in 1967. 
With the official launching of CNA, Christofides appointed Andreas Hadjipapas, a journalist working for CyBC and correspondent for UPI and AFP in Cyprus, as chief editor of the Agency. Technical facilities were provided by the PIO, thus enabling Hadjipapas to dispatch a daily news bulletin in English to Reuters and the Non-Aligned News Agencies Pool. 
In 1984, CNA expanded its activities, hired journalists and other staff and secured translation and distribution of its dispatches in other languages apart from English. 
In 1989, the Cyprus House of Representatives approved legislation providing for the operation of the Cyprus News Agency as a "semi-governmental" news organisation with full editorial independence. 
Under the Act, CNA is governed by a seven-member Board of Directors comprising established media professionals. The Board includes representatives of the Cyprus Journalists Union, the Cyprus Newspaper and Magazine Publishers Association, CyBC and the PIO. 
In 1996, an important year in the development of CNA, news in Greek was introduced, to meet the needs of the local news media which were proliferating, especially in the electronic field and the CNA home page was created on the Internet. 
A landmark in CNA's history is the signing in 1996 of a cooperation agreement with the Athens News Agency (ANA), which provided CNA its first computerised editing system. 
At the same time, CNA sought membership in established media organisations and regional associations of news agencies. Thus, it became a member of the Alliance of Mediterranean News Agencies (AMAN), the European Alliance of Press Agencies (EAPA) and the Commonwealth Press Union (CPU). 
In 2002, CNA introduced news in Turkish, a press release service and its own photo service offering local coverage of news events. 
Together with the budget for 2004, the Council of Ministers and the House of Representatives approved the re-organisation of CNA and a new organisational chart which is to be implemented fully by the end of 2005, thus allowing a further upgrading of the services offered and the operation of the Agency on a 24-hour basis. 
As a national news agency, CNA focuses its attention on events in Cyprus and on developments abroad that have some bearing on Cyprus or are of particular interest to the country. It also covers news in the region and activities of the European Union, the Council of Europe and other multilateral organisations. 
Coverage includes developments in the Cyprus issue and the country's accession to the EU, as well as home news, domestic politics, foreign policy, economic and business news, social issues, culture/arts and sports. 
CNA has correspondents or stringers in all towns of the island, as well as Brussels and Strasbourg, Athens, Turkey, London, Washington, D.C. and New York City. 
News items in Turkish are posted on the website for free access and sent by e-mail to the Turkish-Cypriot and Turkish media, as well as to the Turkish-Cypriot political parties. 
In addition to the news items distributed throughout the day, CNA also issues a Cyprus press review in Greek and a 24-hours news summary in Greek for overseas subscribers in large Cypriot and Greek communities, as well as a bulletin on activities of Cypriots abroad. 
Through agreements with the Athens News Agency (ANA) and the European Pressphoto Agency (EPA), CNA offers subscribers a large selection of photographs covering local and international events. CNA itself offers photographs on Cyprus events. 
As from 1/6/ 2002 CNA offers a Press Release Service, on a subscription basis, offering interested organisations the possibility of distributing verbatim their press releases to the media and other subscribers of the Agency. Through this service, the releases of the Press and Information Office of the Cyprus Government are distributed. 
The Agency is planning the introduction of other news services and multimedia services, after implementation of its new organisational chart which will allow an increase of its editorial staff and working hours. These services include news in the format of SMA, MMS, WAP and WEB. 
As minor planet discoveries are confirmed, they are given a permanent number by the IAU's Minor Planet Center (MPC), and the discoverers can then submit names for them, following the IAU's naming conventions. The list below concerns those minor planets in the specified number-range that have received names, and explains the meanings of those names. 
Alex R. Hernandez Jr. is an Austin Texas based Trial lawyer originally from Port Lavaca, who is notable for cases related to nationwide plaintiff personal injury, white collar criminal defendants, national commercial and residential real estate law, probate and estate and US business legal representation.[excessive citations] Hernandez, a Bachelor, is twice divorced with one daughter. 
When Hernandez Jr. was ready to enter into high school Hernandez Sr. decided it was time to move back to Port Lavaca. Hernandez Jr. went to high school in Port Lavaca Texas and excelled at all activities, he became Band leader and President, All State performer, Student Council Reprsentative, and won the French and Jazz Band awards. Hernandez Sr. became the First Hispanic County Judge for Calhoun County and the First Hispanic County Court at Law Judge for Calhoun County.  
Alex R. Hernandez Jr. graduated from Calhoun High School in 1989 and went on to receive degrees from Victoria College in 1991 and the University of Texas at Austin in 1994 where he graduated as Economics Student of the Year with a Bachelor of Arts in Economics. Hernandez worked before deciding to go to school where he applied to one law school St. Mary's University School of Law in the city he was living at the time, San Antonio, Texas.  Hernandez graduated from St. Mary's in 2001. 
Hernandez has been a volunteer for several organizations and member of several Victoria, Texas boards including VBEC (Victoria Business and Education Coalition), Keep Victoria Beautiful and the Food Bank of the Golden Crescent. 
Hernandez is a longtime member of the State Bar of Texas and was part of the Grievance Committee which monitors and disciplines Texas lawyers as well as a member of the, invite-only organization, Texas Trial Lawyers Association and Million Dollar Advocates Forum. Hernandez has received awards and accolades for his work as a lawyer. 
Alex R. Hernandez Jr. is the CEO of ARH Technology Services Group LLC, a company that runs AI software, handles digital marketing including social marketing and media, builds websites, and consults with marketing clients. Often considered ahead of his time Hernandez built the company from the ground up using educational tools to run the business for his clients including his law firm. The company is based in Austin, Texas. 
In 2012, Alex R. Hernandez Jr. ran unsuccessfully for office as a Texas House of Representatives candidate as a Democrat. 
Darren Tucker (born 2 June 1962) is an Australian cricketer. He played two List A matches for New South Wales in 1989/90. 
This biographical article related to an Australian cricket person born in the 1960s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The flag of Moscow, in the Russian Federation, is a dark red banner of arms charged as the arms of the city in the centre.  It displays Saint George wearing armor and a blue cape with a golden lance in his right hand riding on a silver horse.  He is shown stabbing a zilant with the lance.  The legend in which the flag came from originated in Jacobus de Voragine's Golden Legend. 
The club was formed in 1965 as a merger of two professional clubs, Sportclub Enschede and the Enschedese Boys. One of such predecessors, SC Enschede, had also won a single Dutch championship in 1926. 
De Grolsch Veste, formerly named Arke Stadion, is the official stadium of FC Twente and is owned by the club. It is located at the Business & Science Park, near the University of Twente and between the city centers of Enschede and Hengelo. It has a spectator capacity of 30,205 with a standard pitch heating system and has a promenade instead of fences around the stands. 
The cost of the construction is estimated to be around 33 million guilders, and the stadium took 14 months to complete, with its foundation stone having been laid on 31 January 1997. Due to the tight budget available, the layout of the stadium was constructed so that future expansions are possible without the necessity to tear down entire existing stands. 
The recording of "You'll Never Walk Alone" by Gerry and the Pacemakers is sung along in the whole stadium before every kick-off. 
On 7 July 2011, a section of the stadium roof collapsed whilst expansion work was taking place at the stadium, killing two people. 
Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
The players below had senior international cap(s) for their respective countries. Players whose name is listed in bold represented their countries while playing for FC Twente. 
Asmachilca is only found in Peru. It was traditionally used by the Incas for respiratory system complaints.[citation needed]  Today, it is used in cooking, but tea is the most common preparation. 
Picea purpurea, also known as purple cone spruce and purple-coned spruce is a species of spruce found only in China. It is likely to be a hybrid species produced by crosses between Picea likiangensis and Picea wilsonii, or possibly involving other species. 
Each year, Civic Theatre creates over a dozen productions and over 15,000 hours of educational instruction. These programs are made possible by over 700 volunteers under the leadership of 9 professional staff and over 30 guest artists. 
He was born at Bank House in Ketley near Coalbrookdale, son of Richard Reynolds who was in charge of Abraham Darby II's ironworks at Ketley. Around 1777 he took over the management of the works there. 
William Reynolds's education included some time studying with the physician and chemist Joseph Black. Reynolds during his life maintained his interest in many branches of science, including chemistry, geology and mineralogy, and he had a laboratory at his home Bank House, at Ketley Bank. He was interested in the application of science in industry. With Abraham Darby he built under licence several Boulton and Watt steam engines, an early type of steam engine, for the works. 
Reynolds constructed three tub boat canals, which brought coal and iron ore a short distance from local mines to the ironworks. Built from 1787 to 1788, they were the Ketley Canal, the Wombridge Canal and the Shropshire Canal. They included an invention of Reynolds, an inclined plane: this was a method of raising canal boats from one level to another. 
During this period, the reputation of Coalbrookdale encouraged visiting engineers who tried new ideas. 
Thomas Telford knew the Coalbrookdale company since he had become Surveyor of Public Works for Shropshire in 1787. Reynolds constructed Longdon-on-Tern Aqueduct for Telford, a cast-iron aqueduct, assembled in 1796, carrying the Shrewsbury Canal across the River Tern at Longdon-on-Tern. (Telford, encouraged by  its success, used cast iron for the Pontcysyllte Aqueduct). 
Reynolds became seriously ill in March 1803, and died near Broseley (adjacent to Coalbrookdale) on 3 June of that year. He was buried in the Quaker burial ground at Coalbrookdale. His interests in the Ketley works were passed to his half-brother Joseph. 
Kinka Usher is a director of television commercials. He also directed the 1999 feature film Mystery Men. 
Kinka Usher was born in France, one of four children. His mother taught dance and his father was a graphic designer. Growing up he spent his time between Europe (primarily Italy) and the United States (primarily Santa Barbara). During these early years he explored a career in the restaurant business as a sous-chef. 
Entering the film industry at 23, he began as a production assistant at Harmony Pictures and gradually worked up to camera assistant, Steadicam operator and eventually a director/cameraman. His big break came though when he was hired as a camera assistant to director Roger Corman on one of his films. 
His directorial debut came in 1992 on "Aborigine," a spot for Acura which earned him a Belding Award. Three years later he opened House of Usher and by 1997 he had four Lions from Cannes. The following year he received the Directors Guild of America Award for Best Commercial Director. His extensive list of credits include spots for Taco Bell, Nike, Got Milk?, Nissan, Miller Lite, Polaroid and Pepsi. 
In 1999, he crossed over from commercials to features, directing Mystery Men for Universal Studios. He subsequently returned to directing commercials, including a Bridgestone ad featured in the 2011 Super Bowl. 
He is dedicated to directing in the United States so he can be near his home in Los Angeles. He has a child. 
Lucas was first elected to the House of Commons of Canada in the 1921 Canadian federal election as a United Farmers of Alberta candidate. He defeated two other candidates including former Alberta MLA James Bismark Holden in a landslide where he captured 81 per cent of the vote to win his first term in office. 
In 1932, the other eight United Farmers of Alberta MPs joined the newly founded Co-operative Commonwealth Federation and ran as CCF candidates in the 1935 Canadian federal election. Lucas refused to join the CCF and ran instead as a Conservative and finished third behind Social Credit candidate James Alexander Marshall and George Smith of the Liberal Party. 
When his son, John W. (Jack) died in January 1960, William T. Lucas and Charlotte Perrin, his parents were listed as survivors. 
The Islamic Azad University, Mashhad Branch (IAUM), also known as the Islamic Azad University of Mashhad, is a private university in Mashhad, Iran. This university is a branch of the Islamic Azad University. It was established in 1982, and offers Bachelor, Masters, PhD and M.D. degrees. It is famous for the quality and rigor of its undergraduate education and the success of its students in many national competitions and exams.[citation needed] 
IAUM has over 547 academic staff and about 25,936 students. 124 subjects are taught in six major programs (medical science, science, humanities, engineering, agriculture, art and architecture) at four different levels (undergraduate, graduate, Masters and PhD). More than 60,000 students have graduated from IAUM. It is run by more than 1756 administrative staff, most of whom have graduate and postgraduate degrees. 
The medicine faculty has: an Educational space of 6000 square meter 138 with 8 classrooms with audiovisual facilities, an amphitheater, educational laboratories, a computer and IT center and pratic, moulage and anatomy halls.  There are 7 laboratories in the faculty: Histology, Pathology, Parasitology and Mycology, Microbiology, Physiology and Biochemistry. 
Since the beginning, the faculty's educational and official space has been located in Mashhad, Rahnamaee street, and two other buildings has been used in Rahnamaee and Sanabad street .Now the sciences faculty with 6420 square meters built area in 4 buildings accepts  students. 
Major part of the space is occupied with classrooms, audio classes or educational workshops. The faculty has 32 classrooms now. 
Library of the basic sciences faculty with 444 square meters space is located in south corner of the faculty and includes book storehouse, awarding part, reference part, issues parts, technical part and male and female studying halls. 
This center, with the goal of research activities harmonization in orientations of the center interdisciplinary, was recommended in 2007 and the implementation is in progress. The research laboratories complex of the center includes: nanotechnology research, chemistry, biochemistry physic, geology, physic, mathematic and statistic laboratories. hall 
In order for the students to access to the newest and the most update essays and information of the world, the faculty has managed to get the membership of some magazines and electronic data base so that the students can connect to these sites through the internet and search and receive the essays freely. 
The faculty has two spaces with about 400 square meters area and also with totally 350 persons capacity for holding different ceremonies and conferences. These halls most used, in different ways, for performing theses defense and students projects, holding miscellaneous classes and educational workshops and also in order to hold  gathering and conferences. 
Among other welfare facilities in the Technical and Engineering Faculty are cafeteria and self-service halls for use of all students. In the north side of the faculty, an appropriate space in three floors, in an area more than 3000 square meters, is allocated as the faculty cafeteria and self-service. 
For the students' comfort, several buses is devoted, in the student high traffic routes of the students throughout Mashhad, to transfer the students to the faculty and vice versa. The services during week (except holidays) and during the term commute almost every hour in these routes. Students' reception of these services is noticeable. 
Doctor Sheykholeslami (Department of Law), Doctor Modirshanehchi (Department of Political Science) and Doctor Mohammad Javad Kamali (Founder of the French Department) are the most famous professors of this faculty. 
There are 26000 books in Law, Political Sciences, English and French. 18000 of them are in Persian and 8000 are in English and French. This library is also the member of 15 scientific journals. In this library there are CD bank, educational video cassettes and two studying hall for male and female students. 
The library of Para Medical Faculty was established in 2003 in a limited space with about 60 volumes of book n the location of the faculty. Now, sum of the references  include about 5270 Persian and Latin books which are classified with congress library method and also has 240 Persian and Latin magazines. The present area of the faculty's library is 110 square meters, includes store and male and female studying halls. 
In the faculty site with the address of http://pmd.mshdiau.ac.ir, the latest news and information about the educational departments of the faculty are accessible by the students and professors and become update regularly. 
In the main page of the site, information of the educational departments, faculty member, regulations, conferences and gatherings, educational calendar, introduction of the faculty, facilities and officials of  Para Medical Faculty are in access of public. 
Student Association of IAUM (Islamic Azad University of Mashhad) which called "IAUMg", Dependent on KAVA Academic Center, has begun its activity since summer 2009. IAUMg has been approved by IAUM Public relations (iaumnews.ir) and Cultural Deputy of University (License Number: 31395/d). 
The National Federation for Just Communities is a coalition of social justice member organizations across the United States which work to overcome racism, bias, and discrimination. The coalition of was formed in 2006 after the dissolution of the National Conference for Community and Justice. Members meet annually at a conference hosted by one of NFJC's affiliate offices. 
The Grand Central Hotel was an early hotel establishment formerly located at 14th and Farnam Streets in downtown Omaha, Nebraska. The Grand Central was built as Omaha's premier lodging after the Herndon House became the Union Pacific Headquarters. 
Shaun David Barker is an Australian-born talent manager, marketing executive and executive music producer. He manages and markets Australian DJs including Timmy Trumpet, Stafford Brothers and tyDi, who have all been voted the  number 1 DJs in Australia at the ITM Awards. 
In 2012, he appeared as himself in Season Two of the FOX8 reality TV series The Stafford Brothers. Barker is currently the Creative Director at TPH Media in Los Angeles and is involved in the development and production of feature films based around music content. 
Barker was born in Brisbane, Australia, to parents David Barker, a musician and scientist, and Leanne Barker. 
Barker served as head of production for a series of albums, mix compilations and singles under the GeneratioNext banner from 2007 to 2010. 
Barker is the only music manager to have three DJs named the number 1 DJ in Australia, six times in total. 
Barker managed the marketing campaigns for singles featuring artists including Stafford Brothers, Lil Wayne, Christina Milian, T.I., Eva Simons, Timmy Trumpet, Savage, Lil Jon, Erick Morillo, Nadia Ali, and Carnage.[unreliable source?] 
In 2012 and 2013, Barker was a guest speaker and panelist at EMC (Electronic Music Conference) on the subject of brand marketing in music. 
St. Francis Prep has a rivalry with Holy Cross High School, fueled particularly by their football teams. Known as the "Battle of the Boulevard" due to the two schools being located only 2 miles apart on Francis Lewis Boulevard, the rivalry between the Prep Terriers and the Holy Cross Knights has been called "arguably the greatest rivalry in New York City football." 
Leopold III of Belgium and his family were held in Castle Hirschstein from June 1944 to March 1945 by the Nazis. 
Upon his retirement as a player, he became coach of  Florissant Valley Community College.  In 1967, St. Louis University hired him away from Florissant.  In his first year with the Billikens, Keough took his team to an NCAA co-championship.  He then took his team to four additional championships during his tenure (1969, 1970, 1972, and 1973). When he retired from coaching in 1982, he had compiled a 213-50-23 record with SLU. 
Keough was featured in the 2009 soccer documentary A Time for Champions discussing the U.S. upset victory over England in the 1950 World Cup and his coaching career at St. Louis University. 
Mantua Metal Products was a Woodbury Heights, New Jersey, metalworks business founded in 1926 by John Tyler and family. In the 1930s Mantua began to manufacture HO scale model trains of die-cast metal and became a leading hobbyist brand. 
In the late 1980s and early 90s, Tyco expanded and diversified by acquiring several popular toy companies. In 1989, the company purchased the View-Master/Ideal Group, which brought to the company the View-Master, Magna Doodle and the Ideal Nursery line of dolls. In 1992, Tyco purchased the Illco Toy Company, bringing Illco's extensive line of toys based on the children's show Sesame Street to Tyco. It purchased Matchbox, a maker of model cars, in 1993. 
In 1984 Tyco produced its own interlocking brick product, "Super Blocks". Super Blocks were compatible with LEGO, and were made following the basic LEGO patent's expiry in 1978. LEGO attempted to halt the production of Super Blocks in a lawsuit, which was later won by Tyco in 1987. 
Tyco's musical toys of the late 1980s and early 1990s included the Tyco Hot Lixx and Tyco Hot Keyz, an electronic guitar and keytar respectively. 
In the 1990s, the company also branched out with other toys such as airplanes. It made a hit in 1991 with their Disney's Little Mermaid dolls that were released in conjunction with the movie. 
Tyco's Sesame Street line increased dramatically in popularity in 1996, when the plush doll Tickle Me Elmo became the most sought-after toy of the Christmas season. 
When Tyco was purchased by Mattel on March 27, 1997, it was the third-largest toy company in the United States. The brand survived into the 2000s and beyond as the Mattel Tyco R/C division, while much of the Sesame Street line, Magna Doodle, and the View-Master were transferred to the Fisher-Price division. On February 23, 2019, Terry Flynn announced that Tyco was now a registered trademark of his Harden Creek Slot Cars, LLC. 
Let Me Explain Something to You About Art is a studio album by composer and producer Kramer, released in 1998 by Tzadik Records. 
 Barry Joseph O'Driscoll (born 18 September 1943) is an Irish doctor and former rugby union international. He came from a rugby family - his brother John, cousin Frank and Frank's son Brian also all played rugby union for Ireland. 
This biographical article relating to Irish Rugby Union is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This Chromadorea nematode (or roundworm-) related article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Anne Elizabeth Burr, later Anne Burr McDermott (June 10, 1918 - February 1, 2003), was an American actress, known especially for her work on stage and in radio. 
Burr was born at Emerson Hospital in Boston, the daughter of Eugene Palmer Burr, a manager of a rooming company, and Helen Isabel Cummings. Her parents resided in Weymouth, Massachusetts at the time. Shortly after her birth, Burr's parents moved to Manhattan, where they resided on Riverside Drive. By 1930, her family had moved to Columbus, Ohio, her father's home-state. Burr had one younger brother, Charles Edward Burr (born in 1920 and died in 1938).  
Burr made her theatrical debut in summer stock before turning to Broadway, making her debut there in Native Son in 1941. She went on to appear in numerous Broadway productions through the 1940s, including Detective Story and The Hasty Heart.  
On television, Burr was an original cast member on the soap operas The Greatest Gift, where she played Dr. Eve Allen, one of the first female television doctors, and As the World Turns, where she originated the role of Claire English Lowell, a role she played from 1956 to 1959. Burr also had roles on The Philco Television Playhouse, Studio One, and Suspense. 
Burr was briefly blacklisted during the Red Scare, but was nevertheless able to return to television soon thereafter.  
In 1959, following her departure from As the World Turns, she moved to Los Angeles and retired from acting. 
Twice married, her first husband was Walter Darwin Coy (January 31, 1909 - December 11, 1974), who she married on March 26, 1942 in Manhattan. On June 21, 1953, she married her second husband Tom McDermott, a principal in Four Star Television, in Old Lyme, Connecticut.   
Burr died in Old Lyme, Connecticut, of respiratory failure; her husband had predeceased her in 1990. At the time of her death, she was survived by her three children from her second marriage, Maggie, Burr, and Michael, as well as five grandchildren. 
This article about an American theatre actor born in the 1920s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Rocky Hill Country Day School is an independent, coeducational, college preparatory day school located on 84 acres along the Potowomut River and Narragansett Bay in Warwick, Rhode Island. It educates in grades nursery through grade 12. 
In 2001, the first laptop classroom was implemented and a student laptop program was later launched in 2004. 
The Rocky Hill Country Day School Model encourages all students to articulate and champion their own ideas to strive towards intellectual independence and a lifetime of learning. Through integrating technology in the classroom, outside learning and the implementation of the Harkness methodology (Grades 6-12) where students and teachers sit at a round table encouraging discussions and involvement. 
The E401 was available as a resin model from "Q Kits", but this company is no longer trading as the owner has retired. 
"Unfold" is a song by American record producer Porter Robinson and British singer-songwriter and producer Totally Enormous Extinct Dinosaurs. It is the sixth and final single from Robinson's second album Nurture, released on April 22, 2021, one day before the rest of the album. This song is the only listed collaboration on Nurture[a] and Robinson has stated that this was a contributing factor in making the song a callback to his first album Worlds (2014). 
Pitchfork's Colin Joyce labelled "Unfold" as "blissed-out digital shoegaze", whilst Sophie Walker of The Line of Best Fit wrote that the track "[felt] somewhat anticlimactic thirteen tracks deep [into Nurture]." 
Calling it "soaring, cheery, and blissful", Magnetic Mag's Ryan Middleton stated that "Unfold" was the album's "crown jewel". Middleton favourably compared it to Robinson's two previous collaborations, "Easy" (with Mat Zo) and "Shelter" (with Madeon). 
Triple J writer Sose Fuamoli thought "the team up [of Robinson and Higginbottom] [had given] way to punching beats, emphatic drum patterns and vocals that only grow stronger with their persistent energy." 
The lyric video for "Unfold" was released on YouTube on May 19, 2021. The video was made by Eric Ko with creative direction by Robinson and Samuel Burgess-Johnson, who has collaborated with Robinson on other music videos. The video prominently features the lyrics alongside the chords, similar to a lead sheet, and the beginning of the video features fretboard diagrams of the same chords preceded by the words "chords (capo on 3rd fret)". 
Bangladesh Bar Council is a statutory autonomous body in Bangladesh, established under the Legal Practitioners and the Bar Council Order. It is the licensing and regulatory body for lawyers in Bangladesh. 
The bar council can establish tribunals to investigate and prosecute complaints against lawyers.  In 2019 there were five such tribunals. A tribunal may reprimand or suspend a lawyer or remove them from practice.  It dealt with 378 complaints from 2014 to 2018.  Nine lawyers have lost their license permanently and 6 were suspended for a limited period of time. 
The council was established in 1972 through the Legal Practitioners and the Bar Council Order. It has 15 members including the Attorney General of Bangladesh. It publishes a legal journal called Bangladesh Legal Decisions. Members are elected to the council. 
Coleophora saturatella is a moth of the family Coleophoridae. It is found from Sweden to the Pyrenees, the Alps and Albania and from Great Britain to Romania. It has also been recorded from southern Russia. 
This article on a moth of the family Coleophoridae is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The studio album was released on February 21, 2020, through 1111klubb and distributed by Universal Music. The title of the album is explained as a monostich poem by Cezinando. At the Norwegian radioshow, Nitimen, on NRK Cezinando explained when that the poem was something that got "stuck to his head" when he and Ole Torjus Hofvind was out for a walk after a long studio session. 
The Willard-Fisk House is a historic farm property at 126 Whitney Street in Holden, Massachusetts.  The farmhouse, built about 1772, is one of the oldest houses in Holden, and one of its oldest brick houses.  The property also includes a 19th-century barn and several 20th-century farm outbuildings.  The property was listed on the National Register of Historic Places in 1996, where it is listed at 121 Whitney Street. 
Rise heart; thy Lord is risen. Sing his praise without delayes, Who takes thee by the hand, that thou likewise with him may'st rise; That, as his death calcined thee to dust, His life may make thee gold, and much more, just. 
Awake, my lute, and struggle for thy part with all thy art. The crosse taught all wood to resound his name, who bore the same. His stretched sinews taught all strings, what key Is the best to celebrate this most high day. 
Consort both heart and lute, and twist a song pleasant and long; Or since all musick is but three parts vied and multiplied. O let thy blessed Spirit bear a part, And make up our defects with his sweet art. 
I got me flowers to strew thy way; I got me boughs off many a tree: But thou wast up by break of day, And brought'st thy sweets along with thee. 
The Sunne arising in the East. Though he give light, and th'East perfume; If they should offer to contest With thy arising, they presume. 
Can there be any day but this, Though many sunnes to shine endeavour? We count three hundred, but we misse: There is but one, and that one ever. 
Love bade me welcome: yet my soul drew back. Guiltie of dust and sinne. But quick-ey'd Love, observing me grow slack From my first entrance in, Drew nearer to me, sweetly questioning If I lack'd anything. 
A guest, I answer'd, worthy to be here: Love said, You shall be he. I the unkinde, ungrateful? Ah, my deare, I cannot look on thee. Love took my hand, and smiling did reply, Who made the eyes but I? 
Truth Lord, but I have marr'd them: let my shame Go where it doth deserve. And know you not, sayes Love, who bore the blame? My deare, then I will serve. You must sit down, sayes Love, and taste my meat: So I did sit and eat. 
Come, my Way, my Truth, my Life: Such a Way, as gives us breath: Such a Truth, as ends all strife: Such a Life, as killeth death. 
Come, my Light, my Feast, my Strength: Such a Light, as shows a feast: Such a Feast, as mends in length: Such a Strength, as makes his guest. 
Come, my Joy, my Love, my Heart: Such a Joy, as none can move: Such a Love, as none can part: Such a Heart, as joyes in love. 
Let all the world in ev'ry corner sing: My God and King. The heavens are not too high, His praise may thither flie; The earth is not too low, His praises there may grow. 
Let all the world in ev'ry corner sing: My God and King. The Church with psalms must shout, No doore can keep them out; But above all, the heart Must bear the longest part. 
Pseudozarba is a genus of moths in the subfamily Eustrotiinae of the family Noctuidae. The genus was described by Warren in 1913. 
Smerinthus minor, the lesser eyed hawkmoth, is a moth of the family Sphingidae. It was described by Rudolf Mell in 1937. It is a montane species found from the Taibai Shan area, western Qinling Mountains in Shaanxi, China eastwards along the Qinling to southern Shanxi and then north to just west of Beijing. It has also been recorded from the Miaofeng Mountains near Beijing and the Wuling Mountains in Hunan. 
Maier was born into a Jewish family in Manhattan, the son of Julius Maier and Lydia B. Maier. All four of his grandparents emigrated from Germany. He attended Columbia Law School and was an editor on the  Columbia Law Review. 
He died at age 33 after suffering from an illness for two months. Maier was inducted into the ACBL Hall of Fame in 2004. 
There are three main Ogiek varieties that have been documented, though there are several dozen named local Ogiek groups:  
As formulated by Noam Chomsky, accounting for this gap between knowledge and experience is "Plato's Problem". The phrase has a specific linguistic context with regard to language acquisition but can also be used more generally. 
Plato's early philosophical endeavors involved poetry discussing many ideas, such as the differences between knowledge and opinion, particulars and universals, and God and man. These early dialogues do not utilize conventional notions of reason. Rather, they appeal to the emotions, the allegorical, the spiritual, and the mythological interests of an ancient speculative mind. 
Some of Plato's famous works are Phaedo, the Crito, and, as noted earlier, the Meno. Within these works are found a comprehensive philosophy that addresses epistemology, metaphysics, ethics, aesthetics, theology, and logic. As noted, most of the writing is in the form of dialogues and arguments to pursue answers to difficult questions and concepts. Plato's teacher and mentor, Socrates, always plays a significant and formative role in these dialogues. 
If someone disagreed with him, Socrates would execute this process in order to bring about his interlocutor's reluctant admission of inconsistencies and contradictions. Either Socrates would ask his debators questions about their claims that would lead them to admit their fallacy or Socrates would answer questions by posing questions meant to lead the other to answer their own query. 
This is derived from Socrates' belief that one's soul existed in past lives and knowledge is transferred from those lives to the current one. "These [ideas] were revealed in a former state of existence, and are recovered by reminiscence (anamnesis) or association from sensible things" . The claim is that one does not need to know what knowledge is before gaining knowledge, but rather one has a wealth of knowledge before ever gaining any experience. 
There are several concepts important to the Chomskyan (or generativist) approach to linguistics. The most fundamental of these ideas is the theory of universal grammar (UG). Simply put, and as implied by the name, UG refers to those grammatical properties thought to be shared by all (to be universal to all) derivations of human language (anything from Amharic to Zhuang). 
Several questions (or problems) motivate linguistic theorizing and investigation. Two such taken up in Chomskyan linguistics are the process of language acquisition in children, and "Plato's Problem". These subjects are interrelated and viewed as evidence in support of the theory of UG. 
The hypothetical question posed addresses a common misconception about what is instantiated in the mind/brain of an individual when it comes to language. It does not address the "logical problem" of language acquisition, i.e., how children transition from ostensibly having no knowledge of language to having full knowledge, in what may be described as a very limited time with apparently limited input. 
Plato's Problem particularly refers to a point in the dialogue when Socrates is talking with an uneducated servant and shows, through this interaction, that the servant knows the Pythagorean Theorem though he has never been explicitly taught any geometry. How does the servant know without having ever been taught? Plato's suggestion is, essentially, that people have innate knowledge. 
From this, the child might determine that the word that is optional and from this analogize to the following examples: 
Clearly, the second example is not a grammatically well-formed sentence in English. A child knows this and does not form sentences such as the one marked by the asterisk. How does the child know, without being explicitly taught, that the ungrammatical example is, in fact, ungrammatical? From the linguistic perspective being described here, the answer to this question is that such knowledge pre-exists as part of UG. 
There have been studies of perception and attention that support the idea that there is an abundance of knowledge available to an individual at any given moment (Blake & Sekuler, 2006). 
A key ingredient to the beginning stages of perception requires the attention of the observer on some focal point or stimulus. There is a presupposition that if one visually perceives an object, one knows that one is seeing it (excluding the exception of perceptual illusions). Whatever sensory stimuli are attended to can be declared knowledge. 
Various implications arise from the research and theorizing on Plato's philosophy, linguistics, perception, and cognitive structures. Debates over epistemology have been around since antiquity. In historical philosophy, the debate has been between rationalism and empiricism. In contemporary psychology, the debate is between biology (nature) and environment (nurture). 
In contemporary philosophical, linguistic, and psychological circles, it is rare to maintain an unwavering stance on either of these extremes; most fall toward the middle. The ideas of "nature and nurture" or "innateness and environmental input" are no longer perceived as mutually exclusive. Instead, researchers point to a necessarily interactive relationship in order for thought and behavior to occur[citation needed]. 
All of these ideas speak to the crux of Plato's Problem, which is how to account for the gap between knowledge and limited experience. For some scientific and philosophical disciplines, the answer to this conundrum is innateness, or biological pre-wiring. Innate knowledge is what bridges the gap between the limited information one gleans from the environment (poverty of the stimulus) and one's actual knowledge. 
In 1883 Zeitlin left Russia and settled in Dresden, where he collected a large library, which he placed at the disposal of Talmudic students. 
In the beginning of 1887 he undertook a journey to the Holy Land, where he celebrated the Passover. He visited Jerusalem and Hebron, and took great interest in the Jewish antiquities, as well as in the agricultural colonies of Palestine, to which he bequeathed 50,000 francs, in addition to many bequests to educational institutions. 
Frankie Howerd Strikes Again is a British comedy television series which originally aired on ITV in 1981. It was a sketch show produced by Yorkshire Television, in the style of Howerd's earlier series. 
As well as Howerd, other performers who appeared in the series included Henry McGee, Neil Innes, Linda Cunningham, Jeanne Mockford, Norman Chappell, Claire Davenport, Ronnie Brody, Hilda Fenemore and Anneka Rice. 
 Sibusiso Vilane (born 5 December 1970, Shongwe Mission in Mpumalanga) is a South African adventurer and motivational speaker and the author of the book To the Top from Nowhere. An adventurer, marathon runner and mountaineer and expedition leader, he has also served as the Chief Scout of Scouts South Africa. 
Vilane started climbing in 1996 by summitting peaks in the Drakensberg. In 1999, he summitted Mount Kilimanjaro and went on to the Himalayas in 2002, successfully climbing Pokalde, Lobuche and Island Peak, all of which are over 6,000 metres high, as part of his training for the Mount Everest expedition. 
In March 2003, Vilane set off for the Himalayas again in his quest to be the first Black African to summit earth's highest mountain, Everest. He summitted successfully on 26 May 2003 from the South Side. 
On that day, South African President Thabo Mbeki congratulated him on his achievement. "In this, he has shown the heights we can all scale in life if we put our shoulder to the wheel and work at things without flagging. Sibusiso, you have done us proud!" In 2006, Vilane was awarded the Order of Ikhamanga (Bronze) by President Mbeki.  
Since this climb, Vilane has completed all Seven Summits. In late 2007 Vilane and fellow mountaineer, Alex Harris, embarked on an unsupported and unassisted trek to reach the South Pole which, when they completed the expedition on 17 January 2008, made Vilane and Harris the first South Africans to walk to the South Pole and Vilane the black person to do so. 
Vilane arrived at the geographic North Pole on 12 April 2012. This is the final hurdle to becoming the first black person to complete the Three Poles Challenge. This expedition was dubbed The Goliath Challenge and sponsored by Virgin Money Insurance. In completion of the Three Poles Challenge and the Seven Summits, Vilane has also become the first African to have accomplished Explorers Grand Slam, an elite title earned only by a handful around the world.[citation needed] 
"The future entirely depends on the education of children, their access to information to broaden their thinking and understanding of the ever-changing and challenging world" says Vilane. 
Vilane is also a patron of the Global Offering (GO) projects and is an eco ambassador for Indalo Yethu, a government organisation which strives to raise awareness about the environment. 
In December 2013, he was appointed Chief Scout of Scouts South Africa, a position he held until 2017. 
On Thursday December 2011, Vilane was introduced to the Queen of the United Kingdom at a reception at Buckingham Palace. The reception was held to acknowledge those involved in mountaineering, adventurer and exploration. Also present was Sir Ranulph Fiennes, a friend of Vilane. 
During July 2016, Sibusiso Vilane was the expedition lead, guiding a party of 40 climbers to the summit of Kilimanjaro. During the summit attempt a well known South African race and rally driver, Gugu Zulu, succumbed prior to reaching the summit due to unspecified illness.  
"I asked him how he was, he said, 'I'm ok... I suspect there is some flu creeping in'." With tears rolling down his face, Vilane said he did not see any signs of an illness. "For me he was still cheerful." 
Kieran McGuinness (born 8 July 1983) is an Australian rules footballer who formerly played with the Western Bulldogs in the Australian Football League (AFL). 
He was picked in the 2001 AFL Draft at pick 42.  He made a sensational debut in his first year, kicking four goals against Essendon, but had limited opportunities from then on, playing 23 senior games to the end of the 2005 season. He played in the Victorian Football League (VFL) grand final in 2005 for the Bulldogs VFL-affiliate Werribee. He was delisted at the end of 2006. 
McGuinness returned to Victoria in 2015, and joined the Northern Blues in the VFL. He spent two seasons with the Blues as a player and development coach, retiring at the end of 2016 after suffering cracked vertebrae in his neck in an onfield incident. 
Gandhera is a town and union council of Charsadda District in Khyber Pakhtunkhwa province of Pakistan. 
This article related to a constituency in Punjab, Pakistan is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Gamage Haththotuwa Weerasumana Weerasinghe (born 17 November 1975) is a Sri Lankan politician, former provincial minister and Member of Parliament. 
Weerasinghe was born on 17 November 1975. He was educated at St. Thomas' College, Matara. He is a member of the Communist Party of Sri Lanka. 
Weerasinghe  was a member of Kotagala Divisional Council and the Southern Provincial Council where he held a provincial ministerial portfolio. He was dismissed from his ministerial position in September 2017 for voting against the proposed 20th amendment to the Constitution of Sri Lanka. He contested the 2020 parliamentary election as a Sri Lanka People's Freedom Alliance electoral alliance candidate in Monaragala District and was elected to the Parliament of Sri Lanka. 
David George Hitlin (born 15 April 1942) is a particle physicist at the California Institute of Technology. 
Gules, 2 fesses embattled counterembattled argent, overall on a canton Gules, 3 pales vair and a chief Or. (Baives and Willies use the same arms.) 
Ataun is a town located at the foot of the Aralar Range in the Goierri region of the province of Gipuzkoa, in the autonomous community of the Basque Country, in the north of Spain. The town consists of three major parishes - San Martin, San Gregorio and Aia - along with several other minor boroughs. 
This article about a location in the Basque Country, Spain, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Today most of these coins are extremely common finds, with a few scarcer examples including Aemilianus, Marcus Aurelius Marius, Quietus, and Regalianus.  
Nicholas Jesse Kaczur (born July 28, 1979) is a former American football offensive tackle. He was drafted by the New England Patriots in the third round of the 2005 NFL Draft. He played college football at Toledo. 
While attending Brantford Collegiate Institute in Brantford, Ontario, Kaczur was rated as the best prep lineman in Ontario, was voted his school's Lineman of the Year four times, and was his team's Offensive MVP in his junior and senior years. He also played for the Brantford Bisons of the Ontario Varsity Football League. 
After suffering a back injury early in the Patriots' 2010 training camp, Kaczur missed all the preseason and was inactive for the first four games of the season before being placed on injured reserve on October 12, 2010. 
The Arms Act, 1959 is an Act of the Parliament of India to consolidate and amend the law relating to arms and ammunition in order to curb illegal weapons and violence stemming from them. It replaced the Indian Arms Act, 1878. 
The Act has undergone many changes since 1959, the most recent being in 2010 through an amendment for the Arms Act. There was also controversy around air guns to be included as part of this act which was rejected by the Supreme Court of India. 
The Indian Arms Act, 1878 was an act regulating the manufacture, sale, possession, and carry of firearms. 
Prior to the Indian Mutiny of 1857 (these days referred to in India as the First War of Independence), there were few gun control laws in India. 
The act included the mandatory licensing to carry a weapon, but contained exclusions for some groups and persons, for instance "all persons of Kodava (Coorg) race". 
In The New Cambridge History of India: Science, Technology and Medicine in Colonial India, scholar David Arnold examines the effect of the British Raj on Indian weapons, mining and metallurgy: 
Breidholt - Elisa Groa  Capital Region - Maria Bjork  Northern Lights - Inga Maria  Reykjavik - Kolbrun Ragnarsdottir  West Reykjavik - Sunneva Fjolnisdottir  
Akranes - Sigrun Armannsdottir  Grafarvogur - Bertha Waagfjord  Akureyri - Soley Gudmarsdottir  North Reykjavik - Olafia Osk  Westman Islands - Thoranna Throrarinsdottir  
Gianair is a Ghanaian airline with its head office in Accra, Ghana, and its main base at Kotoka International Airport in Accra. 
Gianair was incorporated on 29 May 2009 and commenced flight operations in April 2010. The airline specialises in executive and private charter, emergency medical rescue and ad hoc cargo operations.  
  The 1998 Chamba massacre was the killing of thirty-five Hindus by Hizbul Mujahideen, in the Chamba district of Himachal Pradesh in India on 3 August 1998. 
Since 1989, an Islamic militant Insurgency in Jammu and Kashmir had gripped the  state of Jammu and Kashmir. 
Top Hizbul Mujahideen terrorists Billu Gujjar was arrested in Pathankot by Punjab Police a few days later in connection with this attack. 
This biographical article related to a football midfielder from Ecuador is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Pekka Juhani Korvenheimo (born 17 January 1941, in Helsinki) is a Finnish diplomat, a master of political science . 
In addition, Korvenheimo was a Social Democratic student leader during his studies and the first president of the United Nations Student Association. He has been involved in the Social Democratic Party since the late 1950s. Korvenheimo was nominated as a party secretary in 1969, but Jukka Seppinen claims in his book Kalevi Sorsa, SDP:n vallan vakauttaja   (2008),   that the Soviet Union stamped Korvenheimo was  right winger and was blocking his selection. 
In the field of video production, where it is often called a back focus chart, the Siemens star is widely used to adjust the back focus of removable lenses. It is also used during film or video shoots to help setting the focus in special situations. 
Siemens stars are similar to the sunburst pattern used as a background in graphic design, as in the Japanese Naval Ensign, Russian Air Force flag and Jordanian Royal Standard. They are useful in drawing the eye to a point on the page. 
The star was developed by Siemens & Halske AG (today Siemens) in the 1930s to test the lenses of Siemens narrow-film cameras. 
He joined the Communist Party of Yugoslavia (CPY) and after the Bulgarian fascist occupation he took part in the preparations for the armed resistance in Prilep. He was jailed and after a long interrogation he was interned in Bulgaria. In the spring of 1943 he returned to Macedonia, and in the autumn of the same year he joined the armed partisan forces in Debarca. 
He was buried with high state honors in the Alley for Distinguished Citizens in the Butel cemetery in Skopje. 
Conrad Orzel (born July 11, 2000) is a Canadian figure skater. He is the 2019 Bavarian Open silver medalist, a two-time medalist on the ISU Junior Grand Prix series, and the 2017 Canadian national junior silver medalist. He placed 13th at the 2017 and 2018 World Junior Championships. 
Orzel was born on July 11, 2000, in Toronto, Ontario, Canada. He is of Polish ancestry, and speaks English, French, and Polish. He has two  younger sisters, one named Amelia, who is a ladies figure skater. 
Orzel began learning to skate in 2003. Eva Najarro became his coach when he was five years old. He trained at the York Region Skating Academy in Richmond Hill, Ontario until 2018, and also worked with Joanne McLeod in Vancouver, British Columbia. 
Orzel sustained a torn ligament in his left leg and an avulsion fracture before the Skate Canada Challenge in December 2014. The following month, he won bronze in the novice men's event at the 2015 Canadian Championships. 
Competing on the junior level, Orzel ranked fourth in the short program, sixth in the free skate, and fifth overall at the 2016 Canadian Championships. During the free skate, he hit his head on the ice after attempting a triple Axel jump. He continued with his program and was examined afterward by a medical team, which found no concussion. Making his international debut, he won the junior bronze medal at the Coupe du Printemps in March 2016. 
Orzel placed seventh at his first Junior Grand Prix assignment in Linz, Austria.  In his second even in Poland, he won the bronze medal.  Orzel moved to the senior level domestically, placing eleventh at the 2018 national championships.  He ended the season at the 2018 World Junior Championships, where he placed thirteenth again. 
Orzel decided to leave his longtime coach Eva Najarro, transferring to the Toronto Cricket, Skating & Curling Club under the tutelage of Lee Barkell.  He was again named to Skate Canada's NextGen team. Orzel placed fourth at both of his JGP assignments, coming only 0.01 points away from a bronze medal at 2018 JGP Slovenia after setting new personal bests in both the free skate and in total score. 
At the 2019 Canadian Championships, Orzel placed fourth in the short program, skating completely cleanly.  He had a difficult free skate, dropping to fifth place overall. Because Orzel finished behind both Stephen Gogolev and Joseph Phan, he was not named to Canada's team for the World Junior Championships. He was instead assigned to the 2019 Bavarian Open, making his senior international debut, where he won the silver medal. 
Orzel moved to compete fully at the senior level, beginning the season at the 2019 CS Autumn Classic International, where he placed sixth.  Making his Grand Prix debut at the 2019 Cup of China, he placed eleventh.  Orzel was twelfth at the 2019 NHK Trophy, and concluded his season with a sixth-place finish at the 2020 Canadian Championships. 
Orzel was assigned to compete at the 2020 Skate Canada International, but the event was cancelled as a result of the coronavirus pandemic. 
With the pandemic continuing to make it difficult to hold in-person events, the 2021 Skate Canada Challenge was held virtually, and Orzel placed fifth at the event, notably placing third in the short program and landing two quadruple jumps. The 2021 Canadian Championships were subsequently cancelled. 
Eagle Stadium is a football stadium in Allen, Texas. It is owned and operated by the Allen Independent School District and is home of the Allen High School Eagles. 
Eagle Stadium is notable (and controversial) for its size (it has a capacity of 18,000 spectators, the fifth largest high school stadium in Texas, and the largest which serves as home field for only one high school) and its cost of completion (just under US$60 million).  The 18,000 seats include 9,000 home-side seats (including 1,000 reserved for the Allen Escadrille), 4,000 end-zone seats for students and general admission (located in the north end zone), and 5,000 visitor-side seats. 
Beneath the grandstand there are spaces for wrestling, a golf simulator practice area, and a weight room. 
The final Texas vs The Nation college football all-star bowl game was held at Eagle Stadium in February, 2013. 
Repairs costing more than $10 million were made at the expense of the builder and architect, and the stadium was officially reopened on June 5, 2015, for graduation. 
2. Allen was unable to play any games in the stadium during the 2014 season due to repairs. Allen reached an agreement with neighboring Plano ISD to play 3 "home games" using 2 of Plano's Stadiums. As a part of the agreement Allen hosted 8 home games (as opposed to the normal 5 home games) in the 2015 season. 
7. A regular season home game against Tyler Legacy High School was canceled after players tested positive for COVID-19. 
The first station at Barrow was opened in 1840 by the Midland Counties Railway, which shortly joined the North Midland Railway and the Birmingham and Derby Junction Railway to form the Midland Railway. 
It was originally known simply as Barrow, but became Barrow-upon-Soar in 1871. When Quorn and Woodhouse was opened by the rival Great Central Railway on the opposite (western) side of Quorn, it became Barrow-upon-Soar and Quorn in 1899. Neither station, in fact, was ideally located for Quorn being about equidistant from its centre. 
Barrow was the only station on the line to retain much of its original MCR architecture. However it was completely demolished following its closure in 1968. 
A new station was opened a little to the southeast of the original site on 27 May 1994 as part of phase one of the Ivanhoe Line. 
In August 2016, a road bridge by the station partially collapsed during maintenance work, severely disrupting train services. 
The station is unstaffed and facilities are limited although there is a self-service ticket machine for ticket purchases as well as shelters and modern help points on both platforms. Bicycle storage is also available at the station. 
All services at Barrow-upon-Soar are operated by East Midlands Railway using Class 153, 156 and 158 DMUs. 
Sanjay Subrahmanyam (born 21 May 1961) is a historian who specialises in the early modern period and in Connected History. He is the author of several books and publications. He holds the Irving and Jean Stone Endowed Chair in Social Sciences at UCLA which he joined in 2004. 
In 2012, Subrahmanyam was awarded the first Infosys Prize in Humanities, for his 'path-breaking contribution to history'. He also served as a Humanities jury member for the prize from 2019. 
In February 2019, Sanjay Subrahmanyam was awarded the Dan David Prize for History (jointly with Kenneth Pomeranz, Chicago). 
Oligocarpus calendulaceus  is a plant in the Asteraceae family. It was first described as Osteospermum calendulaceum in 1782 by Carl Linnaeus the Younger. In 1832, Christian Friedrich Lessing assigned it to the genus Oligocarpus in his Synopsis Generum Compositarum. (This is the name accepted by the Australian Plant Name Index, but Plants of the World Online accepts Osteospermum calendulaceum.) 
In South Africa, it is native to the Cape Provinces, Free State, KwaZulu-Natal, Lesotho, Northern Provinces, and Swaziland. It has been introduced into Hawaii, and Australia, where it is found in South Australia and Western Australia.  In Australia, it is an agricultural weed, and found mainly in arid areas on lagoon shores, and on plains. 
After World War II, Lokvenc tied for 2nd-3rd in Vienna in 1947. In 1951, he tied for 7-8th in Marienbad (zt). In 1951/52, he tied for 2nd-4th in Vienna. He shared 1st in 1951 and won in 1953 the Austrian Championship. In 1954, he tied for 9-10th in Munich. 
Lokvenc played for Austria in nine Chess Olympiads: 1927, 1928, 1930, 1952, 1954, 1956, 1958, 1960, and 1962. 
Group 1 of UEFA Euro 1988 contained West Germany, Italy, Spain, and Denmark. Matches were played from 10 to 17 June 1988. 
Linesmen: Renzo Peduzzi (Switzerland) Philippe Mercier (Switzerland) Reserve referee: Karl-Josef Assenmacher (West Germany) 
Reewa Rathod is a singer, songwriter, pianist, and performing artist. She is best known for her songs Maula (One Above) and Saaya Tere Ishq Ka. She won the Mirchi Music Award for Best Independent Song of The Year 2019 for her debut single Maula (One Above) 2018. 
Reewa Rathod was born in Mumbai to singers Roop Kumar Rathod and Sunali Rathod. At the age of four, she sang the Meera bhajan Payoji Maine Ram Ratan Dhan Payo at the Tejpal Hall in Mumbai. Her grandfather, the Late Pandit Chaturbhuj Rathod, was a well known Dhrupad Dhamar vocalist of the Aditya Gharana of Jamnagar. Her paternal uncles Shravan Rathod and Vinod Rathod are well-known music composers and singers in the Indian film industry.[citation needed] 
Reewa's first public performance was at the at age of 4 years at Tejpal Auditorium Mumbai for her Grandfather Late Pandit Chaturbhuj Rathod's 1st Death Anniversary. Her first public performance as an artist came as the opening act for a Bryan Adams concert in 2011 in Pune, where she sang "Crossing Limits", a self-penned song. 
She performed at the Doon School's Rose Bowl in 2012 and Saptrang in 2014. She was awarded Sur Jytosna National Music Award. 
She composed and recorded Tandaana for the Spanish film Rastres De Sandal (Traces of Sandalwood) starring Nandita Das and Aina Clotet. 
"Saanwal", the first track of her project "Travel with Masters" was released on 17 January 2019, produced by Ustad Zakir Hussain and Michael Mennart, featuring saxophonist Chris Potter. The song blended Indian Folk and Spanish sound together. 
In 2020 she released her debut album Saaya Tere Ishq Ka which was composed by Reewa with lyrics by Gulzar. The title track "Maula (One Above)" was mixed and mastered by Brian Malouf. 
Reewa has performed "Jasmine Flower" in Chinese, for Yue-sai Kan's live-streaming charity fashion gala 2020, alongside Kenny G, Lang Lang and three other prominent artists in the UK, Norway and France. 
"Reewa is one of my brightest and youngest composers and I was glad to work on her debut single" - Gulzar - BUSINESS STANDARD 
After her first single "Maula" in 2018 and "Saanwal" (with Zakir Hussain) in 2019, the young singer and composer is now coming up with her first solo album titled "Saaya Tere Ishq Ka" - HI INDIA  
The Play-offs of the 2015 Fed Cup Americas Zone Group II were the final stages of the Group II Zonal Competition involving teams from the Americas. Using the positions determined in their pools, the twelve teams faced off to determine their placing in the 2015 Fed Cup Americas Zone Group II. The top two teams advanced to Group I for the next year. 
The first placed teams of the four pools were drawn in head-to-head rounds. The winners advanced to Group I. 
The second placed teams of the four pools were drawn in head-to-head rounds to find the equal fifth and sixth placed teams, and the equal seventh to eighth placed teams. 
The third placed teams of the four pools were drawn in head-to-head rounds to find the equal ninth and tenth placed teams, and the equal eleventh to twelfth placed teams. 
KWLV (107.1 FM) is a radio station broadcasting a country music format. Licensed to Many, Louisiana, United States, the station serves  Sabine Parish and surrounding areas from a studio located in Many, Louisiana.  The station is currently owned by Baldridge-Dumas Communications, Inc . The station broadcasts using the Westwood One Mainstream Country format. 
Selden died of an illness in at Fort Union, aged 44, on February 2, 1865.  He was first buried at Fort Union, and when that post was closed his grave was moved to Santa Fe National Cemetery.  Fort Selden was named for him soon after his death when that fort was established. 
A cenotaph was also erected in Old Bennington Cemetery, Bennington, Bennington County, Vermont memorializing Col Henry Raymond Selden and his wife when he was a Lieutenant, Mary Alice Selden who died on January 15, 1854, aged 29 years. 
The two books include principles for building well-designed products. His recommendations are based on the needs of the user, leaving aside what he considers secondary issues like aesthetics. The main highlights of these are: 
The goal of the User-Centered design is to make products which have very high usability. This includes how convenient the product is, in terms of its usage, manageability, effectiveness, and how well the product is mapped to the user requirements. Below are the general phases of User-Centered Design process: 
In the next steps, the above procedure is repeated to further finish the product. These phases are general approaches and factors like design goals, team and their timeline, and environment in which the product is developed, determine the appropriate phases for a project and their order. You can either follow a waterfall model, agile model or any other software engineering practice. 
UCD asks questions about users and their tasks and goals, then uses the findings to make decisions about development and design. UCD of a web site, for instance, seeks to answer the following questions: 
As an example of UCD viewpoints, the essential elements of UCD of a website usually are the considerations of visibility, accessibility, legibility and language. 
Visibility helps the user construct a mental model of the document. Models help the user predict the effect(s) of their actions while using the document. Important elements (such as those that aid navigation) should be emphatic. Users should be able to tell from a glance what they can and cannot do with the document. 
Text should be easy to read: Through analysis of the rhetorical situation, the designer should be able to determine a useful font-family and font style. Ornamental fonts, text in all capital letters, large or small body text are all can be hard to read and should be avoided. Text-colouring and bolding can be helpful when used in text-heavy scenarios. High figure-ground contrast between text and background increases legibility. Dark text against a light background is most legible. 
Depending on the rhetorical situation, certain types of languages are needed. Short sentences are helpful, as are well-written texts used in explanations and similar bulk-text situations. Unless the situation calls for it, jargon or heavily technical terms should not be used. Many writers will choose to use the active voice, verbs (instead of noun strings or nominals), and a simple sentence structure. 
There are a number of tools that are used in the analysis of User-Centered Design, mainly: personas, scenarios, and essential use cases. 
During the UCD process, a Persona representing the user may be created. A persona is a user archetype used to help guide decisions about product features, navigation, interactions, and even visual design. In most cases, personas are synthesized from a series of ethnographic interviews with real people, then captured in 1-2 page descriptions that include behavior patterns, goals, skills, attitudes, and environment, with a few fictional personal details to bring the persona to life. 
Personas can also be modified all through the UCD of a product, based on user testing and changing environment. This is not an ideal way to use Personas but should not be a taboo either particularly when it becomes apparent that variables surrounding a product's development have changed since the design started and current persona/s may not cater well to the changed conditions.  
An essential use case is a special kind of use case, also called an abstract use case. Essential use cases describe the essence of the problem, and deals with the nature of the problem itself. While writing essential use cases, no assumptions about unrelated details should be made. In additions, the goals of the subject should be separated from the process and implementation to reach that particular goal. Below is an example of an essential use case with the same goal as the former example. 
"Mount Conness bears the name of a distinguished citizen of California, now a United States Senator, who deserves more than any other person, the credit of carrying the bill, organizing the Geological Survey of California, through the Legislature, and who is chiefly to be credited for another great scientific work, the Survey of the 40th Parallel." 
Clarence King, a geologist for the Survey and the first to ascend Mount Conness along with James T. Gardiner in 1864, wrote: 
The members of the Whitney Survey were naturally[original research?] appreciative of Senator Conness for helping their cause.[citation needed] 
Conness is a training ground for alpine climbing since it utilizes all aspects of mountaineering: trails, scrambling, and glacier trekking; all at a high altitude for California. Usually climbers camp near Tioga Pass and begin the climb at dawn. It takes about a full day to summit. 
The fertile land was once the home of the Yamatji people, who lived a fairly sedentary life and subsisted on fish and water fowl from the river mouth, shell-fish from the coast and game from the hills. They also cultivated ajeca, a yam-like plant on the river flats. 
A popular camping ground was what is now known as "The Bootenal Springs". It is a permanent source of water and became a place of conflict between the Aboriginal people and the first European settlers. Although no evidence of the conflict remains, the site has since been interpreted to remind people of what took place. 
The area was first explored by George Edward Grey in 1839, after which he named the area after Sir George Bellas Greenough, the president of the Royal Geographical Society in London. Grey claimed that the area could become "the granary of Western Australia". 
In 1993, Greenough made national news headlines when a woman and her three young children of this small community were murdered. The killing later featured on the Australian television show Crime Investigation Australia. 
In 2006, floodwaters on the Greenough River undermined and caused the collapse of one of the stone pylons of Maley's bridge in Central Greenough. The bridge, which is both historically significant and important for local vehicular movement, was subsequently restored. 
In 2013, a disastrous fire gutted Maley's mill and store, one of Greenough's more significant heritage buildings. 
Paroled at Appomattox Court-House on April 9, 1865, Davis returned to Mississippi. After the war he resided in Harrison County, his home most of the time being at Biloxi. He died on September 15, 1896, and is buried at Biloxi Cemetery. 
Davis was married in 1848 to Frances H. D. Peyton, and secondly, in 1870, to Margaret C. Green. He had two daughters. 
Reportedly not keen on the Russian drama, Gedeonov (as the head of the Imperial Theatres) did little to foster its development. He strongly supported, though, Italian opera and was instrumental in getting several prominent Italian singers to perform in the Russian capital. 
Vasilisa Melentyeva, the play that Gedeonov wrote later in his life, suffered a  somewhat similar fate. Dissatisfied with his own effort, he passed the text to Alexander Ostrovsky, and the latter used the  plot to write the completely new play of the same title. 
Robin Edmond Scott (born 1 April 1947) is an English singer and founder of a music project he called M. His career encompasses six decades. 
Scott was born in Croydon, Surrey, where he attended Croydon Art College and met Malcolm McLaren in the late 1960s. Scott befriended McLaren and fashion guru Vivienne Westwood with whom he was to collaborate ten  years later. He declined their offer to be involved in SEX, the Chelsea clothes shop which McLaren and Westwood launched, preferring to make his career in music.  
While at college he had displayed a talent for writing topical songs which he performed on radio and television. This led to his debut album, for which he was backed by Mighty Baby. Woman From the Warm Grass was released on a small independent record label called Head Records. 
Scott began performing his own songs and accompanying himself on guitar. He spent a period playing folk music clubs as a solo musician, sharing bills with emerging artists such as David Bowie, John Martyn and Ralph McTell. He also recorded a session for the BBC, one of the tracks from which was included on the CD reissue of the album in 2001. 
In early 1970, Scott conceived a multimedia project, The Voice, which was aired on BBC Radio 3. He left Britain to travel both around Europe and North America. When he returned, he made demos with members of the progressive rock band Camel, songwriter Terry Britten and music publisher Ronnie Scott. In 1972, he won the Search for a Star national talent contest, and was offered a recording contract by EMI, but turned down the deal because the label would not support his backing band. 
In 1973, he performed in bands with Pete Thomas (later of Elvis Costello and the Attractions), and Paul "Bassman" Riley, and also wrote a musical called Heartaches & Teardrops, a play with original songs which has parallels to The Rocky Horror Show, and the True Love and Romance comic strip genre. 
In 1978, Scott worked as producer for Barclay Records in Paris, France where he lived with his girlfriend Brigitte Vinchon (alias Brigit Novik), after producing and filming with director Julien Temple and all female punk quartet The Slits. In 1979 Do It released early recordings by Adam and the Ants. 
While still in Paris he recorded early versions of "Moderne Man" and "Satisfy Your Lust", tracks which would ultimately appear on the first M album.   
The song was a UK Top 40 hit, and then "That's the Way the Money Goes" became another charting hit inside of a year. A 45-minute film incorporating videos and concert performances to date came as a result of a quick globe-trotting world tour in the wake of the hit. 
Subsequently the label and M parted company. At this point some role reversing took place and Scott produced the M single "Danube" for the Stiff label, featuring Brigit Novik on vocals, followed by "The Wedding Dance" presenting Novik as an artist in her own right. 
As a development of the ethnic references on The Official Secrets Act and the Stiff releases, Scott found a new musical direction, producing an EP of African acts in Kenya. This led to the album Jive Shikisha! (credited to Robin Scott & Shikisha), recorded in Kenya and the UK between 1983 and 1984,  with musicians from several different African states. The album featured a female vocal trio from South Africa, Shikisha (hence the album title), Wally Badarou and Julian Scott. 
Most of this world music was originally suppressed, but was remastered and released in 2003. The resurgence of interest in Scott and the history of "Pop Muzik" follows U2's use of the Steve Osborne remix opening their PopMart tour. Remixes have come from all sides, from Marcus' "Pop Muzic 2001" in 2002, and by Junior Vasquez and the Dub Pistols in 2003. 
In 2003 a collection of Scott's artwork was shown at the Ensign Gallery in London. and a compilation including both retrospective studio recording and period demos was released with title of Life Class featuring artwork from the exhibition. 
Scott appeared in the Countdown Spectacular two-concert series in Australia between late August and early September 2007, where he performed "Pop Muzik" live for the first time. In 2009, an album featuring the original 1979 mix and thirteen remixes of "Pop Muzik" was issued by Union Square. 
In 1793, Carow moved to New York to obtain an academic education. He partnered with Robert Kermit to form the shipping line known as Kermit & Carow which made him a large fortune. In New York, he became a warden of St. Mark's Episcopal Church, a governor of New York Hospital, a member of the New York Bible Society (serving as vice president), and a promoter of the New York Society Library. He was one of the fifteen members of the Committee of arrangements for the Erie Canal celebration. 
He served as president of the Chamber of Commerce of the State of New York from 1840 to 1842, and was an original incorporator and director of the Bank of Commerce in New York. 
In 1815 and 1827 he visited Europe, staying with the Marquis de Lafayette in France during the latter trip. In 1835, when the St. Nicholas Society was formed, Carow was one of 275 men invited to join. 
His wife Eliza died in May 1837. Carow died on September 3, 1850 in New York City. After his death and the payment of all bequests and legacies, he left an estate valued at $146,681. 
Through his daughter Julia, he was a grandfather of Mary Sanderson (d. 1899), who married her second cousin Thomas Sanderson Furniss (and was the father of educationalist and socialist politician Henry Sanderson Furniss, 1st Baron Sanderson); Frances Ann Sanderson, who married New York State Assemblyman Samuel William Johnson (a descendant of William Samuel Johnson); Helen Augusta Sanderson, who married Dr. Charles Elam; Laura Carow Sanderson, who married Camidge, and Thomas Sanderson. 
2,4-Dinitroaniline is a chemical compound with a formula of C6H5N3O4. It is used as an explosive and as a reagent to detect and characterize aldehydes and ketones. 
It can be also prepared by the electrophilic aromatic substitution of aniline. Direct nitration should not be used due to the reactivity of aniline. (i.e. It can be protonated to anilinium or oxidized easily.) Instead the acetyl protection should be used. 
Compared to aniline, the basicity of 2,4-dinitroaniline is even weaker. It is due to the electron-withdrawing nature of the nitro groups. This makes the pKa of conjugate acid of 2,4-dinitroaniline being even lower than that of hydronium ions, meaning that it is a strong acid. 
2,4-Dinitroaniline is usually used as an explosive, although the material possess a negative oxygen balance and can be improved by combining it with an oxidizer such as ammonium nitrate. When in pure form, 2,4-Dinitroaniline has a VoD of 4,800 m/s at 1.61 g/cm3 molecular density. 
It is also used for the manufacture of certain azo dyes and disperse dyes, as well as in printing ink, toner, and the preparation of preservatives. The compound also finds applications as an intermediate in the synthesis of neutral dyes, sulfur dyes, and organic pigments. 
2,4-Dinitroaniline is moderately toxic, with a lethal dose of 285 mg/kg. However, the main danger is that it is explosive and flammable with heat or friction encouraging these properties. 
After the 2008 Summer Olympics, he officially announced that he was stepping down from the Lithuanian National Team, as a player. 
Lament's beatification opened under Pope Paul VI on 5 April 1975 (she was titled as a Servant of God) and Pope John Paul II later confirmed her heroic virtue and named her as Venerable in 1991; the same pope beatified Lament while in Poland in 1991. 
Lament died in 1946 and her remains were interred under the church of Saint Anthony at the Ratowo convent. Her order received diocesan approval on 24 June 1924 and then papal approval from Pope Paul VI on 7 July 1967; in 2005 there was 338 religious in 44 houses in places such as Zambia and Lithuania and the order still exists at present in Russia. 
The beatification miracle was investigated in the place it originated in and the C.C.S. validated it on 8 May 1987 before a medical board approved it sometime later on 21 March 1991; theologians approved it on 19 April 1991 as did the C.C.S. on 10 May 1991. John Paul II confirmed the miracle as being due to her intercession on 14 May 1991 and beatified Lament while on his apostolic visit to Poland on 5 June 1991. 
Cohen's family moved to El Paso, Texas, when he was four years old.  Cohen was a star at El Paso High School in baseball, basketball, and football. He was awarded a scholarship to the University of Alabama, where he played all three sports.  Cohen left college early and signed a minor league contract to play in the Texas League. 
In 1927, he batted .353 for the Buffalo Bisons, with a .508 slugging percentage.  In 1931 he batted .317 for Newark of the International League. 
Cohen's success in the Texas League drew the attention of John McGraw, manager of the New York Giants, who had been looking to sign a Jewish player to help draw crowds to compete with the New York Yankees and Babe Ruth playing across the Harlem River.  In May 1926, the Giants purchased Cohen's contract for $20,000 ($292,000 today) from the Waco team in the Texas League. 
With the slot at second base filled by Rogers Hornsby with the parent team, Cohen spent the 1927 season in Buffalo, with his .353 batting average leading the team to a league title. He was warmly welcomed by Buffalo's Jewish community, which held an "Andy Cohen Day" in which he was bestowed with gifts, including a diamond ring from fans and a black onyx ring from a jewelry store, among other gifts. 
Cohen played for the Newark Bears from 1929 until June 1932, when he was assigned to Minneapolis of the American Association. Despite the leg injury, Cohen led all International League second baseman in 1931 with a fielding percentage of .985, with 11 errors in 323 putouts and 412 assists, in addition to 66 double plays. With Minneapolis in 1933, Cohen led all American Association second basemen with a fielding percentage of .981 in 121 games. 
Cohen was inducted into the United States Army on May 26, 1942, reporting to Fort Niagara. He was a first sergeant with the 21st Engineers, and saw action in Italy and Africa. 
He returned to his hometown, where he coached the baseball team at the University of Texas at El Paso for 17 years. 
Cohen died 4 days after his 84th birthday and 6 months after his brother Syd in El Paso, Texas on October 29, 1988. 
In 1989, the El Paso Diablos moved into Cohen Stadium, a 9,725-seat stadium that was named in honor of Andy and his brother Syd. 
Tajique is a census-designated place (CDP) in Torrance County, New Mexico, United States. The population was 148 at the 2000 census. It is part of the Albuquerque Metropolitan Statistical Area. 
Tajique was originally a Tiwa pueblo. The name Tajique may have been derived from the Tiwa name Tush-yit-yay. The original date of settlement is unknown.  In the early 17th century, Tajique served as the seat of the San Miguel Mission.  After an Apache raid in 1674, the inhabitants of the Quarai pueblo joined the Tajique pueblo, doubling the population to over 600 residents.  In 1675, a subsequent Apache raid forced the abandonment of the Tajique pueblo. 
As of the census of 2000, there were 148 people, 48 households, and 39 families residing in the CDP. The population density was 54.7 people per square mile (21.1/km2). There were 63 housing units at an average density of 23.3 per square mile (9.0/km2). The racial makeup of the CDP was 58.78% White, 2.03% Native American, 37.84% from other races, and 1.35% from two or more races. Hispanic or Latino of any race were 79.05% of the population. 
There were 48 households, out of which 41.7% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 56.3% were married couples living together, 20.8% had a female householder with no husband present, and 16.7% were non-families. 12.5% of all households were made up of individuals, and 4.2% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 3.08 and the average family size was 3.28. 
In the CDP, the population was spread out, with 35.8% under the age of 18, 8.1% from 18 to 24, 28.4% from 25 to 44, 17.6% from 45 to 64, and 10.1% who were 65 years of age or older. The median age was 31 years. For every 100 females, there were 92.2 males. For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 90.0 males. 
The median income for a household in the CDP was $27,969, and the median income for a family was $27,969. Males had a median income of $33,000 versus $32,500 for females. The per capita income for the CDP was $7,645. There were 34.0% of families and 30.1% of the population living below the poverty line, including 34.3% of under eighteens and none of those over 64. 
Highway 261 was known as 6th Street in Winsted, and Babcock Avenue, 180th Street, and Dairy Avenue elsewhere in the county. 
Highway 261 was authorized on July 1, 1949. It was paved between Winsted and Lester Prairie in 1950 and between Lester Prairie and Highway 212 in 1953. 
The following is a list of awards and nominations received by English film director and producer Sir Alfred Hitchcock, chronicling his achievements in the film industry. 
To update for the new generation of films released from 1996 to 2006, an updated version of the list billed as an AFI's 100 Years... 100 Movies was released in June 2007. (AFI will conduct different versions of this poll every ten years.) While Steven Spielberg has the most films of any director on the list at five films, Stanley Kubrick, Billy Wilder and Hitchcock tie for 2nd place with four of their films making the list. 
In 2008, AFI's 10 Top 10 honored the ten greatest American films in ten classic film genres, featuring animation, fantasy, gangster, science fiction, western, sports, mystery, romantic comedy, courtroom drama and epic. Hitchcock's Vertigo was named as the best mystery film of all time, having entered the AFI's Top 10 list also with three other pictures in addition. (AFI defines "mystery" as a genre that revolves around the solution of a crime). 
In 1999, the BFI Top 100 British films list of the greatest movies of Cinema of the United Kingdom of the 20th century was produced by the charitable organisation British Film Institute (BFI), and voters were asked to choose up to 'culturally British' 100 films. Two of Hitchcock's movies entered the selection. 
From 1936, the Directors Guild of America Awards are issued annually by the labor union Directors Guild of America (DGA). The group, formerly identified as Screen Directors Guild, represents the interests of film and television directors in the United States motion picture industry. Lifetime Achievement Award was originally called the D.W. Griffith Lifetime Achievement Award, and it is given since 1953. Hitchcock received the honor in 1968. 
The Film Society of Lincoln Center (FSLC) is a film presentation organization founded in 1969 that, as one of the twelve resident organizations at the Lincoln Center for the Performing Arts, runs annual The Chaplin Award (initially called Gala Tribute) to honor legendary stars and industry leaders at the Lincoln Center's Avery Fisher Hall. After Charlie Chaplin and Fred Astaire, Hitchcock became the third awardee (in 1974). 
The Golden Globe Award is an accolade presented by the members of the Hollywood Foreign Press Association (HFPA) to recognize excellence in film and television, both domestic and foreign. The formal ceremonies are presented annually as a major part of the film industry's awards season, culminating each year with the Oscars. Hitchcock won twice. 
The Cecil B. DeMille Award is an annual lifetime achievement award that was named in honor of one of the industry's most successful filmmakers. The honor is given by the Hollywood Foreign Press Association during the Golden Globe Award ceremonies in Hollywood. 
The Jussi Award is a Finnish equivalent to American Oscars, to recognize excellence of professionals in the film industry in Finland (including film directors, actors and/or writers). The event was formed by Filmiaura society that count up to 260 film professionals who vote for all the categories, except Public Favorite. Hitchcock 
The Golden Laurel aka Laurel Awards was an American-Canadian film award organized by Motion Picture Exhibitor magazine that honored pictures, actors, directors and composers. Out of thirteen released annual editions, Hitchcock was nominated each year, winning eight times eventually, while four times he was ranked as the second as Best Producer/Director. 
The National Board of Review of Motion Pictures (NBR MP) was founded in 1909 as a censorship organization originally recognized as New York Board of Motion Picture Censorship in New York City. The society also works to foster commentary on all aspects of film production, as well as underwriting educational film programs and seminars for film students. Hitchcock won the NBR award in 1970. 
The National Film Registry (NFR) was established by the National Film Preservation Board in 1988 to preserve "culturally, historically, or aesthetically significant films"of the Cinema of the United States. Each year 25 are selected, of which each must be at least ten years old to be eligible for inclusion. For the first selection in 1989, the public nominated almost 1,000 films for consideration (including Vertigo). By now, eight of Hitchcock's films were inducted by the board members. 
The New York Film Critics Circle (NYFCC) annually honors excellence in cinema worldwide by an organization of film reviewers from New York City publications since 1935. The ceremony is held on December of each year, in part as a response to the Academy Awards. Hitchcock won once in 1939. 
The Academy of Science Fiction, Fantasy & Horror Films (ASFFF) presents each year the Saturn Awards, which honor the top works in science fiction, fantasy, and horror in film, television and home video since 1972. Hitchcock was awarded posthumously in 1994. 
Founded in 1932 as the Esposizione Internazionale d'Arte Cinematografica, the Venice Film Festival is the oldest such event in the world. As part of the major biennial exhibition and festival for contemporary art called Venice Biennale, the fest takes place on the island of the Lido in Venice, Italy. The highest given prize is the Golden Lion, which is regarded as one of the film industry's most distinguished award. Hitchcock was nominated in 1955. 
Orris were mostly used as night shelters by shepherds and cowherds after sheep and cows were moved to higher ground for grazing in the summer and early autumn. They vary in their arrangements: some appear to stand alone; others are clustered in small groups. 
At times, especially among the clustered orris, they were used for other purposes, such as food storage. 
The name of the shepherd's hut was barraca in Catalan. 18th-century archival records in French contain mentions of orri and barraque (the Frenchified form of barraca) as in "l'orri avec les barraques qui y sont construites pour la demeure des gardiens" ("the orri together with the barraques which are built in it to serve as abodes for the guardians"). 
Until 2016's "Ultimate Collection", a 3-CD set, this collection remained the closest to a traditional "box set" (usually three or four compact discs) of Summer's work because it contains then-unreleased material (selections from "I'm a Rainbow"), an unreleased (as a single) LP track ("Friends Unknown"), and the "MacArthur Park" promotional single. 
British films The Fallen Idol and Hamlet received the awards for Best British Film and Best Film from any Source, respectively, and were additionally nominated in both categories; Louisiana Story received the award for Best Documentary; Atomic Physics received the Special Award for Film; and the United Nations Award was handed out to Atomic Physics, Hungry Minds and screenplay The Winslow Boy. 
Winners are listed first and highlighted in boldface; the nominees are listed below alphabetically and not in boldface. 
Since WCIA's over-the-air signal cannot be seen in western parts of the market (including Springfield and Jacksonville), it is simulcast in high definition on WCIX's second digital subchannel (VHF channel 11.2 or virtual channel 49.2) from a transmitter in Clear Lake Township. Nielsen Media Research treats WCIA and WCIX-DT2 as one station in local ratings books, using the identifier name WCIA+. 
As the only commercial VHF station in Central Illinois, WCIA has been one of the country's most dominant television stations for most of its history. On two occasions, it fought off attempts by WICS/WICD and WAND to force it onto the UHF band by claiming that moving to UHF would cause it to lose 150,000 viewers. 
In November 2006, work began to re-secure WCIA's existing tower in Seymour so it would be able to hold a new digital transmission line and antenna. 
WCIA was the longtime home to Illinois Fighting Illini football and men's basketball games that were not aired on national television. Originally produced by WCIA, the station later carried the Illini via the Big Ten Conference's syndicated package with ESPN Plus. Beginning in 2007, these games have since moved to the Big Ten Network. The station still airs Illini men's basketball games that are carried as part of CBS's overall NCAA and Big Ten contracts. 
In 2009, WCIA's longtime weathercaster Judy Fraser retired from the station after 34 years. She was only the second head weathercaster in the station's history at the time. Meteorologist Robert Reese took over as Chief Meteorologist. His death in connection with complications from cancer in October 2012 came as a shock to the community. In his early battle, WCIA sold red ribbons in support of Reese and the American Cancer Society. 
WCIA currently broadcasts its news from its studios in Champaign. It currently broadcasts 40 hours of news a week, and one hour on Saturday and Sunday. For most of its history, it has been central Illinois' dominant news station, owing to its status as the market's only VHF station. 
On September 12, 2011, WCIA debuted an hour-long lifestyle and news program titled ciLiving.tv, the Springfield market's first hour-long 4 p.m. news program; the show utilizes interactivity with viewers, through the use of social media platforms such as Facebook and Twitter, along with online polls and audience quizzes via text message and the station's website. The show also utilizes the station's new set, which is also used for the station's morning show, as well as other programs. 
In April 2015, WCIA expanded its 6 p.m. newscast from 30 minutes to one hour to provide better coverage of local news. 
In late 2015, WCIA expanded its news coverage from the State Capitol. The station now produces and airs Capitol Connection on Sunday mornings after CBS' Face the Nation. The show is also carried on other Nexstar stations in Illinois. 
In October 2016, WCIA expanded its morning show from four hours to five hours, making the station have the only local news at 9 a.m. in the market. 
In an article published on March 13, 2005, The New York Times documented WCIA's use of government video news releases without clear attribution as such. The Times reported, "WCIA, based in Champaign, had run 26 segments made by the U.S. Agriculture Department over the past three months alone." WCIA acknowledged running the releases in the early hours of its morning news as part of its traditional service of agribusiness news to its rural viewers. 
Originally, WCFN/WCIX aired its digital signal in a reduced 4:3 480i standard definition format on both its main channel and the digital subcarrier of WCIA. In June 2015, WCIX upgraded to a full 1080i 16:9 high definition signal, the same as WCIA. In September 2016, WCIA begin broadcasting Bounce TV on 3.3 and Grit TV on 3.4. 
The soil is mostly yellow-red feralite[clarification needed] soil on sandstone (comprising app. 61.11% of the total) which is easily eroded and not conducive to growing vegetables and crops. Red yellow feralite soil on igneous rock (app. 20%) is often covered by forest. Fertile soil makes up the remaining 15-17% and exists in valleys along the springs where the residential areas and fields are concentrated. 
The Volkswagen EA211 engine (EA = development order), also called modular gasoline engine kit, is a family of petrol engines which debuted in 2011. They all include a four-stroke engine and dual overhead camshaft drive into exhaust manifolds. 
"I Can't Stop This Feeling I've Got" is a song by the English indie rock band Razorlight, and is the sixth track on their 2006 second album, Razorlight. The song was released 19 March 2007 as the fourth single from that album in the United Kingdom, peaking at #44 in the UK Singles Chart. 
The song was the first single from the album to fail to enter the top 40 of the UK Singles Chart. Following its #44 debut, it fell to #59 in its second week and dropped out of the top 75 altogether in its third week. 
Scandal at the Embassy (German: Skandal in der Botschaft) is a 1950 West German comedy film directed by Erik Ode and starring Viktor de Kowa, Jeanette Schultze and Michiko Tanaka. 
It was shot at the Bavaria Studios in Munich. The film's sets were designed by the art director Willi Herrmann and Heinrich Weidemann. 
This article related to a German film of the 1950s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The comedic story depicts a playwright attempting to write a play by a strict deadline and getting distracted by his family and a noisy next-door jazz band. 
The film opens with Shibano, a playwright for a Tokyo theater, squabbling with a painter over his work depicting a local house, newly up for rent. The two stumble into the street only to be interrupted when Shibano accidentally falls into the women's section of a nearby bathhouse. The woman who appears to scold them ends up dissolving the situation, and Shibano finally states his desire to move into the house pictured previously. 
This article related to a Japanese film of the 1930s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Wash and chop (or crush) the cherry plums in the form of cubes. Chop garlic, basil and coriander in very small pieces and add into the cherry plums. Then add the salt and mix together. 
The 2008 Colorado Democratic presidential caucuses took place on Super Tuesday, February 5, 2008. As he did in every other state that held a caucus rather than a primary, Barack Obama won the caucus by a wide, two-to-one margin over Hillary Clinton. 
As a cost-saving measure, Colorado stopped holding primary elections in 2000 in favor of a caucus system. Caucuses are run and paid for by the political parties. Both Republican and Democratic Caucus started at 7 p.m. 
Following the local caucuses, county conventions, congressional district conventions, and the state convention, on May 17, 2008, were held to finally apportion delegates to the Democratic National Convention. 
A Denver Post poll from late January indicated that Barack Obama was leading Hillary Clinton, though polls from earlier in the year had showed Clinton with a double-digit lead. 
Oost- en Middelzwake (also called Zwake) is a former municipality in the Dutch province of Zeeland. It covered a number of polders in the area of the former inlet De Zwake between the former islands of Borssele, Baarland and Zuid-Beveland. 
The defense appropriations dealt with separately soon after passage. The bill follows a similar bill from the previous year. 
This article about a university or college in Odisha, India is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Nigali Sagar (also called Nigliva, Nigali Sagar pillar, Nighihawa pillar, Nigliva pillar, or Araurakot pillar) is an archaeological site in Nepal containing the remains of a pillar of Ashoka. The site is located in Nigalihawa, about 20 kilometers northwest of Lumbini and 7 kilometers northeast of Taulihawa. Another famous inscription discovered nearby in a similar context is the Lumbini pillar inscription. 
The pillar was not erected in-situ, as no foundation has been discovered under it. It is thought that it was moved about 8 to 13 miles, from an uncertain location. 
It is said that in this place the Kanakamuni Buddha, one of the Buddhas of the past, was born. The Asoka inscription engraved on the pillar in Brahmi script and Pali language attests the fact that Emperor Asoka enlarged the Kanakamuni Buddha's stupa, worshiped it and erected a stone pillar for Kanakamuni Buddha on the occasion of the twentieth year of his coronation. 
Added to the doubts on the authenticity of the inscription, the very mention of a "divinized Buddha having been several time reborn" and preceded by other Buddhas such as the Kanakamuni Buddha, inscribed on a pillar in a historical period as early as the 3rd century BCE, is considered by some authors as quite doubtfull and problematic. Such complex religious constructions are generally considered as belonging to later stages of the development of Buddhism. 
 Because of this dedication by Ashoka, the Nigali Sagar pillar has the earliest known record ever of the word "Stupa" (here the Pali word Thube). 
There is also a second inscription, "Om mani padme hum" and "Sri Ripu Malla Chiram Jayatu 1234" made by King Ripu Malla in the year 1234 (Saka Era, corresponding to 1312 CE). 
The Chinese pilgrims Fa-Hien and Hiuen-Tsang describe the Kanakamuni Stupa and the Asoka Pillar in their travel accounts. Hiuen Tsang speaks of a lion capital atop the pillar, now lost.  
Derived inscriptions in Aramaic, on rock: Kandahar, Edict No.7 and Pul-i-Darunteh, Edict No.5 or No.7 
In order to raise money for the operation he needs, Bart organizes a benefit concert. Meanwhile, Lisa is informed that her animals will be taken to a pound and put down if she cannot find a suitable home for them. The concert is a success, and Bart feels empathy for Lisa and decides to use the money to build a home for the animals instead. The other musicians begin to discuss the idea of holding another benefit to repair Bart's arm. 
 Dan Iverson of IGN quotes that like the previous episode, it was decent, and praised the strength of the eighteenth season so far. He called the White Stripes' cameo funny, and called the episode entirely random, starting off with the death of Homer's Vegas wife Amber. He gives the episode a final rating of 7/10, similar to the previous episode. 
In 2007, Simon Crerar of The Times listed The White Stripes' performance as one of the thirty-three funniest cameos in the history of the show. 
Andrew Martin of Prefix Mag named The White Stripes his seventh favorite musical guests on The Simpsons out of a list of ten. Corey Deiterman of the Houston Press listed them as number four of the top five worst musical guests in Simpsons history. 
Kalyani Singh Oberoi, the matriarch of the family has two sons, Tej and Shakti. Tej is married to Jhanvi and they have three children, Omkara, Rudra and Priyanka. Shakti is married to Pinky and has a son, Shivaay, who is the eldest grandson. 
Shivaay crosses paths with the self righteous and "khidki-tod" Annika, who confronts him for trying to suppress the poor with the misuse money and lineage. To which, Shivaay slaps her with a bunch of cash. Presuming that he won the conversation, he moves to his car, only to face Annika breaking the glass of his windshield, and slapping him with the same bunch of cash. 
Shocked and surprised by the video showing all these incidents, Dadi, Omkara, and Rudra find Annika in the same party they had organized for their grandfather's birthday. But Shivaay ignores her there because he doesn't have any knowledge about her bloodline or lineage. 
Shivaay firmly believes that he doesn't have time for love and hence plans to marry Tia Kapoor as a business deal. Dadi hires Anika as a wedding planner for Shivaay and Tia's upcoming wedding. At first, his relationship with Annika becomes more hostile due to misunderstandings. 
After the misunderstandings are cleared, Shivaay starts to understand Annika and they both start to develop feelings for each other. Unaware of the emotions, Shivaay still plans to marry Tia. 
Daksh, Shivaay's childhood friend turns up at his door and falls for Annika at first sight, which soon turns into an obsession. Angered after being rejected twice, Daksh lies to Shivaay that Annika agreed to sleep with him for one night in exchange for money, leading Shivaay to hate her. 
On Shivaay and Tia's wedding day it is revealed that she is already married to Robin. Due to turn of events Tia runs away from her wedding which leads to Shivaay forcibly marrying Annika. 
Meanwhile, Omkara crosses paths with Ishana, who introduces herself as Bela to him. Ishana wanted to marry Omkara to gain all the wealth he has, and invents lies to gain his sympathy. Ishana tries to trick both of them but fails as the three Oberoi brothers try to expose her. Some time later, Ridhima lies and betrays Omkara and collaborates with his father to make Omkara the sole heir of the Oberoi empire. Disheartened, he breaks up with her. 
After a rocky start, Annika and Shivaay clear the misunderstandings between them and eventually fall in love. Together, they expose Tia's marriage and her mother, Mrs. Kapoor's, evil intentions. Later, Shivaay accepts Annika as his wife in front of everyone. 
Together, they expose the fake Shivaay, Mahi. Simultaneously they expose Ranveer and his foster mother, Kamini who is Shivaay's father's former girlfriend. It's revealed that Mahi is Kamini's illegitimate son with Shakti as she wants to use her son for Oberoi wealth. Afterwards, it's revealed that Priyanka isn't pregnant. 
Rudra at a party falls in love with Bhavya, an undercover ACP on a mission. She later uses him for her mission, Rudra and Bhavya fake a marriage just so she can hide out in the Oberoi mansion. 
Annika returns and claims the Oberoi Mansion as her own after getting it signed from Omkara. She promises Omkar that she will help Shivaay recover. She tries to make Shivaay jealous but her plan backfires as he claims to fix his engagement with Ragini, though not meaning it. Ragini fabricates many lies to gain sympathy from Shivaay in Pinky's advice. 
She tries to blackmail Annika again but, Shivaay plans to spread the truth. It is revealed that Pinky had lied about the illegitimate son situation, and was also the master of all conspiracies, including the fake Shivaay. Shattered, Shivaay refuses to accept Pinky as his mother. 
Meanwhile, as Bhavya and Rudra fall in love with each other she reveals that she is four years older than Rudra which makes him rethink about everything between him and her. Later, he decides to let go of the age difference and follows Bhavya on her mission. But misunderstandings follow there and Bhavya decides to marry her best friend, Manav. Dejected and disheartened, Rudra insults Bhavya in front of everyone, for which Bhavya slaps him and, later refuses to marry. 
Anika and Shivaay's wedding happens happily and peacefully. But after the marriage bad omens follow and Shivaay goes missing, but then returns, claiming to have no memory of Annika and introduces his wife Tanya. It is revealed that the Oberois have another brother, Abhay Singh Oberoi. Annika slowly figures out that Shivaay is just pretending to have no memory of Annika. It is also revealed that Abhay is behind the charade. 
Meanwhile, Omkara's doubts about Gauri are confirmed when he sees Gauri and another man's name written in a hotel register.  Also, after being framed for taking bribes, ACP Bhavya Pratap Rathore is suspended. 
Omkara confronts Gauri and berates her for betraying him. In tears, Gauri clears all misunderstandings after giving him evidence of her innocence. She explains about the surprise, and confesses her true love for him in English. But heartbroken, Gauri promises to never interfere in his life ever again, and leaves for Bareilly. 
Guilt stricken Omkara realizes his love for Gauri and decides to win her back. Meanwhile, Rudra still heartbroken, joins the fashion sector of the Oberoi company and appoints a suspended Bhavya as his bodyguard. He tricks her into signing a contract according to which she can't leave the job before working for three months. He humiliates and berates her, thinking she is married to Manav. 
Omkara turns up at Gauri's doorstep on Karwachauth dressed up as a sardar who Gauri fails to recognize. He introduces himself as Dilpreet Singh and starts living in their house on rent. He tries to win her heart as Dilpreet Singh. 
Rudra feels lonely as both his brothers have their own romances to indulge into, so he plans a Goa trip with the two of them. Meanwhile, Pinky's cousin Dinky arrives who keeps pestering Annika and Gauri to not have blind faith in their husbands. 
On the way, the Oberoi brothers have a chance encounter with Piya, a dance choreographer who drugs them, dances with them and makes a video of it. The next morning, the brothers wake up oblivious of what happened the previous night. They rush back home, only to find that Piya is also at the Oberoi mansion as Dinky's family friend's daughter. It is revealed that Dinky planned this charade. 
Piya initially threatens to show this video in public but gradually understands that they are truthful and trustworthy. She steps back but Dinky displays this video in Dadi's birthday party only to realize later that the brothers have earned the trust from their wives truthfully. 
The next morning, Annika requests Shivaay for tamarind according to a diet plan she was planning to follow. Dinky overhears the tamarind and suspects pregnancy. After not having anything for hours, Annika faints near the dining table during lunch. This confirms Dinky and she announces Annika's pregnancy. Only to realize later that Annika and Shivaay haven't consummated their relationship yet. After which they plan to consummate and succeed. 
Abhay returns with the claims of being another Oberoi brother. He also gets Svetlana inside the Oberoi mansion claiming to be her husband. Meanwhile, Rudra still assumes Bhavya is married to Manav, berates her for one last time and fires her from the job only to realize that she was never married to Manav. Later Svetlana blackmails Shivaay into transferring Rudra and Omkara's property to her. 
This leads to misunderstandings between Tej and Shivaay, resulting in Shivaay and Annika leaving the Oberoi mansion and going for their "Vanvas". They leave for Goa, while the Oberoi family and mansion gets split in two. 
In Goa, they meet Veer Pratap Chauhan, their new neighbor, who turns out to be planted by Svetlana to take revenge from Annika. He tries to prove Annika mad so that Shivaay would leave her and he would save Annika. 
Failed, he then tries to kill Shivaay. Meanwhile, Shivaay and Soumya bring Bhavya and Rudra face-to-face in his house in Goa one last time before Bhavya leaves for abroad, where Rudra confesses his true feelings to her and proposes marriage to her. 
While Rudra plans to marry in Goa with Shivaay, Tej performs Gauri's last rites as she fails to obey his orders. Disheartened, Gauri and Omkara also arrive at Shivaay's house in Goa. Happily, the three Oberoi brothers and their wives with grandmother's blessings perform Rudra and Bhavya's pre-wedding rituals. Soumya reveals to Veer that she is the younger sister of Svetlana and Tia and now she wants to marry Rudra. She joins forces with Veer. 
Veer tricks Tej into signing the house deeds to be auctioned, from which Shivaay saves them. At same time he exposes Svetlana and again lives in the Oberoi mansion as everybody blames Tej of the troubles and he leaves. 
On Valentine's Day, Annika figures out that Veer is not what he seems to be and tries to warn Shivaay but, that night Shivaay shoots Annika dead. Panicked and guilt stricken, he unknowingly takes help from Veer. 
The next day Shivaay keeps a press conference where somebody plays the leaked video of Shivaay shooting Annika. As Shivaay is about to be arrested a police inspector brings a woman into the house with looks exactly like Annika. 
Shivaay refuses to believe their claims as he knows that he had killed her and tests her in many ways which surprisingly she passes. 
Later that day Veer and Shivaay return to the place where they had buried Annika and find the real Annika in the coffin. Knowing the truth, Veer leaves, ShiOmRu digs Annika out and in a series of flashbacks, it is revealed that Annika's murder and fake Anika was a part of the plan devised by Shivika.  
The story takes a different leap, where an author and public speaker, returns all of them to where the story started and changes their lives by changing the circumstances. 
Now, Shivaay is a stoic, no-nonsense businessman who is hurt by his parents' death. Pinky's suicide and Shakti's discovery of his affair haunt him. Omkara is also shown as a businessman. Rudra is shown as a supermodel who uses his fame and money as an excuse for everything he does. Priyanka is shown as Shivaay's younger sister this time. 
Annika and Gauri live with their aunt who hates them because their mother left their father for another man. Gauri knows nothing of the incident and Annika struggles to make ends meet. She is constantly stressed about paying for Gauri's college tuition, Sahil's medications and house rent, with no help from her aunt. 
In Shivaay's absence, Om and Rudra take over his business and have grown to hate him for killing Tej. The brothers' evil aunt, Roop, reappears to kill Shivaay. Rudra discovers the real reason Shivaay killed Tej and the brothers are reunited. Later, Shivaay remarries Annika. Priyanka marries Shivaay's business rival Jai Kothari. 
When Sahil is arrested for drunk driving, Shivaay refuses to bail him out before letting him spend a night in jail, as a result, Sahil vows to retaliate against Shivaay. Jai tries to kill Annika to get revenge on Shivaay, but Shivaay saves Annika from kidnappers and rescues her. 
Annika and Shivaay's son, Shivaansh is a superstar and lives with his great-grandmothers, Kalyani and Aruna. He has a sister, Shivani. Rudra and Bhavya have a son, Dhruv, and Om and Gauri have a daughter, Radhika. She is married to Varun and harbours a secret enmity against the Oberois. Shivaansh has only one dream - to build a hospital in his parents' memory to provide free treatment for poor children. He is shown to be fighting a terminal disease and has a short time left to live. 
Aditi Deshmukh, the ACP, is introduced as a self-made, strong Marathi girl who supports her uncle, aunt, and a younger sister. While her sister, Mahu, is a big fan of Shivaansh, Aditi has a strong prejudice against his fame. Aditi's father is revealed to have gone missing when she was a child, making her determined to find him. She is later revealed to be aiding Varun in planning against the Oberois. 
On 18 June 2018, a reboot version, Ishqbaaaz: Redux, was launched with a new love story of the leads from the beginning. 
Owing to its declining viewership ratings, it took a leap in December 2018 which starred Nakuul Mehta and Manjiri Pupala. As it failed to increase the ratings, Pupala's character was turned negative, resulting in her resignation. Eventually, Niti Taylor was hired to play Mannat Kaur Khurana. The expected ratings were not delivered and it went off air on 15 March 2019. 
Dil Boley Oberoi, premiered on 13 February 2017. It is the first Indian soap to have a spin-off. On 7 July 2017, Dil Boley Oberoi ended and the storyline was merged into Ishqbaaaz. 
The Ishqbaaaz soundtrack was written by Shaheen Iqbal and composed by Sanjeev Srivastava. Sanjeev Srivastava had composed the original songs and background score for the show. The original version of the album was released on 7 August 2016. "O Jaana", the theme song of the serial was performed by Pamela Jain and Bhaven Dhanak. 
"O Saathiya", the theme song of Dil Boley Oberoi, the album released on 1 May 2017. Firstly, the song was made for Omkara and Ishana, but after Ishana left, the song was not used at Ishqbaaaz. When Dil Boley Oberoi aired on, the female version by Pamela Jain was released, but now it also used on this show for Omkara and Gauri, after merging with Ishqbaaaz. 
Burton Gilliam (born August 9, 1938) is an American actor. He is best known for memorable roles in several popular 1970's movies, such as Blazing Saddles and Paper Moon. 
Before acting, Gilliam was a member of the Coast Guard's boxing team where he won 201 out of 217 fights. He remained in the boxing world for decades, working as a referee in California. 
Gilliam has had roles in movies such as Honeymoon in Vegas, Thunderbolt and Lightfoot, Farewell, My Lovely, Fletch, Gator, Telefon, and The Terror Within II. His television appearances include Alice, Charlie's Angels, The A-Team, The Dukes of Hazzard, The Fall Guy, and he appeared as a regular on Evening Shade. 
Gilliam was born in Dallas, Texas. He lives with his wife Susan in Allen, Texas, just north of Dallas. He has two children and four grandchildren. His granddaughter Hollie Vise is a world champion gymnast. 
Gilliam graduated from Woodrow Wilson High School in 1956 and was inducted into the school's hall of fame in 2004. In 2018, he was the grand marshal of the Dallas St. Patrick's Day parade. 
"We're proud to be members of the University of North Carolina university system. But, frankly, we are tired of being confused with other institutions or having our own identity misused and misconstrued. It's harder to make a name for yourself, when your name keeps getting confused. Not only will this logo simplify matters, but it gives the program an exciting new look that better captures our essence."
Prior to the "49ers" moniker, the athletic teams were known as the "Owls" due to CCUNC's beginnings as a night school. 
Previously, UNC Charlotte was a charter member of the Sun Belt Conference and the Metro Conference, before joining Conference USA in 1995. 
After this dramatic reshuffle, UNC Charlotte received an invitation to join the Atlantic 10 Conference, which it accepted. Upon joining the A-10, Charlotte experienced much success in nearly every category with the exception of the signature sport of men's basketball. 
On October 21, 2021 Charlotte was accepted along with 5 other Conference USA teams to join the American Athletic Conference, joining former Metro Conference and C-USA rivals there. 
A member of Conference USA,  UNC Charlotte currently sponsors teams in nine men's and nine women's NCAA sanctioned sports: 
The 49ers softball team began play in 1986. The team has not made an NCAA Tournament appearance. The current head coach is Ashley Chastain. 
Charlotte's 29-year men's basketball rivalry with the Davidson Wildcats sees Mecklenburg County's only two Division I schools go head-to-head for the Hornet's Nest Trophy. Charlotte leads the series 26-11. Due to a scheduling conflict, the series was on hiatus until the 2010-11 season. 
Recently Charlotte has started to develop a rivalry with the Appalachian State Mountaineers. Charlotte's establishment of a football team, and the competitiveness of the subsequent contests in that sport, have led to a renewed interest and developing rivalry. This is only viewed as a rivalry among Charlotte fans, as App State has long established and more competitive rivalries with other programs.Appalachian State is undefeated against  Charlotte in football with games scheduled through 2030. 
This geographical article about a location in Samsun Province, Turkey is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Ward 3 is an aldermanic ward in St. Louis, Missouri, United States of America.  It is one of 28 wards that make up the Board of Aldermen of the City of St. Louis 
Ward 3 contains parts of many neighborhoods, including JeffVanderLou, St. Louis Place, Hyde Park, College Hill, Fairground Neighborhood, and O'Fallon. 
West Prairie is an unincorporated community in the town of Trempealeau, Trempealeau County, Wisconsin, United States. 
This article about a location in Trempealeau County, Wisconsin is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
500 years ago, the Kingdom of Granville fought a terrible war with Darces the Dark Overlord. A great hero, the warrior "Magi", rose to challenge Darces. He owned six magical swords and a powerful suit of armor that was impervious to all but the most powerful of magic. Five of his six swords were Elemental blades, each created from the rarest metals on earth. The sixth blade, "Tores", used an even more powerful metal. 
Using his powers, Magi defeated Darces, and exiled him to a far away land. After defeating Darces, Magi grew old and died. 
Now, on a dark, stormy night in the Kingdom of Granville, Darces the Dark Overlord returns to the land. 
Players explore towns looking for work and through dungeons looking for monsters to defeat. Players can also be apprenticed in elemental magic like wind, fire, water, and earth. The mighty castle of the realm can be found in north of Granville, the capital town. The task of the game is explained by the elder at the start of the game. 
Food and water can be purchased and is used every time the player stops to rest at either a camp site or at an inn. Levels can only be gained by visiting the "wise men" at the villages at the right number of experience points and receiving a baptism from them. 
One of the interesting aspects of the game was a magic system where a caster could combine runes from various elements to form new magic spells based on the elements: earth, water, wind, fire, and fairy magic. 
Colonel Hynes served as one of the delegates that formed the first Constitution of Kentucky, in 1792. 
This biographical article related to Brazilian auto racing is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about an Eastern Catholic bishop from the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
James Trembath (born 1871, date of death unknown) was a South African sports shooter. He competed in the 600 m free rifle event at the 1924 Summer Olympics. 
This biographical article relating to sport shooting in South Africa is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
After basketball he worked for Goodyear Tire Company, ultimately became its 10th president, and also became an auto racing enthusiast & co-owner. He also is notable for having suggested the name of the famous auto-racing empire Dan Gurney's All American Racers, in which he was a partner/co-owner. 
The men's freestyle 69 kilograms is a competition featured at the 1997 World Wrestling Championships, and was held at the Yenisey Sports Palace in Krasnoyarsk, Russia from 29 to 31 August 1997. 
David W. Panuelo (born April 13, 1964) is a Micronesian politician who is serving as the President of the Federated States of Micronesia. His term started on May 11, 2019. 
Panuelo was born on the island of Pohnpei, where he completed much of his early education. He went to college in the United States, earning a BA in Political Science from Eastern Oregon University in 1987. 
In 1988 he was appointed as the deputy ambassador for the Micronesian embassy in Fiji where he served until 1993. In 1993 he was appointed to serve at the Micronesian Mission to the United Nations, a position he held until 1996. In 1997, Panuelo was named the director of the Department of Resource Management and Development for the State of Pohnpei, a position he held until 2001. 
This article about a Federated States of Micronesia politician is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Rometta borders the following municipalities: Messina, Monforte San Giorgio, Roccavaldina, Saponara, Venetico, Spadafora. 
This biographical article relating to Norwegian rowing is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Masturbation is frequent in both sexes and at any age. Various medical and psychological benefits have been attributed to a healthy attitude toward sexual activity in general and to masturbation in particular. No causal relationship is known between masturbation and any form of mental or physical disorder. In the Western world, masturbation in private or with a partner is generally considered a normal and healthy part of sexual enjoyment. 
While masturbation is the formal word for this practice, many other expressions are in common use. Terms such as playing with yourself, pleasuring oneself and slang such as wanking, jerking off, and frigging are common. Self-abuse and self-pollution were common in early modern times and are still found in modern dictionaries. A large variety of other euphemisms and dysphemisms exist which describe masturbation. For a list of terms, see the entry for masturbate in Wiktionary. 
Reading or viewing pornography, sexual fantasies, or other erotic stimuli may lead to a desire for sexual release such as by masturbation. Pornography is also used in order to assist with masturbation and to improve the experience of masturbating. 
Some people get sexual pleasure by inserting objects, such as urethral sounds, into the urethra (the tube through which urine and, in men, semen, flows), a practice known as urethral play or "sounding". Other objects such as ball point pens and thermometers are sometimes used, although this practice can lead to injury or infection. Some people masturbate by using machines that simulate intercourse. 
Men and women may masturbate until they are close to orgasm, stop for a while to reduce excitement, and then resume masturbating. They may repeat this cycle multiple times. This "stop and go" build-up, known as "edging", can achieve even stronger orgasms. Rarely, people quit stimulation just before orgasm to retain the heightened energy that normally comes down after orgasm. 
Common positions include lying on one's back or face down, sitting, squatting, kneeling, or standing. 
The most common masturbation technique among males is to hold the penis with a loose fist and then to move the hand up and down the shaft. This type of stimulation is typically all that is required to achieve orgasm and ejaculation. The speed of the hand motion may vary throughout the masturbation session. 
For circumcised males, on whom the glans is mostly or completely uncovered, this technique creates more direct contact between the hand and the glans. To avoid friction, irritation and soreness from this resulting friction, some may prefer to use a personal lubricant, masturbation cream, or saliva. 
The shaft skin can also be slid back and forth with just the index finger and thumb wrapped around the penis. A variation on this is to place the fingers and thumb on the penis as if playing a flute, and then shuttle them back and forth. Lying face down on a comfortable surface such as a mattress or pillow, the penis can be rubbed against it. This technique may include the use of a simulacrum, or artificial vagina. 
A somewhat controversial ejaculation control technique is to put pressure on the perineum, about halfway between the scrotum and the anus, just before ejaculating.[citation needed] This can, however, redirect semen into the bladder (referred to as retrograde ejaculation). 
Women can stimulate themselves sexually by crossing their legs tightly and clenching the muscles in their legs, creating pressure on the genitals. This can potentially be done in public without observers noticing. Thoughts, fantasies, and memories of previous instances of arousal and orgasm can produce sexual excitation. Some women can orgasm spontaneously by force of will alone, although this may not strictly qualify as masturbation as no physical stimulus is involved. 
Sex therapists will sometimes recommend that female patients take time to masturbate to orgasm, for example, to help improve sexual health and relationships, to help determine what is erotically pleasing to them, and because mutual masturbation can lead to more satisfying sexual relationships and added intimacy. 
Mutual masturbation involves two or more people who sexually stimulate each other, usually with the hands. It can be practiced by people of any sexual orientation, and can be part of other sexual activity. It may be used as foreplay, or as an alternative to sexual penetration. When used as an alternative to penile-vaginal penetration, the goal may be to preserve virginity or to avoid risk of pregnancy. 
Mutual masturbation can be practiced in pairs or groups with or without actually touching another person for example: 
Frequency of masturbation is determined by many factors, e.g., one's resistance to sexual tension, hormone levels influencing sexual arousal, sexual habits, peer influences, health and one's attitude to masturbation formed by culture; E. Heiby and J. Becker examined the latter. Medical causes have also been associated with masturbation. 
The Merck Manual says that 97% of men and 80% of women have masturbated and that, generally speaking, males masturbate more than females. 
Masturbation is considered normal when performed by children, even in early infancy. In 2009, the Sheffield NHS Health Trust issued a pamphlet called "Pleasure" which discussed the health benefits of masturbation. This was done in response to data and experience from the other EU member states to reduce teen pregnancy and STIs (STDs), and to promote healthy habits. 
According to the New Oxford Textbook of Psychiatry (1st ed.), "Masturbation and sexual play are common well before puberty. Sexual behaviour in young children is common, and should only be regarded as a sign of sexual abuse when it is out of context and is inappropriate." 
In the book Human Sexuality: Diversity in Contemporary America, by Strong, Devault and Sayad, the authors point out, "A baby boy may laugh in his crib while playing with his erect penis". "Baby girls sometimes move their bodies rhythmically, almost violently, appearing to experience orgasm." Italian gynecologists Giorgio Giorgi and Marco Siccardi observed via ultrasound a female fetus possibly masturbating and having what appeared to be an orgasm. 
Coon and Mitterer stated: "Approximately 70 percent of married women and men masturbate at least occasionally." 
In males, masturbation flushes out old sperm with low motility from the male's genital tract. The next ejaculation then contains more fresh sperm, which have higher chances of achieving conception during intercourse. If more than one male has intercourse with a female, the sperm with the highest motility will compete more effectively. 
Solo masturbation is a sexual activity that is nearly free of risk of sexually transmitted infection. With two or more participants, the risk of sexually transmitted infection, while not eliminated, remains lower than with most forms of penetrative sex. Support for such a view and for making masturbation part of the American sex education curriculum, led to the dismissal of US Surgeon General Joycelyn Elders during the Clinton administration. 
Masturbation among adolescents contributes to their developing a sense of mastery over sexual impulses, and it has a role in the physical and emotional development of prepubescents and pubescents. 
Mutual masturbation enables partners in a couple to reveal the "map to [their] pleasure centers," learning how they enjoy being touched. When intercourse is inconvenient or impractical, mutual masturbation affords couples the opportunity to obtain sexual release as often as desired. 
It is held in many mental health circles that masturbation can relieve depression and lead to a higher sense of self-esteem. When one partner in a relationship wants more sex than the other, masturbation can provide a balancing effect and promote a more harmonious relationship. 
In 2003, an Australian research team led by Graham Giles of The Cancer Council Australia found that males who masturbated frequently had a lower probability of developing prostate cancer, although they could not demonstrate a direct causation. A 2008 study concluded that frequent ejaculation between the ages of 20 and 40 was correlated with higher risk of developing prostate cancer, while frequent ejaculation in the sixth decade of life was found to be correlated with a lower risk. 
A study published in 1997 found an inverse association between death from coronary heart disease and frequency of orgasm even given the risk that myocardial ischaemia and myocardial infarction can be triggered by sexual activity. 
The association between frequency of orgasm and all cause mortality was also examined using the midpoint of each response category recorded as number of orgasms per year. The age adjusted odds ratio for an increase of 100 orgasms per year was 0.64 (0.44 to 0.95).
That is, a difference in mortality appeared between any two subjects when one subject ejaculated at around two times per week more than the other. Assuming a broad range average of between three and five ejaculations per week for healthy males, this would mean five to seven ejaculations per week. This is consistent with a 2003 paper that found the strength of these correlations increased with increasing frequency of ejaculation. 
A 2008 study at Tabriz Medical University found that ejaculation reduces swollen nasal blood vessels, freeing the airway for normal breathing. The mechanism is through stimulation of the sympathetic nervous system and is long lasting. The study author suggests: "It can be done [from] time-to-time to alleviate the congestion and the patient can adjust the number of intercourses or masturbations depending on the severity of the symptoms." 
Sexual climax leaves an individual in a relaxed and contented state, frequently followed by drowsiness and sleep. 
Some professionals consider masturbation equivalent to a cardiovascular workout. Though research remains scant, those suffering from cardiovascular disorders, particularly those recovering from heart attacks, should resume physical activity gradually and with the frequency and rigor which their physical status will allow. This limitation can serve as encouragement to follow through with physical therapy sessions to help improve endurance. In general, sex slightly increases energy consumption. 
Those who insert objects as aids to masturbation risk them becoming stuck (e.g. as rectal foreign bodies). Men and women can fall prey to this problem. A woman went into a German hospital with two pencils in her bladder, having pierced her urethra after inserting them during masturbation. 
A male whose penis is bluntly traumatized during intercourse or masturbation may, rarely, sustain a penile fracture or develop Peyronie's disease. Phimosis is "a contracted foreskin (that) may cause trouble by hurting when an attempt is made to pull the foreskin back". In these cases, any energetic manipulation of the penis can be problematic. 
A small percentage of males have postorgasmic illness syndrome (POIS), which can cause severe muscle pain throughout the body and other symptoms immediately following ejaculation, whether due to masturbation or partnered sex. The symptoms last for up to a week. Some doctors speculate that the frequency of POIS "in the population may be greater than has been reported in the academic literature", and that many cases are undiagnosed. 
Compulsive masturbation and other compulsive behaviors can be signs of an emotional problem, which may need to be addressed by a mental health specialist. As with any "nervous habit", it is more helpful to consider the causes of compulsive behavior, rather than try to repress masturbation. 
The sexual stimulation of one's own genitals has been interpreted variously by different religions, the subject of legislation, social controversy, activism, as well as intellectual study in sexology. Social views regarding masturbation taboo have varied greatly in different cultures, and over history. 
Among non-western perspectives on the matter, some teachers and practitioners of Traditional Chinese medicine, Taoist meditative and martial arts say that masturbation can cause a lowered energy level in men. Within the African Congo Basin, the Aka, Ngandu, Lesi, brbs, and Ituri ethnic groups all lack a word for masturbation in their languages and are confused by the concept of masturbation. 
Medical attitudes toward masturbation began to change towards the end of the 19th century when H. Havelock Ellis, in his seminal 1897 work Studies in the Psychology of Sex, questioned Tissot's premises. 
In the 1980s, Michel Foucault was arguing masturbation taboo was "rape by the parents of the sexual activity of their children". However, in 1994, when the surgeon general of the United States, Joycelyn Elders, mentioned as an aside that it should be mentioned in school curricula that masturbation was safe and healthy, she was forced to resign, with opponents asserting that she was promoting the teaching of how to masturbate.[citation needed] 
Even though many medical professionals and scientists have found large amounts of evidence that masturbating is healthy and commonly practiced by males and females, stigma on the topic still persists today. In November 2013, Matthew Burdette, after being filmed masturbating, committed suicide. 
In an article published by the nonprofit organization Planned Parenthood Federation of America, it was reported that: 
Proving that these ancient stigmas against masturbation are still alive and felt by women and men, researchers in 1994 found that half of the adult women and men who masturbate feel guilty about it (Laumann, et al., 1994. p.85). Another study in 2000 found that adolescent young men are still frequently afraid to admit that they masturbate (Halpern, et al., 2000, 327).
Male masturbation may be used as a method to obtain semen for third party reproductive procedures such as artificial insemination and in vitro fertilisation which may involve the use of either partner or donor sperm. 
The text book Palliative care nursing: quality care to the end of life states, "Terminally ill people are likely no different from the general population regarding their masturbation habits. Palliative care practitioners should routinely ask their patients if anything interferes in their ability to masturbate and then work with the patient to correct the problem if it is identified." 
The prosecution of masturbation has varied at different times, from complete illegality to virtually unlimited acceptance. In a 17th-century law code for the Puritan colony of New Haven, Connecticut, blasphemers, homosexuals and masturbators were eligible for the death penalty. 
In many jurisdictions, masturbation by one person of another is considered digital penetration which may be illegal in some cases, such as when the other person is a minor. 
Religions vary broadly in their views of masturbation, from considering it completely impermissible (as in Roman Catholicism) to encouraging and refining it (as, for example, in some Neotantra and Taoist sexual practices). 
In popular music, there are various songs that deal with masturbation. Some of the earliest examples are "My Ding-a-Ling" by Chuck Berry and "Mary Ann with the Shaky Hand" and "Pictures of Lily" by The Who. 
The 1858 schoolboys' novel Eric, or, Little by Little was a tract against masturbation, but did not mention the subject except extremely obliquely as "Kibroth-Hattaavah" a place mentioned in the Old Testament where those that lusted after meat were buried. 
In October 1972, an important censorship case was held in Australia, leading to the banning of Philip Roth's novel Portnoy's Complaint in that country due to its masturbation references. The censorship led to public outcry at the time. 
In the Seinfeld episode "The Contest", the show's main characters enter into a contest to see who can go the longest without masturbating. Because Seinfeld's network, NBC, did not think masturbation was a suitable topic for prime-time television, the word is never used. Instead, the subject is described using a series of euphemisms. "Master of my domain" became a part of the American lexicon from this episode. 
In March 2007 the UK broadcaster Channel 4 was to air a season of television programmes about masturbation, called Wank Week. (Wank is a Briticism for masturbate.) The series came under public attack from senior television figures, and was pulled amid claims of declining editorial standards and controversy over the channel's public service broadcasting credentials. 
In Monty Python's The Meaning of Life (1983), the song "Every Sperm Is Sacred" is a satire of Catholic teachings on reproduction that forbid masturbation (and contraception) by artificial means. In Talking Cock by comedian Richard Herring, the sketch is used to ridicule those who condemn masturbation (and sex) for any purpose other than procreation. 
In American Pie (1999), Nadia (Shannon Elizabeth) discovers Jim's (Jason Biggs) pornography collection and while half-naked sitting on his bed masturbates to it. In American Reunion (2012), Noah (Eugene Levy) attempts to explain the potential joys and difficulties of Jim explaining masturbation to his future son. 
Masturbatory behavior has been documented in a very wide range of species. Individuals of some species have been known to create tools for masturbation purposes. 
Willin Low is a restaurateur and chef in Singapore. His flagship restaurant, Wild Rocket, specializes in what Low describes as "mod sin" or modern Singaporean cuisine. Diners Club named Wild Rocket one of the top 50 restaurants in Asia. 
This biographical article about a foodie, restaurateur or gourmand is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Naif Mansour Al-Mutairi (born 12 December 1987) is a Saudi football player who played in the Saudi Professional League for Al-Batin. 
This biographical article related to a football defender from Saudi Arabia is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Walter Bach (born 10 December 1909, date of death unknown) was a Swiss gymnast who competed in the 1936 Summer Olympics. 
This biographical article related to Swiss artistic gymnastics is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In April 2013, Fahey suffered an anterior cruciate ligament injury while playing for Arsenal. The 30 minutes she played for Ireland against the Basque Country in May 2014 was her first game back. 
Retry is a free-to-play retro-styled side-scrolling video game developed by Rovio LVL11 and published by Rovio Entertainment. Inspired by Flappy Bird, Retry has similar controls. The game was soft launched in Finland, Canada, and Poland in May 2014. The worldwide iOS and Android release was on October 22, 2014. As of 2017 Retry has been taken off the app stores. 
The goal of the game is to send an airplane from one hangar to another hangar in different places. There are many obstacles between the two points, including air and moving landscapes. 
The goal of the game is to bring the airplane from one hangar into another hangar without crashing into obstacles (even the ground). In order to move the plane, the players must simply tap the screen. The plane will then move forwards and upwards. Releasing the finger from the screen makes the plane move down. (Similar gameplay has appeared before in old Finnish games, such as Triplane Turmoil (1996) by Dodekaedron Software and even more similarly in Super Sukkula (1994) by Lasse Makkonen.) 
In every level, there is at least one "retry point", that when landed upon changes the plane's spawn point into that of the retry point for one coin. The game, unlike Flappy Bird, can also let players loop the plane, and even fly backwards. There are also new gameplay elements such as liquid physics, moving obstacles, stars, and currency (for unlocking levels early and acquiring retry points), which can be earned via achievements or playing levels and purchased for real money. 
In certain levels, there are elements that can increase the difficulty. The wind can slow down the plane, water can drown the plane (but not crash), and moving terrain. There are also locked blocks in some levels that locks a certain level path, that can only be opened by unlocking the next level pack. 
Like all Rovio games, Retry has a 3-star format. The first star is earned by finishing the level, the second star is earned by not crashing a certain number of times, and the third star by not flying more than a certain distance. Stars, not only shows the mastery of each level but are also used to unlock additional level packs. 
Patrick O'Rourke of canada.com described the game as taking "one of the few things that was great about Flappy Bird", namely the satisfaction of repeatedly retrying the same simple task, and building a full game around the idea. He saw its visuals as paying homage to the Nintendo Entertainment System without "completely ripping them off" as Flappy Bird had done, and summarised the game as a "decent pick-up-and-play iOS title". 
Prasenjit Ghosh (born 1 June 1990) is an Indian footballer who last played as a goalkeeper for DSK Shivajians in the I-League. 
This biographical article related to Indian association football is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Frederick County, Maryland has a half-day bank holiday every November 23 to commemorate Repudiation Day. The Maryland Manual states on page 329 that the General Assembly of 1894 made November 23 a bank half-holiday in Frederick County, under the title of "Repudiation Day," in commemoration of the repudiation of the Stamp Act in 1765. 
Each year, the Frederick Chapter of the National Society of the Daughters of the American Revolution (DAR) hosts a tea party to celebrate Repudiation Day. Tea and crumpets are served, and the Clerk of the Court reads the original proclamation passed by the judges and the Maryland Provincial Assembly in November 1765. 
The house on Record Street (behind the current City Hall), where the Repudiation decision was made, has since been demolished. 
In 1904, a plaque listing the names of the twelve men who repudiated the Stamp Act was placed in the Frederick County Courthouse by the Frederick Chapter of the DAR. The plaque can be seen on the right side of the vestibule of the courthouse.  
Memorialized on that plaque are: Thomas Beatty, Peter Bainbridge, Josiah Beall, Samuel Beall, William Blair, James Dickson, Andrew Heugh, Charles Jones, William Luckett, David Lynn, Thomas Price and Joseph Smith.  
SOCOM 3 U.S. Navy SEALs is a tactical shooter video game developed by Zipper Interactive and published by Sony Computer Entertainment exclusively for PlayStation 2. It is the sequel to SOCOM II: U.S. Navy SEALs. 
The online servers for this game, along with other PlayStation 2 and PlayStation Portable SOCOM titles, were shut down on August 31, 2012. 
SOCOM 3 U.S. Navy SEALs is a third-person tactical shooter. There are 14 different single-player missions. SOCOM 3 U.S. Navy SEALs is playable on five difficulty levels.  At the start, the player can only choose from three of these.  If the player completes the game on Commander, they can unlock the Captain difficulty level (which unlocks the Admiral difficulty level upon successful completion). 
Every mission has primary, secondary, bonus, and crosstalk objectives - which are compatible with the Sony PSP game SOCOM: U.S. Navy SEALs Fireteam Bravo. 
In the South Asian missions "Killjoy" and "Simple" are replaced by British Special Boat Service operatives "Flash" and "Chopper". In these missions the player battles a piracy organization called "The Fist and Fire". 
The last missions take place in Poland where the SEALs battle a well funded, ultra-nationalist terrorist organization called the New Slavic Order (NSO). In these missions "Flash" and "Chopper" are replaced by GROM operatives "Deadpan" and "Coldkill". 
The game is situated in Poland, South Asia and North Africa. The South Asia area of operation was originally specified as Bangladesh, but was changed after a complaint from the Bangladeshi government. 
The first Map Pack was released for a free two-week trial on June 27, 2006. After the two-week trial, players had the opportunity to purchase the map pack through the SOCOM Store in the SOCOM community section. Two more map packs were released containing maps from SOCOM and SOCOM 2.[citation needed] 
SOCOM 3 U.S. Navy SEALs received "generally positive" reviews, according to review aggregator Metacritic. 
Fujimidai Station consists of an elevated island platform serving two tracks, with an additional outer track on either side for non-stop services. 
Station numbering was introduced on all Seibu Railway lines during fiscal 2012, with Fujimidai Station becoming "SI08". 
Through-running to and from Yokohama and Motomachi-Chukagai via the Tokyu Toyoko Line and Minatomirai Line commenced on 16 March 2013. 
In fiscal 2013, the station was the 42nd busiest on the Seibu network with an average of 24,967 passengers daily. 
Carabus exiguus is a species of black-coloured ground beetle in the Carabinae subfamily that is endemic to China. 
Robert Alan Person (born October 6, 1969) is a former Major League Baseball pitcher who played nine seasons in Major League Baseball: two for the New York Mets, two and a half for the Toronto Blue Jays, three and a half for the Philadelphia Phillies, and only seven games pitched for the Boston Red Sox in the last year of his career. 
Person was drafted by the Cleveland Indians in the 25th round of the 1989 Major League Baseball Draft and eventually traded to the Chicago White Sox in 1991. In the 1992 MLB expansion draft, the Florida Marlins drafted him 47th overall, he then became a free agent, and signed again with the Marlins. 
In 1994, Person was traded from the Marlins to the New York Mets, who, in 1996, traded him to the Blue Jays for John Olerud. Person became a Phillie in 1999 when the Blue Jays swapped him for Paul Spoljaric. Granted free agency after the 2002 season, he joined the Red Sox for a short and unsuccessful stint. 
Person tried joining the White Sox out of spring training in 2004 and 2005, but was unsuccessful. Injuries were the Achilles heel (quite literally), preventing Person from achieving sustained success. 
Before Person's grand slam, Jeff Juden was the last Phillies pitcher to hit a grand slam: August 25, 1995, against the Los Angeles Dodgers. Randy Lerch had been the last Phillies pitcher before Person to hit two home runs in a game, a feat that he accomplished on September 30, 1978. 
Person played college baseball for the University of Arkansas.  He played high school baseball at University City High School in St. Louis. 
Lee was privately educated at Oundle and then at St John's College, Cambridge. He was the son of a London-based builder, Henry Lee, described as coming from Chiswell Street in Finsbury but later settling in Balham; John Lee's younger half-brother, Frederick, 15 years younger, was also a first-class cricketer, playing for Cambridge University, Surrey and other amateur sides. 
Lee played very little cricket in 1849 but returned, without distinction, in 1850 in eight first-class games, including an appearance for the All-England side, and another in the Gentlemen v Players series. He also played in a remarkable South v North match which was scheduled for three days but completed in one day with John Wisden taking all 10 South wickets, including Lee's, in the second innings. He did not play first-class cricket after 1850. 
Her family were farmers and Morales spent her youth farming and herding llamas. Esther Morales, who had to leave elementary school when she was just 8-years old, was also responsible for raising her younger brothers, including Evo, when their mother died. Later in life, then-President Evo Morales said that he viewed her as his own mother. 
Esther Morales continued to work in agriculture into adulthood. She eventually moved to Oruro, Bolivia, where she sold groceries and llama meat from a small store located in her home. Morales married Ponciano Willcarani, a musician, with whom she had three children - Ademar, Marcelo, and Roger. 
Observers noted that the appointment of his sister to acting First Lady indicated that President Morales wanted to focus on the poor and Indigenous peoples in Bolivia. The Daily Telegraph wrote in March 2006 that, "Her elevation is a strong indication that her brother aims to define his period in power as the peasant presidency. Dona Esther is expected to represent the feminine side of his project, to become a mother figure to the poor." 
In the 2000s and 2010s, Esther Morales actively participated in official domestic and international events as acting first lady in support of her brother's government. She met with foreign dignitaries, traveled to South Korea, and represented Bolivia at a women's conference in the United Kingdom. Morales also spoke in favor of Bolivia's maritime claims to territory in neighboring Chile. 
Despite the president's public reversal, Esther Morales continued to serve as the acting first lady (or its equivalent) for several years, though in a diminished captivity. Morales retired from public life during the later years of her brother's presidency. 
During the November 2019 Bolivian political crisis, which resulted in the exile of President Evo Morales, demonstrators set fire to Esther Morales' small home and store in Oruro. Esther Morales also fled the country following her brother's resignation on 10 November 2019. She briefly stayed in Mexico before returning to Bolivia. 
Esther Morales died from complications of COVID-19 on Sunday, 16 August 2020, at the Oruro hospital at the age of 70. She was survived by her husband, Ponciano Willcarani and their three sons, Ademar, Marcelo, and Roger. Morales was buried in her hometown of Orinoca. 
Flogging is a lawful sentence under Shari'a law in Afghanistan for crimes such as adultery, which may be punished with 100 lashes of a whip. 
Courts have also ordered flogging for alcohol use, although a BBC report has claimed that this is rare. 
ADIVIMA's work to assist survivors falls into three main categories: Human rights, socioeconomic development, and community organization. 
ADIVIMA works with leaders from the surrounding rural communities to encourage participation in local and national government.  ADIVIMA sponsors workshops to train male, female, and youth community leaders in how to affectively assert their rights and work with the larger government structure. 
The institute's primary mission is to promote "interest in and understanding of international affairs, including politics, economics and international law". The current National President of the AIIA is Allan Gyngell AO. The current National Executive Director is Dr Bryce Wakefield. 
During the 1970s, when Australian foreign policy and the Asia-Pacific region were undergoing considerable change, the institute failed to expand. Gough Whitlam, the Australian Prime Minister at the time, wrote a message to the institute in 1972 that actively encouraged it to help inform public opinion on the rapid changes underway in Australia's neighbourhood. 
Robert J. Garagiola (born September 5, 1972) is an American lawyer and former politician from the state of Maryland. A Democrat, he had represented District 15 in north-western Montgomery County in the Maryland State Senate. 
Garagiola was born in Warren, Michigan to Ken and Marge Garagiola. In 1979, he and his family moved to the suburbs of Indianapolis, Indiana.  In 1981, his family moved to the suburbs of St. Louis, Missouri. At age 10, his family moved, again, to Oceanside, California, a northern suburb of San Diego. On September 5, 1988, his family moved once more to Cape May County, New Jersey. 
After graduating from Ocean City High School in 1990, Rob attended Rutgers College in New Brunswick, New Jersey. In 1994, he received his B.S. in Political Science. During his years as an undergraduate, Rob joined Phi Kappa Psi fraternity, served as the Rutgers Chapter president in 1993 and District 1 Archon from 1994 to 1995. He is a graduate of The George Washington University Law School. 
In 1994, Rob moved to Germantown, Maryland, with his college girlfriend. Shortly thereafter, they married and had three children. 
He was a U.S. Army Reserves paratrooper, 1995-2001, attaining the rank of sergeant. He was entitled to wear the parachutist badge (2000) and Commendation Medal (2001). 
He was admitted to the bar in 2001, and is licensed to practice in law in Maryland, the District of Columbia, before the U.S. Supreme Court, United States District Court for the District of Maryland, and the U.S. Court of Appeals, 4th Circuit. He practices Business Law, Real estate law, and Employment Law. 
Bloggers speculated Garagiola might become a candidate for Congress in Maryland's 8th congressional district should current Congressman Chris Van Hollen seek another office. 
On November 1, 2011, Garagiola announced his run for the newly redistricted Maryland's 6th congressional district, held by 10-term incumbent Republican Roscoe G. Bartlett. He secured endorsements from Governor Martin O'Malley, Senate President Thomas V. Mike Miller Jr. and House Minority Whip Steny H. Hoyer. In the primary election of April 3, 2012 he lost by 17% to a political newcomer John K. Delaney. 
In June 2013, Garagiola announced that he would retire on August 31, 2013. As he retired before the end of his term, Brian Feldman was appointed to fill his seat for the remainder of the term. 
Yale is a city in Payne County, Oklahoma, United States. The population was 1,227 at the 2010 census, a decline of 8.6 percent from the figure of 1,342 in 2000. 
On September 23, 1913, an oil well on the Randle farm produced a gusher. An even larger gusher began producing a month later. More discoveries followed. By the end of 1914, the combined Yale and Cushing fields were producing 220,000 barrels a day. The town boomed, attaining a population of 2,601 by the census of 1920. 
The primary source of Yale's water supply is Lone Chimney Lake. The lake's level has been declining for several years because of prolonged drought conditions and high water consumption of water by Yale and other Oklahoma towns that rely on this lake as their primary source. 
As of the census of 2010, there were 1,227 people living in the city.  The population density was 1,473.3 people per square mile (569.4/km2).  There were 604 housing units at an average density of 670 per square mile (259/km2).  The racial makeup of the city was 87.63% White, 6.93% Native American, 0.30% Asian, 0.15% from other races, and 4.99% from two or more races. Hispanic or Latino of any race were 0.98% of the population. 
There were 529 households, out of which 32.1% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 51.0% were married couples living together, 10.6% had a female householder with no husband present, and 32.1% were non-families. 30.2% of all households were made up of individuals, and 14.6% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 2.47 and the average family size was 3.04. 
In the city, the population was spread out, with 26.7% under the age of 18, 10.3% from 18 to 24, 25.6% from 25 to 44, 20.0% from 45 to 64, and 17.5% who were 65 years of age or older. The median age was 36 years. For every 100 females, there were 91.2 males. For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 88.1 males. 
The median income for a household in the city was $23,403, and the median income for a family was $30,714. Males had a median income of $26,630 versus $15,813 for females. The per capita income for the city was $11,346. About 15.7% of families and 19.5% of the population were below the poverty line, including 22.3% of those under age 18 and 13.5% of those age 65 or over. 
2bex: CRYSTAL STRUCTURE OF PLACENTAL RIBONUCLEASE INHIBITOR IN COMPLEX WITH HUMAN EOSINOPHIL DERIVED NEUROTOXIN AT 2A RESOLUTION 
Bologna School is a term for the group of composers active in Bologna in the mid-late 17th century; most were associated with the church of Saint Petronius or the Accademia Filarmonica. They include Cazzati, Perti, G. B. Vitali, Torelli and Corelli (who had Bolognese links although he mainly worked in Rome); the school is associated with sacred music and particularly with the rise of the instrumental concerto and sonata, including music for trumpet and strings, a Bolognese speciality. 
Elena Clare Johnson (born 2 November 1985) is a badminton player from Guernsey who competed in the Island Games since 2001 and the Commonwealth Games five times. 
In 2010, Johnson attempted to find a doubles partner for the 2011 Island Games in Gayle Lloyd. As Lloyd was deemed just short of the permanent residence status required to compete for Guernsey in the games, Johnson did not compete in women's doubles at the 2011 games. 
For the 2021 Island Games in Guernsey, Johnson will be serving as player-manager for the Guernsey Badminton Association. 
You and Others is the second album by British-based band, Vega4. It follows on five years after their debut album, Satellites. It was produced by former Compulsion guitarist Jacknife Lee, and released on October 30, 2006 on Sony BMG. 
Nivaldo Alves Freitas Santos (born 10 July 1988), known as Nivaldo, is a Cape Verdean professional footballer who plays as a left midfielder and left back for Anadia. 
The 108th Virginia General Assembly was the meeting of the legislative branch of the Virginia state government from 1914 to 1916, after the 1913 state elections. It convened in Richmond for two sessions. 
Marco Andreas Streng is a German businessman, and the chief executive officer and co-founder of Genesis Group, a cryptocurrency business based in Iceland that is one of the largest bitcoin and ether mining operations. In 2016 he founded the Logos Fund, the first regulated fund for bitcoin and cryptocurrency mining in the world. 
Marco Streng was raised in the German state of Bavaria. He studied mathematics at the Ludwig Maximilian University of Munich but left before graduating.[non-primary source needed] His interest in cryptocurrencies and blockchain technology developed while he was at university when he set up a mining operation in his student accommodation that was copied by other students. The operation ended when the electricity bill arrived. 
In 2016, Streng founded the Logos Fund, registered with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission, that was described by Reuters as the first regulated fund for bitcoin and cryptocurrency mining in the world. He is the vice-chairman and co-founder of Hive Blockchain Technologies Limited, and the joint founder with the British technology investor Christopher Harborne of Singular AI Consulting Limited. 
Opposing Viewpoints is a series of books on current issues which seeks to explore the varying opinions in a balanced pros/cons debate.  The series attempts to encourage critical thinking and issue awareness by providing opposing views on contentious issues. The online versions are managed by Cengage Gale and the print versions are available through Rosen publishing. 
Each book features black and white illustrations and cartoons, bibliographies, glossaries, chronologies, indexes, activities, and discussion questions.  They are published by Greenhaven Press and are heavily used in both school and public library collections. 
A review of the online database, Opposing Viewpoints Resource Center, reads, "The print series has long been a staple in secondary school and young adult collections for research and debate preparation on hot topics in social studies and science." 
Christine Nasso of Greenhaven Press told Booklist, "When we learned our customers wanted series content to be made available in a fully searchable database, we responded with the Opposing Viewpoints Resource Center". 
In 2017, Gale offered a Chrome extension to help students identify its Opposing Viewpoints in Context results in Google searches. 
This article about a location in Hama Governorate, Syria is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Xanthophyllum parvifolium is a tree in the family Polygalaceae. The specific epithet parvifolium is from the Latin meaning "small leaves". 
The Saint Returns is a collection of two mystery novellas by Fleming Lee, continuing the adventures of the sleuth Simon Templar a.k.a. "The Saint", created by Leslie Charteris. This book was first published in the United States in 1968 by The Crime Club, and in the United Kingdom in 1969 by Hodder and Stoughton. 
Although credited to Leslie Charteris on the front cover, Fleming Lee was credited with writing the novellas, which were adaptations of episodes from the 1962-69 television series The Saint. Charteris served in an editorial capacity. 
See guidelines for writing about novels. Further suggestions might be found on the article's talk page.
After a review by the Local Government Boundary Commission for England, the number of seats on the council was reduced from 48 single-member wards, to a 40-member council, consisting of 38 single member wards, and one double-member ward. 
Dolcoath mine (Cornish: Bal Dorkoth) was a copper and tin mine in Camborne, Cornwall, England, United Kingdom. Its name derives from the Cornish for 'Old Ground', and it was also affectionately known as The Queen of Cornish  Mines. The site is north-west of Carn Brea. Dolcoath Road runs between the A3047 road and Chapel Hill. The site is south of this road. 
Of around 470 copper-producing mines in Cornwall and Devon, Dolcoath became the fifth largest. But as depth increased the copper died out, and by 1832 the mine was in danger of closing. However the mine captain, Charles Thomas, was convinced that tin ore would be found deeper down and after disagreements with the shareholders his faith was repaid and the first tin dividend was paid in 1853. 
At the subsequent inquest, Captain Josiah Thomas said that the working party must have removed some of the old props before putting in the new ones, but this was contradicted by one of the survivors who reported that the men were doing nothing at the time to cause the fall. 
Because of its success, the mine paid frequent dividends to its shareholders, and its shares, which were nicknamed 'Dollies', were among the most sought-after of the industry. 
Ammotrophus cyclius is a species of sand dollar of the family Arachnoididae. Their external skeleton, known as a test, is covered with spines. It belongs to the genus Ammotrophus and lives in the seas off southern Australia. Ammotrophus cyclius was first scientifically described in 1928 by Hubert Clark. 
Lulsgate Aerodrome was a motor racing circuit at the former RAF Lulsgate Bottom airfield, which in 1957 subsequently became Bristol Airport. The airfield was turned into a racing circuit in 1949. Lulsgate hosted two race meetings, in 1949 and 1950. The circuit mainly hosted sports car events, however a Formula III race featured in both 1949 and 1950. 
Lend Me Your Wife is a 1935 British comedy film directed by W.P. Kellino and starring Henry Kendall, Kathleen Kelly and Cyril Smith. It was made at Elstree Studios as a quota quickie. 
This article related to a British comedy film of the 1930s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
No official tournament took place, because the Peru national football team competed at the 1936 Berlin Olympic Games.[citation needed] 
Nationality words link to articles with information on the nation's poetry or literature (for instance, Irish or France). 
This article about a Dutch  People's Party for Freedom and Democracy politician is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about a Member of the European Parliament from the Netherlands is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
After differences with his authoritarian father, Simplot left school in the eighth grade at age 14 in 1923. He then worked on a farm near Declo in Cassia County. He developed a low cost method for feeding hogs when the market fell, feeding wild horse meat and potatoes to his hogs. When the market recovered he sold at a profit and got into the potato and vegetable processing business. 
By World War II, the J. R. Simplot Company had become the largest shipper of fresh potatoes in the nation. 
Simplot retired as president of his company in 1973, but remained as chairman until 1994. He held the title of Chairman Emeritus until his death in 2008. Simplot received an honorary degree from Utah State University in Logan in 2001, honoring him for his many contributions to the agricultural industry of America, particularly the Intermountain West. 
Further enhancing his enormous wealth, the J.R. Simplot Company provided startup capital in the early 1980s for the fledgling Micron Technology, a Boise-based manufacturer of computer memory chips. Additionally, he invested heavily in Remington Oil. 
In 1961, Simplot financed the Brundage Mountain ski area near McCall, two hours north of Boise. The Simplot Company sold its 50% interest in Brundage in April 2006 to the longtime co-owner, the DeBoer family. In the early 1950s, Simplot was the benefactor to the fledgling Bogus Basin ski area near Boise when it had financial difficulties; the base area lodge is named in his honor. 
In 1995, the J.R. Simplot Company expanded into Australia, acquiring iconic food brands like Birds Eye, Leggo's, Chiko, and Edgell. 
He and his second wife, Esther Becker (b.1934), a former opera singer, met in the mid 1960s in New York. He was on a business trip and she was working as a receptionist for the Henry Phipps Foundation; they were married in 1972. 
Before his death, Simplot and his wife Esther resided in the Grove Hotel building in downtown Boise, a few blocks from the company's headquarters. The couple donated their hilltop home, in Boise's north end, to the state of Idaho in late 2004 for use as a governor's mansion. (Known as "The Idaho House," it was returned to the Simplot family in 2013, and demolished in January 2016.) 
On January 1, 2007, while attending the Fiesta Bowl in Glendale, Arizona, with his wife and son, Simplot fell from a motorized scooter and suffered a cranial hematoma. He was taken to St. Joseph's Hospital and Medical Center in Phoenix, where he spent his 98th birthday. Simplot returned to Idaho several days later for further rehabilitation. 
Simplot died suddenly at his home at age 99 on May 25, 2008, with his wife at his side, following a bout of pneumonia from which he appeared to be recovering. His death occurred moments after he had invited a friend to his home to play cards. 
Simplot was survived by his wife, two sons, Don and Scott, and his daughter, Gay; his eldest son, Richard (Dick), died in 1993 at age 59. He was also survived by 18 grandchildren, 25 great-grandchildren, and one great-great-grandchild. He was interred at Morris Hill Cemetery in Boise. 
In 1996, Simplot was inducted into the Hall of Great Westerners of the National Cowboy & Western Heritage Museum. 
As in Sale, the game was split into four rounds. Contestants begin with a score of $20. When Ed Phillips asks a question, the first contestant to buzz in had the chance to answer the question; if correct, he or she gained $5; if wrong, he or she lost $5. Phillips revealed the answer immediately if the contestant answered incorrectly; no other contestants were given the opportunity to answer. Contestants needed not wait until Phillips had finished asking the question before buzzing in. 
Round Two: After the first few questions, the second Gift Shop was offered. This item was offered for $10, and usually had a retail value of between $3,000 and $7,000; this could again be accompanied by a cash incentive, or the $10 price could be lowered. More questions were asked, and then the second "Who am I?". After the "Who am I?", three more questions were asked before another 20-second sprint round. This ended round two. 
Famous Faces: Correct "Who am I?" answers chose one of nine boxes, identified by celebrities' faces. As before, most of the faces concealed small prizes, but there were cash values (also known as Money Cards) which were added directly to the player's score: 
The new Temptation series had also added three special selections. All of these selections were present from the beginning of the game, however the Lock Out and Turbo were removed from the board in the third round: 
In each case, the next three questions were never part of a fast money round. This was also the reason why the Lock Out and Turbo items were removed from the board for the final "Who am I?". 
On occasions throughout the year, Temptation would break from its normal running style for a week and run a celebrity edition. In most cases these celebrities were playing for home viewers, where the normal prizes and money cards were present. Sometimes the celebrities would be playing for charities, where instead of small prizes cash donations to their charity were given (usually between $500 and $5,000). The money cards still remained. 
When Temptation premiered on 30 May 2005, there were some slight format differences from later series: 
In the 2005 end game Ten in a Row, contestants had to answer ten questions consecutively within the space of one minute. The amount of cash won increased through a non-linear scale: 
Any incorrect, passed answer or questions that were not answered in three seconds reset the value to $0, and a contestant who didn't reach $100,000 won whatever value they had when time expired. 
In 2005, six-night champions could keep all five prizes or return for one more night. If a contestant won on night seven, then they would win all the prizes, the money in their cash account (which was not doubled), and $500,000 in gold bullion. Theoretically, the highest cash jackpot a contestant could win was $600,000 ($1,100,000 including the gold bullion). 
Carry-over champions would also be able to leave the show at any time with money won during Ten in a Row won up to that point in addition to the prize or prizes to which he or she had been entitled. 
The format for the bonus round was modified in 2006. First-night champions would automatically be given a $50,000 cash jackpot, which could not be won until at least their seventh night. The Ten in a Row segment was changed so that ten correct answers would add another $50,000 to the jackpot. There was no need to correctly answer the questions consecutively, but at least ten answers had to be answered correctly before time ran out. 
Special series were often run featuring celebrities, sports personalities, and former champions. The format varied from special to special, depending upon the number of contestants available, and some specials had seen celebrities compete in pairs. Prizes for these specials were either donated to a charity of the celebrity's choice, or awarded to randomly chosen home viewers. 
A Temptation board game was released by Crown and Andrews in 2006. The following contents are in the board game: playing board, electronic umpire (an electronic item that determines which player buzzed first), six buttons, a 'Question and Answer' book, six score markers, 16 Show Prize cards, 24 Leader Prize cards, 26 Winner Prize cards, card tray and the rules. A picture of the game can be found here: 
Additionally, a DVD game was released by Imagination in 2007, featuring series host Ed Phillips, before the show was scrapped. 
A Big Red Buzzer (or Temptation Buzzer) was released which includes a ring-in sound effect and a three-second timer with a flashing light. 
It has full marginalia with marks of the text's division, with liturgical notes and scholia. Only one leaf of the codex had lost. 
The manuscript was brought to England in 1675 by Philip Traherne, English Chaplain at Smyrna, who made first collation of its text. The collation was corrected by Scrivener in 1845. It was called Codex Ephesinus, because of place of its origin. 
Scholz had noted that "familiae plerumque adhaeret Constantinopolitanae" (today this family is called as the Byzantine text-type). Scrivener opposed that Scholz missed many remarkable readings of the codex, so his opinion is not reliable, but Tischendorf confirmed Scholz's opinion that it represents Constantinopolitanian text. 
According to Scrivener there are a few Greek manuscripts of the New Testament from the 12th century "will be found to equal it in weight and importance". The manuscript presents "a text full of interest, and much superior to that of the mass manuscripts of its age". According to Gregory text of the manuscript is good. 
According to the Claremont Profile Method it represents textual cluster M27 in Luke 1, Luke 10, and Luke 20, as a core member. To this cluster belong also manuscripts like Minuscule 569, 692, 750. 
It has many unique textual variants (e.g. Matthew 16:11; Luke 6:49; 10:24; 19:21), many of them are supported by manuscripts like Codex Vaticanus, Codex Bezae, Codex Cyprius, and Lectionary 183. Sometimes it stands alone or nearly alone among manuscript examined by Scrivener (Luke 10:22; 17:26; 24:18.27; John 1:42; 2:17; 3:25; 8:3; 12:2).  The text has many corrections made by a later hand. 
The manuscript once belonged to the Archbishop of Ephesus. It was brought to England in 1675 by Philip Traherne, English Chaplain at Smyrna in 1669-1674. In 1679 the manuscript was presented by him to the Lambeth Palace Library, along with collation, where it is held to the present day (shelf number 528). 
Scrivener in 1845 used collation of Traheron and compared with the text of the manuscript, and revised it, in regard to changes made by later correctors. Gregory saw the codex in 1883. 
Everybody's Happy Now is a World War I song written by James Kendis, James Brockman, and Nat Vincent in 1918. It was published by Kendis-Brockman Music Co. and written for voice and piano. 
The sheet music is located at the Pritzker Military Museum & Library as well as the Library of Congress. 
This is a list of past and present personalities associated with the television and radio arms of the Canadian Broadcasting Corporation. 
This article about a castle, palace or manor house in Latvia is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The film stars Vijay and Suriya, while Simran, Kausalya, Raghuvaran, Shanthi Krishna, Baby Jennifer, Karan, Vivek, Manivannan and Prakash Raj played the supporting roles. Deva and K. V. Anand handled the film's soundtrack and cinematography respectively. It was dubbed into Telugu as Mukha Mukhi. The film was a commercial success at the box office. 
The story starts off with Raghu, a passport-issuing officer, and his wife Shanthi, who live in Chennai. Raghu, being an honest man, tells Shanthi that he cheated on her with a coworker when he was in Goa. She immediately leaves for her mother's house. Raghu, being a transformed gentleman, tries to stop her by apologizing, but in vain. 
Raghu's brother Vijay, being a good and supportive brother, and Shanthi's brother Suriya, being a non-emotive but supporting brother, meet in a cinema theater. Vijay, being  a righteous brother, blames Shanthi to be the cause of the problem, and Suriya blames Raghu for the same. They keep on fighting at every chance. Meanwhile, both Vijay and Suriya find their own girlfriends in Akhila and Asha respectively and fall in love. 
As Suriya reaches home, Vijay follows them. Once Vijay reaches home, he throws away Sona's hearing device before the bomb goes off.  The movie ends with Vijay and Suriya becoming best friends again after a long time and reconciling with their lady loves, and Raghu and Shanthi also embrace each other with Sona. 
The film was the first Tamil project signed by Simran who was signed by Vasanth after he was impressed with her looks in Tere Mere Sapne, though Once More and VIP released earlier. Vasanth signed on Kausalya after seeing and being impressed with her picture at a jewellery shop and was unaware that she had already made her debut in the hit film Kaalamellam Kadhal Vaazhga. 
The director revealed he had great difficulty in filming the song "Engengae", as crowds in Kolkata refused to co-operate with the technical team. The filming mainly took place in and around Trivandrum and Kochi, with some minority portions being shot in Chennai. 
The film went on to win two Tamil Nadu State Film Awards for 1997 with the child artiste, Jennifer, securing the Best Child Star award for her performance. Harini also won the Best Female Playback Singer award for her rendition of "Manam Virumbuthae" in the album aged just 18. In 2000, the film was dubbed and released in the Telugu language as Mukhamukhi. 
The soundtrack consists of 6 songs, composed by Deva. All lyrics written by Vairamuthu. The song "Akila Akila" is based on Bob Marley's "Buffalo Soldier". 
Camilo Becerra (born 10 October 1980) is a three-time Olympic freestyle swimmer from Colombia. He swam from Colombia at the 2000, 2004 and 2008 Olympics. 
He graduated from Southern Methodist University in 2006 with a degree in Finance and Economics. Becerra swims for the Fort Worth Area Swim team in Fort Worth Texas and is coached by Ron Forrest. 
This biographical article related to a Colombian swimmer is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
A decree issued by Hitler on 8 October 1939 provided for the annexation of western Polish areas and the Free City of Danzig. A separate by-law stipulated the inclusion of the area around Suwalki (the Suwalki triangle). The remaining block of territory remained under military occupation until it was decreed by Hitler on 12 October to establish the General Government, which came into force on 26 October. 
The Springfield Model 1869 was one of several model "trapdoor Springfields", which used the trapdoor breechblock design developed by Erskine S. Allin. 
Originally, the trapdoor Springfields were created to convert Model 1863 Springfield rifled muskets to breech-loading rifles at a relatively low cost. 
The Model 1869 Cadet Rifle was a shortened version of the Springfield Model 1868. It had a 29.5 inch barrel, compared to the 32.5 inch barrel of the Model 1868, and had an overall length of 48.8 inches. The Model 1869 was produced using Model 1868 receivers and breech blocks, but used a stock that was manufactured specifically for the Model 1869. The Model 1869 had a narrower buttplate and the stock around the barrel was thinner than on the Model 1868. 
Delgany has a walking trail called the Delgany Heritage Trail, which includes a number of historic and wildlife sights.  There are other walking trails in Kindlestown Woods and the Glen of the Downs. 
The village used to have three pubs. The Wicklow Arms has been sold for redevelopment and the Delgany Inn is now home to a baker, grocer, fishmonger and restaurant.[citation needed] The only one which still operates as a pub is the Horse and Hound, on the main street, Convent Road, which is also home to a butcher, a delicatessen, and the local shop.[citation needed] 
A mediaeval castle, possibly dating to the 9th century, appears to have been occupied into the 18th century. Excavation established that the south and west walls represented a replacement wall built in the 19th century. Kindlestown has connections back to the year 1020 with Ugaire, son of Douling, King of Leinster and Citric, Norse King of Dublin.[citation needed] 
An advertisement for a directory enquiry company was filmed at the old Patterson's Garage in the area. Several episodes of the television show Moon Boy were filmed in Christ Church. In the 1990s, it was the location for the recording of Tori Amos's third album Boys For Pele. 
James Ryan (born 12 May 1945) is a Scottish former footballer who played as a winger. Born in Stirling, Ryan spent the majority of his professional career in England, starting with Manchester United before moving to Luton Town in 1970. In 1976, he moved to the United States, where he played for the Dallas Tornado in the North American Soccer League (NASL) and the Wichita Wings in the Major Indoor Soccer League (MISL). 
1Includes other competitive competitions, including Charity Shield, Watney Cup and the Intercontinental Cup. 
Michael Horus Hall (born June 5, 1984) is an American-Irish former professional basketball player, who last played for CB Tizona of the Liga EBA. 
Undrafted after his senior season, Hall joined the Tulsa 66ers of the NBA Development League. On February 28, 2007, the Washington Wizards signed him to a ten-day contract due to injuries of forwards Antawn Jamison and Caron Butler. He was signed to a second ten-day contract shortly afterwards, and on March 21, the team signed him for the rest of the season. He appeared in two games for the Wizards and was released in late October, 2007 due to salary cap reasons. 
In January 2012, he signed with Fuenlabrada of Spain for the rest of the season. On November 29, 2012, he signed with Maccabi Ashdod of Israel. In his second game with Maccabi, he got injured and missed the rest of the season. 
In September 2014, Hall signed with La Bruixa d'Or Manresa of Spain. In October 2014, he parted ways with Manresa, after playing only two games. On November 26, 2014, he signed with Juventud Sionista of Argentina. He left Sionista after only three games. On February 24, 2015, he signed with Aries Trikala of the Greek Basket League. On April 17, 2015, he left Trikala and signed with Scaligera Verona of the Italian Serie A2 Basket for the rest of the season. 
Nurdin Bilal Ali (born July 16, 1990), better known by his stage name SHETTA, is currently one of the most successful music artists in Tanzania, with a number of his songs reaching peak positions on various music charts in the country and across the African continent. His single "Namjua" dominated several charts at peak position for several weeks in a row in 2016. The song's video had one million views on YouTube as of 2016. 
Shetta was born at Amana Hospital, Ilala Municipality in the city of Dar es Salaam. He grew up at Ilala Mchikichini Boma and attended his primary education at Boma Primary School before joining Benjamin Mkapa Secondary School in 2008. 
Shetta discovered his music talents in 2009, when he was a dancer in a local group called Misifa Camp, under a popular singer and producer, Dully Sykes, for whom Shetta later became a backup singer. Eventually, Shetta managed to form his own musical group, Dar Stamina. 
He released his debut single, "Mi Naplay", featuring one of Tanzania's hip-hop legends, MwanaFA. The fact that MwanaFA, who is an early name in the East African country's hip-hop scene, agreed to work with such a new artist, indicated that Shetta had star qualities, and was going to have a brilliant music career in the future. Like elsewhere in the world, established artists in Tanzania would only agree to collaborate with new artists who show great potential. 
In 2010, Shetta officially released another single that introduced him well to the Tanzanian music scene, named "Nimechokwa", featuring leading local R&B star Belle9. The hit song earned him credibility and provided him with several opportunities to perform across Tanzania. 
A year later, Shetta released another hit song, "Mdandanda", featuring two household names in Tanzania's bongo flava scene, Dully Sykes and Tundaman. 
In 2012, he released another hit, "Nidanganye", featuring one of the biggest names in African music, Tanzania's own Diamond Platnumz. 
In the same year, he released another single "Bonge la Bwana", featuring a top local female artist, Linah, followed by another hit song, "Sina Imani", featuring Rich Mavoko. 
After a short hiatus, Shetta came up with another song in 2014, "Kerewa", featuring Diamond Platnumz, again. This single was such a huge success that it made its way to the MTV Africa Top 10, the continent's definitive top ten countdown. The chart is usually frequented by top artists from South Africa and Nigeria, and for an artist like Shetta who had been on the scene for barely five years, it meant Tanzania had now a new force to be reckoned with. 
A year later, his successes caught the attention of music industry executives beyond Tanzanian borders, and he was signed to one of the leading record labels in the continent, Spice Africa. There, he had the opportunity to record a song with an international Nigerian music star, Kcee. The hit song, "Shikorobo", became an instant banger which officially introduced Shetta into the mainstream. 
Lakeland Regional High School is a comprehensive regional four-year public high school and school district serving students from the Boroughs of Ringwood and Wanaque (including its Haskell neighborhood), communities in Passaic County, New Jersey, United States, which have a combined population of about 25,000. 
Students come to the high school from the Ringwood Public School District and the Wanaque Borough Schools. Lakeland Regional High School is accredited by the State of New Jersey.[citation needed] 
The district is classified by the New Jersey Department of Education as being in District Factor Group "FG", the fourth-highest of eight groupings. District Factor Groups organize districts statewide to allow comparison by common socioeconomic characteristics of the local districts. From lowest socioeconomic status to highest, the categories are A, B, CD, DE, FG, GH, I and J. 
The high school has 115 professional staff members, with 60% having advanced degrees.  There are 95 teachers, five area supervisors, and four guidance counselors.  Lakeland also has a substance awareness coordinator, a complete child study team, a school nurse, a library-media specialist, an athletic trainer and several teacher aides. 
Before the district was established, students from Ringwood had attended Butler High School. Students from Wanaque had attended Midland Park High School, with estimates that costs would be reduced by 20% once Lakeland HS was completed. 
In the 2000-01 school year, Lakeland Regional High School was recognized as a New Jersey Best Practice School for its S.C.O.P.E., Search, S.T.E.P., and SOAR School-to-Career / Workplace Environment programs. 
For the 1994-95 school year, Lakeland Regional High School was named a "Star School" by the New Jersey Department of Education, the highest honor that a New Jersey school can achieve. 
As a requirement for graduation,  Lakeland students must complete 135 credits, demonstrate mastery of basic skills on the High School Proficiency Assessment (HSPA), and meet a variety of local and state distribution requirements. 
Advanced Placement Program (AP) Courses include AP English Language and Composition, AP United States History, AP United States Government and Politics, AP Calculus AB, AP Computer Science, AP Biology, AP Chemistry, AP Environmental Science, AP Music Theory,  AP European History and AP Spanish Language. 
Honors Courses are offered in English, Algebra 2, Geometry, Pre-calculus, Calculus, Spanish 4 & 5, French 4, Latin 4,  World History, US History, Biology, Chemistry, Physics, Earth Science, and Gifted and Talented Senior Seminar. 
Electives are offered in most of the core subjects. The school provides practical experiences and a range of studies in the area of communication, transportation, energy and manufacturing.  Course offerings are provided in business education and family and consumer sciences.  Fine arts electives include music and art offerings. 
The baseball team won the North I Group II state sectional title in 1962 and 1968, won the Group II title in 1974 vs. Lawrence High School and the Group III state championship in 1976 vs. Ridge High School. The 1974 team finished the season with a 25-3 record after winning the Group II title with a 5-4 victory in the championship game against a Lawrence team that came into the finals unbeaten in its previous 18 games. 
The boys volleyball team won the overall state championship in 1988 (defeating runner-up St. Joseph High School in the final match of the tournament) and 1992 (vs. Bridgewater-Raritan High School). 
In the wake of a $340,000 cut in state aid, the district eliminated the position of principal for the 2019-20 school year in a cost-saving measure. 
 Neill statue Satyagraha was an agitation that took place in Madras Presidency, British India during the Indian Independence Movement. It took place in 1927 demanding the removal of the statue of Colonel James Neill situated at Mount Road (now Anna Salai) in Madras. 
Neill's statue remained in the same place and was moved to the Ripon Building campus for a few years. In 1937, when the newly elected Congress government (under the 1935 act) of C. Rajagopalachari moved it to the Madras museum after a resolution demanding its removal was passed in the Madras Corporation. As of 2021, it still remains in the Anthropology section of the museum. 
tRNA-intron lyase (EC 4.6.1.16, tRNA intron endonuclease, transfer ribonucleate intron endoribonuclease, tRNA splicing endonuclease, splicing endonuclease, tRNATRPintron endonuclease, transfer splicing endonuclease) is an enzyme. This enzyme catalyses the following chemical reaction: 
This enzyme catalyses the final stage in the maturation of tRNA molecules. Its systematic name is pretRNA lyase (intron-removing; cyclic-2',3'-phosphate-forming). 
Originally slated for April 26, 2011, the official release date was pushed back to May 10, 2011; however the band released the album on May 3 to fans who pre-ordered the album from the band's website, and the album was available for sale at the band's concerts prior to May 10. 
All of the songs on the album had previously appeared on Blue October's studio albums, except for the track Colorado 5591, which the band had played at shows for years but never recorded.   The song is about Justin Furstenfeld's experience as a patient in a psychiatric hospital. The versions of the songs that appear on the album were selected by Blue October drummer Jeremy Furstenfeld, who is credited as the album's producer. 
The album's cover is a photo of the marquee at the Paramount Theatre in Austin, Texas taken by Blue October roadie Dave Arnold. 
The album peaked at No. 14 on the Billboard Independent Albums Chart, at No. 22 on the Top Rock Albums Chart, and No. 79 on the Billboard 200. 
The 2019 Rugby World Cup Final was a rugby union match played on 2 November 2019 at the International Stadium Yokohama in Yokohama, Japan. It marked the culmination of the 2019 Rugby World Cup and was played between England and South Africa, a rematch of the 2007 Rugby World Cup Final. 
Assistant referees: Romain Poite (France) Ben O'Keeffe (New Zealand)  Television match official: Ben Skeen (New Zealand)  Sideline official: Nigel Owens (Wales) 
For unknown reasons, Ted DiBiase, who had no music of his own when the game was released, was given Girls in Cars, the theme music for the tag team  Strike Force (Tito Santana & Rick Martel). Andre the Giant, who also had no entrance music, was given the non-entrance WWF theme song Stand Back. 
A scene in the 2008 film The Wrestler features a fictional NES game entitled Wrestle Jam '88. The fully functioning demo features a style inspired by WWF WrestleMania. 
Paratomarctus was one of the last of the Borophaginae and shared its habitat with other canids, including Borophagus, Epicyon, Carpocyon, Aelurodon, and the true canine, Canis lepophagus. Fossils have been uncovered throughout most of the western United States. 
This article related to prehistoric animals from order Carnivora is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Thomas Banks (born April 19, 1949 in New York City) is a theoretical physicist and professor at Rutgers University and University of California, Santa Cruz. 
Their music is a blend of Scandinavian electronic music, Hip hop and classical Arabic, Persian and Turkic music traditions such as Mugam and Ashik. The texts and poetry used are historical and belong to a genre known as Meykhana. Those were found by Zuzu Zakaria at field-trips to Azerbaijan as a part of her MA Thesis for State University in Oslo. Her master's thesis is the only introductory study in English of the genre existing. 
Chitumbo Mwali (born 1986) is a Zambian chess player. He was awarded the tile of International Master in 2007.  
He won the African Junior Chess Championship in 2006, and earned the silver medal on board four in the 2007 All-Africa Games. 
After winning the Zambian Chess World Cup Qualifier in 2021, he qualified to play in the Chess World Cup 2021. Pre-tournament favourite Andrew Kayonde, trailing by 1.5 points with one round to go, pulled out after accusing the other 5 players of  colluding to deliberately lose against Mwali. 
In the first round at the World Cup, Chitumbo lost the first game against the much higher-rated Haik M. Martirosyan before winning the second game to take the encounter to tiebreaks, where he was defeated 2-0 in the rapid games. 
This article about a location in Hama Governorate, Syria is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This riding was created in 1914 from parts of St. Antoine and St. Lawrence ridings. It was initially defined to consist of St. Lawrence and St. George Wards of the city of Montreal. After 1924, it was defined with reference to various streets of Montreal. 
The electoral district was abolished in 1966 when it was redistributed into Saint-Henri, Saint-Jacques and Westmount ridings. 
This biographical article related to a Scottish midfielder is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Born in Auchterderran, Finlay played as a centre half for Bowhill Rovers, East Fife, Clyde and Raith Rovers, making a total of 476 appearances in the Scottish Football League. 
After retiring from playing he became manager of Lochore Welfare. He died in 2014, at which time he had been the longest-living member of East Fife's 'golden era' between the 1930s and 1950s. 
This biographical article related to association football in Scotland, about a defender born in the 1920s, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
At MIT, Watson was a PhD candidate in the laboratory of Klaus Biemann, one of the most notable experts in organic mass spectrometry at the time. As soon as he graduated from MIT, Watson reported for duty in the United States Air Force in the San Francisco Bay area. A friend of his from high school, introduced Watson to Judith Sjoberg. Not long after that, they were married and moved to Brooks Air Base in San Antonio, Texas.  
A friend of his from high school introduced Watson to Judith Sjoberg. Not long after that, they were married and moved to Brooks Air Base in San Antonio, Texas. They had two children in Nashville, Jennifer, born in 1970, and Brent born in 1972.[citation needed] 
This biographical article about an American chemist is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article related to Vietnamese association football is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
It is said that these Chinook salmon had massive amounts of energy reserves. They also produced large amounts of offspring. Bob Heinith of the Columbia River Inter-Tribal Fish Commission stated that June hogs most likely migrated to the sea as very young fish before the age of one. 
Teleiopsis baldiana is a moth of the family Gelechiidae described by William Barnes and August Busck in 1920. It is found in North America, where it has been recorded from California. 
This article related to the moth subfamily Teleiodini is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Mike Sammes Singers remained active into the 1970s, producing recordings for television (The Secret Service) and appearing on the small screen (the Val Doonican Show, 1971). By the mid-1970s, though, the demand for backing vocals had faded considerably, due to the introduction of multi-tracking and synthesizers. On "The Last of the Summer Wine", the Mike Sammes Singers contributed the "Summer Wine" song over the opening credits of the Christmas 1983 episode "Getting Sam Home". 
Sammes died at the age of 73 in May 2001, several months after a fall from which he never fully recovered. Jonny Trunk, of Trunk Records, was able to recover a number of reel-to-reel tapes from Sammes' house (despite it having been ransacked by house clearance), which he went on to compile as Music for Biscuits, so-named because it featured 1960s/1970s advertising jingles for Tuc biscuits, etc.[citation needed] 
The Michael Sammes Singers members included: Mike Sammes, John O'Neill, Irene King, Enid Hurd (Enid Heard), Mike Redway, Ross Gilmour, Valerie Bain, Marion Gay and Mel Todd.[citation needed] 
Wallingford is a town in Rutland County, Vermont, United States. The population was 2,079 at the 2010 census. Wallingford also contains the villages of East Wallingford and South Wallingford. 
At the 2000 census there were 2,274 people, 905 households, and 651 families in the town.  The population density was 52.6 people per square mile (20.3/km2).  There were 1,040 housing units at an average density of 24.1 per square mile (9.3/km2).  The racial makeup of the town was 98.86% White, 0.13% Black or African American, 0.22% Asian, 0.04% Pacific Islander, 0.04% from other races, and 0.70% from two or more races. Hispanic or Latino of any race were 0.53%. 
Of the 905 households 30.8% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 59.0% were married couples living together, 9.1% had a female householder with no husband present, and 28.0% were non-families. 22.9% of households were one person and 10.6% were one person aged 65 or older.  The average household size was 2.49 and the average family size was 2.92. 
The age distribution was 23.4% under the age of 18, 5.8% from 18 to 24, 27.0% from 25 to 44, 30.3% from 45 to 64, and 13.7% 65 or older.  The median age was 42 years. For every 100 females, there were 96.2 males.  For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 94.1 males. 
The median household income was $42,417 and the median family income  was $47,007. Males had a median income of $33,162 versus $24,141 for females. The per capita income for the town was $19,570.  About 3.8% of families and 5.9% of the population were below the poverty line, including 5.1% of those under age 18 and 11.4% of those age 65 or over. 
This biographical article related to a Romanian association football defender is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about a property in Cass County, Missouri on the National Register of Historic Places is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Sveabreen is a glacier between Oscar II Land and James I Land at Spitsbergen, Svalbard. It has a length of 30 kilometer, stretching from Kongsvegpasset at an altitude about 750 meters, and debouching into Nordfjorden. 
Herbert Barber served as state's attorney from 1898 to 1900, a member of the Vermont House of Representatives from 1908 to 1910, and a member of the Vermont State Senate from 1912 to 1914. 
Barber died in Brattleboro on October 5, 1947.  He was buried at Meeting House Hill Cemetery in Brattleboro. 
In 1909, Barber married Florence Whittier of Montpelier.  They were the parents of three children: Wendell, Elizabeth, and Clarence. 
The swan mussel, Anodonta cygnea, is a large species of freshwater mussel, an aquatic bivalve mollusc in the family Unionidae, the river mussels. 
Because of its morphological variability and its wide range of distribution, there are over 500 synonyms for this species. 
Its native distribution is European-Siberian. The geographical distribution of this species is from the British Isles east to Siberia, and south into northern Africa. 
This species is found in rivers and lakes. They have a strong pungent odor and are used by carp fisherman as bait. 
Videonystagmography (VNG) is a technology for testing inner ear and central motor functions, a process known as vestibular assessment. It involves the use of infrared goggles to trace eye movements during visual stimulation and positional changes. VNG can determine whether dizziness is caused by inner ear disease, particularly benign paroxysmal positional vertigo (BPPV), as opposed to some other cause such as low blood pressure or anxiety. 
VNG testing is made up of several components. Patients are asked to wear goggles with sensitive video cameras in them to monitor eye movement. During the first portion of the testing, patients will be required to follow a dot on a screen with their eyes. The dot may go up, down, side to side, or jump around randomly.  
Another portion of the test requires the patient to sit in several different positions, such as lying flat staring up, head to the right, head to the left, body rolled to the right, and body rolled to the left.  
The Presidency of Mahmoud Ahmadinejad consists of the 9th and 10th governments of the Islamic Republic of Iran. Ahmadinejad's government began in August 2005 after his election as the 6th president of Iran and continued after his re-election in 2009. Ahmadinejad left office in August 2013 at the end of his second term. His administration was succeeded by the 11th government, led by Hassan Rouhani. 
Ahmadinejad was not widely known when he entered the presidential election campaign, although he had already made his mark in Tehran for rolling back earlier reforms. He is a member of the Central Council of the Islamic Society of Engineers, but his key political support is inside the Alliance of Builders of Islamic Iran (Abadgaran or Developers). 
Ahmadinejad generally sent mixed signals about his plans for his presidency, perhaps to attract both religious conservatives and the lower economic classes. His campaign slogan was: "It's possible and we can do it". 
In the campaign, he took a populist approach. He emphasized his own modest life, and compared himself with Mohammad Ali Rajai, Iran's second president. Ahmadinejad said he planned to create an "exemplary government for the people of the world" in Iran. He was a "principlist", acting politically based on Islamic and revolutionary principles. One of his goals was "putting the petroleum income on people's tables", meaning Iran's oil profits would be distributed among the poor. 
Ahmadinejad described Ayatollah Mohammad Taghi Mesbah Yazdi, a senior cleric from Qom as his ideological and spiritual mentor. Mesbah founded the  Haghani School of thought in Iran. He and his team strongly supported Ahmadinejad's 2005 presidential campaign. 
Ahmadinejad won 62 percent of the vote in the run-off poll against Akbar Hashemi Rafsanjani. Supreme Leader Ayatollah Khamenei authorized his presidency on 3 August 2005. Ahmedinejad kissed Khamenei's hand during the ceremony to show his loyalty. 
On 23 August 2008, Supreme Leader Ali Khamenei announced that he "sees Ahmadinejad as president in the next five years," a comment interpreted as indicating support for Ahmadinejad's reelection. 39,165,191 ballots were cast in the election on 12 June 2009, according to Iran's election headquarters. Ahmadinejad won 24,527,516 votes, (62.63%). In second place, Mir-Hossein Mousavi, won 13,216,411 (33.75%) of the votes. The election drew unprecedented public interest in Iran. 
The June 12 presidential election ruined the dominance of wealth, political party system and media as tools of the hegemonic system and presented a new role model to the human race. 
While his government had 275 thousand billion toman oil income, the highest in Iranian history, Ahmadinejad's government had the highest budget deficit since the Iranian revolution. 
During his presidency, Ahmadinejad launched a gas rationing plan to reduce the country's fuel consumption. He also instituted cuts in the interest rates that private and public banking facilities could charge. He issued a directive, according to which the Management and Planning Organization should be affiliated to the government. 
In 2008, the government sent the "Family Protection Bill" to the Iranian parliament. Women's rights activists criticized the bill for removing protections from women, such as the requirement that a husband obtain his wife's consent before bringing another wife into the family. 
In April 2007, the Tehran police, which is under Khamenei's supervision, began a crackdown on women with "improper hijab." This led to criticism from associates of Ahmadinejad. 
In 2006, the [Ahmadinejad] government reportedly forced numerous Iranian scientists and university professors to resign or to retire. It has been referred to as "second cultural revolution". The policy has been said to replace old professors with younger ones. Some university professors received letters indicating their early retirement unexpectedly. In November 2006, 53 university professors had to retire from Iran University of Science and Technology. 
One thousand students also protested the day before to denounce the increased pressure on the reformist groups at the university. One week prior, more than two thousand students protested at Tehran University on the country's annual student day, with speakers saying that there had been a crackdown on dissent at universities since Ahmadinejad was elected. 
Ahmadinejad has been criticized for attacking private "plunderers" and "corrupt officials," while engaging in "cronyism and political favouritism". Many of his close associates have been appointed to positions for which they have no obvious qualifications, and "billion dollar no-bid contracts" have been awarded to the Islamic Revolutionary Guard Corps (IRGC), an organization with which he is strongly associated. 
It has been widely alleged in the media that Ahmadinejad, during a 2005 speech, stated that Israel should be "wiped off the map". This phrase is an English idiomatic expression which implies physical destruction. 
According to Juan Cole, a University of Michigan Professor of Modern Middle East and South Asian History, Ahmadinejad's statement was inaccurately translated; Cole suggests that a more accurate translation would be: 
The Imam said that this regime occupying Jerusalem (een rezhim-e ishghalgar-e qods) must [vanish] from the page of time (bayad az safheh-ye ruzgar mahv shavad).
In a June 11, 2006 analysis of the translation controversy, New York Times deputy foreign editor and Israeli resident Ethan Bronner argued that Ahmadinejad had called for Israel to be wiped off the map. After noting the objections of critics such as Cole, Bronner stated: 
While this translation is quite similar to Professor Cole's version, it does use the word "eliminated" rather than "vanish", which is consistent with Bronner's suggestion that an "active" verb would more accurately reflect the original Persian. 
 "the Zionist Regime that is a usurper and illegitimate regime and a cancerous tumor should be wiped off the map."
"The Zionist regime is in a total dead end and, God willing, this desire will soon be realized and the epitome of perversion will disappear off the face of the world." 
 "You should know that the criminal and terrorist Zionist regime which has 60 years of plundering, aggression and crimes in its file has reached the end of its work and will soon disappear off the geographical scene"
Conservative MP Rafat Bayat has blamed Ahmadinejad for a decline in observance of the required hijab for women, calling him "not that strict on this issue". Ahmadinejad has been also accused of indecency by people close to Rafsanjani, after he publicly kissed the hand of a woman who used to be his school teacher. 
In another statement the next year, Ahmadinejad proclaimed (without consulting the clerics before hand), that women should be allowed into football stadiums to watch male football clubs compete. This proclamation "was quickly overruled" by clerical authorities, one of whom, Grand Ayatollah Mohammad Fazel Lankarani "refused for weeks to meet with President Ahmadinejad" in early 2007. 
In July 2009, the general court of Tehran convicted Industry Minister Ali Akbar Mehrabian and Mousa Mazloum but kept silent about Mahmoud Ahmadinejad's involvement, according to Etemad-Melli daily. According to the BBC, Ahmadinejad is named as an author on the cover of the book in which the fraudulent claim was made. 
During Ahmadinejad's presidency, Iran and the US have had the most high-profile contact in almost 30 years. Iran and the US froze diplomatic relations in 1980 and had no direct diplomatic contact until May 2007. 
Ahmadinejad invited Bush to a debate at the United Nations General Assembly, which was to take place on 19 September 2006. The debate was to be about Iran's right to enrich uranium. The invitation was rejected by White House spokesman Tony Snow, who said "There's not going to be a steel-cage grudge match between the President and Ahmadinejad." 
On November 2006, Ahmadinejad wrote an open letter to the American people, representing some of his anxieties and concerns. He stated that there is an urgency to have a dialog because of the activities of the US administration in the Middle East, and that the US is concealing the truth about current realities. 
In a speech given in April 2008, Ahmadinejad described the September 11, 2001 attacks as a "suspect event." He minimized the attacks by saying all that had happened was, "a building collapsed." He claimed that the death toll was never published, that the victims' names were never published, and that the attacks were used subsequently as pretext for the invasions of Afghanistan and Iraq. 
On 26 October 2005 Ahmadinejad gave a speech at a conference in Tehran entitled "World Without Zionism". According to widely published translations, he agreed with a statement he attributed to Ayatollah Khomeini that the "occupying regime" had to be removed, and referred to it as a "disgraceful stain [on] the Islamic world", that needed to be "wiped from the pages of history." 
Ahmadinejad has sought to develop ties with other world leaders that are also opposed to U.S. foreign policy and influence like Hugo Chavez of Venezuela. Venezuela voted in favor of Iran's nuclear program before the United Nations, and both governments have sought to develop more bilateral trade. As of 2006, the ties between the two countries are strategic rather than economic; Venezuela is still not one of Iran's major trading partners. 
Immediately after the Islamic Revolution, Iran's relations with most of its neighbors, particularly those with large Shi'a  minorities, were severely strained. Ahmadinejad's priority in the region has been to improve ties with most of Iran's neighbors in order to strengthen Iran's status and influence in both the Middle East and Greater Muslim World.  
Iran's ties to Syria have been most notable in the West. Both nations have had to deal with international and regional isolation. Both have cordial ties to the militant group, Hezbollah, and concerns over Iran-Syria relations were further exacerbated following the 2006 Lebanon War, which both Ahmadinejad and President Assad claimed as a victory over Israel. 
Ahmadinejad has also tried to develop stronger, more intimate ties with both Afghanistan and Pakistan, to ensure "regional stability." In particular, Ahmadinejad is interested in more bilateral talks between Iran and both Afghanistan and Pakistan. His administration has helped establish the "peace pipeline" from Iran that will eventually fuel both Pakistan and India. In theory, the plan will help to integrate South Asian economies, and, thus to calm tensions between Pakistan and India. 
Ahmadinejad met foreign minister Elmar Mammadyarov of Azerbaijan to discuss increased cooperation between the two nations. Mammadyarov also expressed desire to expand the North-South corridor between Iran and Azerbaijan and to launch cooperative projects for power plant construction. Iran has also redoubled efforts to forge ties with Armenia; during Ahmadinejad's visit in October 2007 the discussions were focused on developing energy ties between the two countries. 
Ahmadinejad was the first Iranian president to visit Iraq. Ahmadinejad, in Baghdad 2 March 2008 for the start of a historic two-day trip, said that "visiting Iraq without the dictator Saddam Hussein is a good thing." Heading home after a two-day visit to Iraq, Ahmadinejad again touted his country's closer relations with Iraq and reiterated his criticism of the United States. 
On September 23, 2009, Ahmadinejad gave a speech to the UN General Assembly which focused on accusing Western powers of spreading "war, bloodshed, aggression, terror and intimidation" in the Middle East and Afghanistan. He also promised that Tehran was "prepared to warmly shake all those hands which are honestly extended to us". But he accused the West of hypocrisy - saying it preached democracy yet violated its fundamental principles - and added that it was time for the world to respond. 
"The awakening of nations and the expansion of freedom worldwide will no longer allow them to continue their hypocrisy and vicious attitudes," he said. 
He also spoke out against Israel for its "barbaric" attack on the Gaza Strip, "inhuman policies" in the Palestinian territories and what he called its domination of world political and economic affairs.the end of which focused largely on the plight of the people of Palestine and a blaming of Israel, though without mentioning the nation or Jews, referring only to "the occupiers" and "the Zionist regime". 
"How can the crimes of the occupiers against defenseless women and children... be supported unconditionally by certain governments," Ahmadinejad asked. "And at the same time, the oppressed men and women be subject to genocide and heaviest economic blockade being denied their basic needs, food, water and medicine?" 
"...there are two opinions on this in Europe. One group of scholars or persons, most of them politically motivated, say the Holocaust occurred. Then there is the group of scholars who represent the opposite position and have therefore been imprisoned for the most part."
In his September 2007 appearance at Columbia University, Ahmadinejad stated "I'm not saying that it didn't happen at all. This is not judgment that I'm passing here" and that the Holocaust should be left open to debate and research like any other historical event. 
In response to some of Ahmadinejad's controversial statements and actions, a variety of sources, including the U.S. Senate, have accused Ahmadinejad of anti-Semitism. Ahmadinejad's September 2008 speech to the UN General Assembly, in which he dwelled on what he described as Zionist control of international finance, was also denounced as "blatant anti-Semitism" by German Foreign Minister Frank-Walter Steinmeier. 
American President Barack Obama posed a direct challenge to Ahmadinejad during his June 2009 visit to Buchenwald concentration camp, saying that Ahmadinejad "should make his own visit" to the camp and that "[t]his place is the ultimate rebuke to such thoughts, a reminder of our duty to confront those who would tell lies about our history". 
In October 2008, Ahmadinejad's statements on the Holocaust were criticized within Iran by cleric and presidential hopeful Mahdi Karroubi. 
Khamenei's main adviser in foreign policy, Ali Akbar Velayati, refused to take part in Ahmadinejad's Holocaust conference. In contrast to Ahmadinejad's remarks, Velayati said that the Holocaust was a genocide and a historical reality. 
 Ahmadinejad has denied allegations of Holocaust denial and acknowledged that it seems the West is right in its claim of the Holocaust:
 Shiraz Dossa, a professor at St. Francis Xavier University, in Nova Scotia, Canada, argued in June 2007 that
 Dossa was criticized in Canadian media, by university president Sean Riley, and by 105 professors at his university for his attendance at Tehran's Holocaust conference. Dossa replied he did not know Holocaust deniers would be in attendance, that he has "never denied the Holocaust, only noted its propaganda power", and that the university should respect his academic freedom to participate. 
Ahmadinejad announced controversial ministerial appointments for his second term. Esfandiar Rahim Mashaei was briefly appointed as first vice president, but opposed by a number of Majlis members and by the intelligence minister, Gholam-Hossein Mohseni-Eje'i. Mashaei followed orders to resign. Ahmadinejad then appointed Mashaei as chief of staff, and fired Mohseni-Eje'i. 
On 26 July 2009, Ahmadinejad's government faced a legal problem after he sacked four ministers. Iran's constitution (Article 136) stipulates that, if more than half of its members are replaced, the cabinet may not meet or act before the Majlis approves the revised membership. The Vice Chairman of the Majlis announced that no cabinet meetings or decisions would be legal, pending such a re-approval. 
This article shows all participating team squads at the 2011 FIVB Women's Club World Championship, held from October 8 to 14, 2011 in Doha, Qatar. 
The Catalina Island bison herd consists of American bison on Catalina Island off the coast of Southern California. In the 1920s to 1930s, several bison were brought onto Catalina Island for a movie. The bison are popular with the tourists and buildings have painted images of bison and bison weather vanes. Over the decades, the bison herd grew to as many as 600. The population currently numbers approximately 150. 
Biologists found that the bison are not purebred; their ancestry includes genes from the cattle, as well as smaller size, different length of legs, jaw length overbite, low fertility, and behavioral problems (such as punctuated walking in tight circles). 
The scientific study determined that a herd of between 150 and 200 would be good for the bison, and ecologically sound for the island. Beginning in 2009, the herd was given animal birth control to maintain the population at around 150 animals. 
With the herd numbering around 100 animals in 2020 and no new bison births in several years, Catalina Island Conservancy made the decision to introduce two pregnant female bison by the end of the year. The new additions will enhance the genetics of the current bison population on the Island. 
On August 26, 2015, a contract worker from American Conservation Experience was injured by a bison while working near Tower Peak on Catalina Island. On February 17, 2018, a man camping at the Little Harbor Campground was gored by a bison. 
 The Scarborough by-election of 1869 was fought on 12 March 1869.  The by-election was fought due to the death of the incumbent Liberal MP Sir John Vanden-Bempde-Johnstone.  It was won by the unopposed Liberal candidate Sir Harcourt Vanden-Bempde-Johnstone. 
This by-elections to the Parliament of the United Kingdom in England-related article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
He was born in Flat Islands, Bonavista Bay and worked as a teacher in Catalina and Greenspond. In 1923, he was appointed to a position in the Customs department and moved to St. John's. He began writing poetry later in life and published a small volume of poems in 1952. 
This article about a Newfoundland and Labrador politician is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
"Hell-O" introduces special guest stars Idina Menzel as Shelby Corcoran, the coach of Vocal Adrenaline, and Jonathan Groff as Jesse St. James, the group's lead singer. Glee fans had previously lobbied for Menzel to be cast as Rachel's biological mother. The episode features cover versions of six songs, five of which were released as singles, available for digital download. 
When Emma later confronts Will with a copy of his high school yearbook, confirming that "Hello Again" was his and Terri's song, he is apologetic. He and Emma decide to put their relationship on hold in order to deal with their separate issues. New Directions performs "Hello, Goodbye", with Emma watching. 
The episode received mixed reviews from critics. Lisa Respers France of CNN was pleased with the series' return, and praised the "drama, treachery, tension, romance, and best of all, the diabolical deliciousness that is Cheerio coach Sue Sylvester." Emily VanDerWerff of The A.V. Club graded the episode "A-". She felt that "Hell-O" had "clumsy moments" but overall found it "a vastly enjoyable hour of television, reintroducing a show that's starting to realize just how far it can go." 
Donghae City is located in the central region of the east coast of Korea in Gangwon-do. Jeongseon county to the west and Gangneung city to the north. It contains the southern terminus of the Donghae Expressway, and the No. 7 national way passes through the city. 
The city is mostly mountainous and has natural resources such as Mureung Valley and beautiful beaches.  Here, the high Taebaek Mountains lie along the eastern coast, preventing rivers from meeting the coast. However, in the rainy season, spontaneous water flow is possible. 
Donghae area and its neighborhood are a free industry zone. From this, Gangwon province and Donghae city has overtaken team for investment. 
A cruise ferry line connecting Russia, South Korea and Japan opened in the summer of 2008. DBS Ferry currently transits between Donghae, Sakaiminato, Tottori and Vladivostok. 
Several places of the mountain range are covered with sand which is blown over by sandstorms. The average yearly rainfall in this area of the Namib amounts to just a few millimeters. 
The bushes to be found in the mountains just survive because of the mist, which sometimes is formed above the cold Atlantic and then during daytime drifts far into the desert. The few camel thorn trees take their water from deep underground accumulations. 
Hill was born in Limerick and educated at Trinity College, Dublin. He was  Rector of Drishane from 1803 to 1814; and Archdeacon of Limerick from 1814 until his death. 
Springhill is a city in northern Webster Parish, Louisiana, United States. The population was 5,279 at the 2010 census, a decrease of 160 since 2000. Springhill is part of the Minden Micropolitan Statistical Area though it is thirty miles north of Minden, the seat of government of Webster Parish. The Springhill population is 34 percent African American, compared to 25 percent minority in 2000. 
The 1979 film Five Days from Home, which was directed by and starred George Peppard, was filmed primarily in Springhill. Peppard's third wife, Sherry Boucher, is a Springhill native; her father, Jesse L. Boucher was a businessman and developer who served as mayor of Springhill. 
Springhill City Hall is located opposite the Springhill Civic Center, a meeting hall which cost $500,000 and was financed in the late 1960s under a voter-approved bond issue, with millage taxes levied against property owners. 
A new plant in north Springhill is Tucker Lumber Company, a sawmill, crosstie trimming, and end-plate facility. 
After it purchased the plywood mill from International Paper, Georgia Pacific closed the plant. Another major employer, Trane, which manufactures air-conditioning components, relocated to Mexico. 
There has been an expansion of the retail and service industries and improvement in the municipal infrastructure. Downtown Main Street has been revitalized with aesthetic improvements, new businesses, and renovation of the Springhill branch of the Webster Parish Library. The city still has a theater, The Spring. 
A formerly abandoned grocery store was converted into the Frank Anthony Community Activity Center, which hosts community events and occasional concerts by such music icons as Willie Nelson and Springhill native Joe Stampley. 
The former campus of the Georgia Howell Elementary School, built in 1956, has been closed because of unsafe building conditions. The pupils formerly assigned there now attend Browning or Brown Middle. 
There were 2,258 households, out of which 26.5% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 46.6% were married couples living together, 15.4% had a female householder with no husband present, and 34.2% were non-families. 31.1% of all households were made up of individuals, and 17.2% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 2.34 and the average family size was 2.90. 
In the city, the population was spread out, with 23.8% under the age of 18, 8.7% from 18 to 24, 23.8% from 25 to 44, 22.2% from 45 to 64, and 21.6% who were 65 years of age or older. The median age was 40 years. For every 100 females, there were 85.3 males. For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 81.8 males. 
The median income for a household in the city was $27,102, and the median income for a family was $35,540. Males had a median income of $29,757 versus $17,750 for females. The per capita income for the city was $16,447. About 14.6% of families and 20.2% of the population were below the poverty line, including 29.6% of those under age 18 and 12.6% of those age 65 or over. 
Caleb Rowden is an American politician. He is a member of the Missouri State Senate, having served since 2017. A member of the Republican Party, Rowden previously served in the Missouri House of Representatives from 2013 to 2017. In November 2018, Rowden was elected by his Republican colleagues to be the majority leader in the Missouri Senate's 2019 session. 
Rowden was first elected in 2017, and he was chosen to be the Majority Leader for the 2019 session.  
Rowden is married to Aubrey Rowden, the co-owner of Love Tree Studios, a wedding photography company. They have two children. Rowden himself owns Clarius Interactive, a media and marketing company. He attended the University of Missouri, Columbia. 
The Ultimate Fighter 26 (also known as  The Ultimate Fighter: A New World Champion) is an installment of the Ultimate Fighting Championship (UFC)-produced reality television series The Ultimate Fighter. 
Tryouts were announced on May 3, scheduled for 20 days later. This season will exclusively feature the women's flyweight division, with the goal of crowning the UFC's inaugural 125-pound champion in the season's finale. All women who were currently on the UFC roster were allowed to submit their names for the tournament, as were females unsigned by the UFC. 
The news came just months after UFC president Dana White told reporters in Las Vegas that the UFC had no plans to institute any further women's divisions in 2017 other than women's featherweight. It also canceled plans the UFC previously had to hold a TUF 26 casting call for women's strawweight, women's bantamweight, and men's middleweight. 
The coaches for this season were announced on July 13, pitting former two-time Bellator Lightweight Champion and former UFC Lightweight Champion Eddie Alvarez against former WSOF Lightweight Champion Justin Gaethje. The cast was officially announced on August 5, including inaugural Invicta FC Flyweight Champion Barb Honchak, The Ultimate Fighter: Team Rousey vs. Team Tate contestant Roxanne Modafferi and former Invicta FC Bantamweight Champion and current UFC fighter Lauren Murphy. 
* Eubanks was pulled from the tournament finale on the day of the weigh ins due to medical reasons. She was replaced by Roxanne Modafferi. 
The Ultimate Fighter 26 Finale (also known as The Ultimate Fighter: A New World Champion Finale) was a mixed martial arts event produced by the Ultimate Fighting Championship that was held on December 1, 2017, at Park Theater in Paradise, Nevada, part of the Las Vegas metropolitan area. 
At the weigh ins, Karine Gevorgyan weighed in at 130 pounds, 4 pounds over the flyweight non-title fight upper limit of 126 pounds. As such, the bout proceeded at a catchweight and Gevorgyan forfeited 30% of her purse to her opponent Rachael Ostovich. 
The following is the reported payout to the fighters as reported to the Nevada State Athletic Commission. It does not include sponsor money and also does not include the UFC's traditional "fight night" bonuses. The total disclosed payout for the event was $553,000. 
^ Both fighters earned show money; bout declared majority draw. ^^ Karine Gevorgyan was fined 30 percent of her purse ($3,000) for failing to make the required weight for her fight with Rachel Ostovich-Berdon. That money was issued to Ostovich-Berdon, an NSAC official confirmed. 
UFC 218: Holloway vs. Aldo 2 was held on December 2, 2017, at Little Caesars Arena in Detroit, Michigan. 
Pseudoplectania is a genus of fungi in the family Sarcosomataceae. The genus contains 12 species. Pseudoplectania ryvardenii was described in 2012, while Pseudoplectania carranzae was transferred to the genus (from Plectania) in 2013. 
Another Mayberry is the first studio album by Colorado rock band Big Head Todd and the Monsters, released in 1989.  The album was released on the band's own Big Records, which also released their second album Midnight Radio the following year. 
After the success of the band's third album and first major label effort Sister Sweetly, Warner Bros. Records re-released Another Maybery in 1994. 
Henri Bertrand was a Belgian racing cyclist. He won the Belgian national road race title in 1897 and 1898. 
This biographical article relating to Belgian cycling is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Arya Vidyapeeth College is a liberal science, arts and commerce college established in the year 1958 at Gopinath Nagar of Kamrup district in Assam. The college is affiliated to Gauhati University. 
In 2016 the college has been awarded 'A' grade by the National Assessment and Accreditation Council (NAAC). The college is also recognised by University Grants Commission (India). 
In North Macedonia, the most common religion is Eastern Orthodox Christianity, practiced by most of the ethnic Macedonians. The vast majority of the Eastern Orthodox in the country belong to the Macedonian Orthodox Church, which declared autocephaly from the Serbian Orthodox Church in 1967. 
Muslims are the second-largest religious group with almost one-third of the population adhering to Islam, mainly from the country's Albanian, Roma and Turkish minorities. There are also many other religious groups in North Macedonia, including the Catholicism, Protestantism, and Judaism. 
In 2011, through a survey carried out by Ipsos MORI, the religious composition of North Macedonia was found to be 70.7% Christian, divided in 69.6% Eastern Orthodox and 0.4% Catholics and Protestants, and 28.6% Muslim, with unaffiliated Muslims making up the 25.6%. 
In 2001 the Holy See established the Byzantine Catholic Apostolic Exarchate of Macedonia. Currently, members of the Macedonian Catholic Church number about 11,266. It is a Byzantine Rite sui juris particular church in full communion with Pope and the rest of the Catholic Church, alongside the Eastern Catholic Churches and uses Macedonian in the liturgy. 
There are a number of Protestants in North Macedonia. In the late 19th and early 20th centuries, American missionaries converted villages in the Strumica-Petrich region to Methodism, a faith still practiced. There is also a small community of Macedonian Baptists which has existed since 1928. 
The laws of North Macedonia prohibit religious discrimination and provide for equal rights for all citizens regardless religious belief, and people generally have the freedom to practice their religion without disruption. Religious organizations have complained about unfair treatment by the government around questions of building permits and property restitutions. There have been incidences of vandalism and theft against religious buildings. 
Martha Ann Cassell Thompson (1925 -1968) was a member of the prominent Cassell Family of African-American architects. She was the chief restoration architect for the Washington National Cathedral. 
Martha Cassell Thompson was also a skilled pianist, and organized the Social Services Committee for the YWCA. 
In 1948 Martha Cassell married Dr. Victor Thompson, who was a medical student at Meharry Medical College. They had one child, Karen Thompson, in 1949, who trained at Illinois Institute of Technology and became the third generation of architects. Martha Cassell Thompson died in 1968, and is buried at the Lincoln Memorial Cemetery, Suitland, Maryland. 
Yahya ibn Zikrawayh, also known under his assumed name Sahib al-Naqa ("Master of the She-camel"), was a Qarmatian leader in the Syrian Desert in the early years of the 10th century. 
From this base they began launching raids against the Abbasid and Tulunid provinces of Syria, with devastating effect. In 902, the Qarmatians defeated the Tulunids under Tughj ibn Juff near Raqqa, and laid siege to Damascus. The city was successfully held by Tughj, and Yahya was killed. Leadership passed to his brother, who assumed the title "Man with the Mole", and led the Qarmatians until his defeat, capture and execution after the Battle of Hama in November 903. 
Zikrawayh, the brothers' father, also rebelled in 906 near Kufa but was killed in the next year during an attack on the hajj caravan. With these defeats, the Qarmatian movement virtually ceased to exist in the Syrian Desert, although their counterparts in Bahrayn remained an active threat for several decades to come. 
Udo Lehmann (born 28 May 1973) is a German bobsledder who competed from 1994 to 2004. He won two medals in the four-man event at the FIBT World Championships with a gold in 2004 and a bronze in 1995. 
This biographical article relating to German bobsleigh is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Kokoro no Hoshi debuted at #12 on the weekly Oricon albums chart, selling 11,802 copies in its first week. 
Taylor Constantine Averill (born March 5, 1992) is an American volleyball player, member of the United States men's national volleyball team, 2021 French Champion. Bronze medalist of the 2018 World Championship. On club level, he plays for Polish team Indykpol AZS Olsztyn. 
This biographical article relating to volleyball in the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
San Benedetto is a small, Roman Catholic former parish church, then oratory, located in a piazza of the same name just off the piazza of the Duomo of Florence, region of Tuscany, Italy. 
The church was founded around the year 1000, but transferred from parish to a confraternity. It was suppressed in 1771, and still retains a chapel with an altarpiece depicting the Miracle of San Zanobi, attributed to Bernardo Veracini. 
Bakri's eventual replacement as governor, Major General Jaafar Mohammed Saad, was assassinated in December 2015. 
On 20 May 2014, two bombs exploded in Jos, Plateau State, Nigeria, killing at least 118  people and injuring more than 56 others. The first bombing occurred in a marketplace, and the second near a bus station. Though no group or individual has claimed responsibility, the attacks have been attributed to Boko Haram. 
Christians and Muslims had several confrontations in Jos in years preceding the bombings, and militant group Boko Haram was also active prior to the attack. In 2012, multiple churches were bombed by Boko Haram in order to try to start a religious conflict between Christians and Muslims. In the month prior to the attack, Boko Haram abducted over 200 schoolgirls, though Jos had two significant attacks since 2012.  One day after the bombings 27 were killed in village attacks. 
Barlow Der Mugrdechian has traveled extensively in the Middle East and Armenia and is fluent in Armenian (both Classical and Modern), Russian, Turkish, English and French. 
In mathematics, a topological vector space (also called a linear topological space and commonly abbreviated TVS or t.v.s.) is one of the basic structures investigated in functional analysis.  A topological vector space is a vector space (an algebraic structure) which is also a topological space, this implies that vector space operations be continuous functions.  More specifically, its topological space has a uniform topological structure, allowing a notion of uniform convergence. 
The elements of topological vector spaces are typically functions or linear operators acting on topological vector spaces, and the topology is often defined so as to capture a particular notion of convergence of sequences of functions. 
Unless stated otherwise, the underlying field of a topological vector space is assumed to be either the complex numbers      C    {\displaystyle \mathbb {C} }   or the real numbers      R  .   {\displaystyle \mathbb {R} .}   
Every normed vector space has a natural topological structure: the norm induces a metric and the metric induces a topology.  This is a topological vector space because: 
Some authors (for example, Walter Rudin) require the topology on     X   {\displaystyle X}   to be T1; it then follows that the space is Hausdorff, and even Tychonoff.  A topological vector space is said to be separated if it is Hausdorff; importantly, "separated" does not mean separable.  The topological and linear algebraic structures can be tied together even more closely with additional assumptions, the most common of which are listed below. 
The category of topological vector spaces over a given topological field      K    {\displaystyle \mathbb {K} }   is commonly denoted TVS     K    {\displaystyle \mathbb {K} }   or TVect     K    {\displaystyle \mathbb {K} }  .  The objects are the topological vector spaces over      K    {\displaystyle \mathbb {K} }   and the morphisms are the continuous      K    {\displaystyle \mathbb {K} }  -linear maps from one object to another. 
A TVS embedding or a topological monomorphism is an injective topological homomorphism. Equivalently, a TVS-embedding is a linear map that is also a topological embedding. 
A TVS isomorphism or an isomorphism in the category of TVSs is a bijective linear homeomorphism. Equivalently, it is a surjective TVS embedding 
Many properties of TVSs that are studied, such as local convexity, metrizability, completeness, and normability, are invariant under TVS isomorphisms. 
If       B     {\displaystyle {\mathcal {B}}}   satisfies the above two conditions but is not a filter base then it will form a neighborhood subbasis at     0   {\displaystyle 0}   (rather than a neighborhood basis) for a vector topology on     X .   {\displaystyle X.}   
In general, the set of all balanced and absorbing subsets of a vector space does not satisfy the conditions of this theorem and does not form a neighborhood basis at the origin for any vector topology. 
Summative sequences of sets have the particularly nice property that they define non-negative continuous real-valued subadditive functions.  These functions can then be used to prove many of the basic properties of topological vector spaces. 
Defining vector topologies using collections of strings is particularly useful for defining classes of TVSs that are not necessarily locally convex. 
One of the most used properties of vector topologies is that every vector topology is translation invariant: 
Every neighborhood of 0 is an absorbing set and contains an open balanced neighborhood of     0   {\displaystyle 0}   so every topological vector space has a local base of absorbing and balanced sets.  The origin even has a neighborhood basis consisting of closed balanced neighborhoods of 0; if the space is locally convex then it also has a neighborhood basis consisting of closed convex balanced neighborhoods of 0. 
Every totally bounded set is bounded.  If     M   {\displaystyle M}   is a vector subspace of a TVS     X ,   {\displaystyle X,}   then a subset of     M   {\displaystyle M}   is bounded in     M   {\displaystyle M}   if and only if it is bounded in     X .   {\displaystyle X.}   
A TVS is pseudometrizable if and only if it has a countable neighborhood basis at the origin, or equivalent, if and only if its topology is generated by an F-seminorm. A TVS is metrizable if and only if it is Hausdorff and pseudometrizable. 
More strongly: a topological vector space is said to be normable if its topology can be induced by a norm.  A topological vector space is normable if and only if it is Hausdorff and has a convex bounded neighborhood of     0.   {\displaystyle 0.}   
Let      K    {\displaystyle \mathbb {K} }   be a non-discrete locally compact topological field, for example the real or complex numbers.  A Hausdorff topological vector space over      K    {\displaystyle \mathbb {K} }   is locally compact if and only if it is finite-dimensional, that is, isomorphic to       K   n     {\displaystyle \mathbb {K} ^{n}}   for some natural number     n .   {\displaystyle n.}   
Every Cauchy sequence is bounded, although Cauchy nets and Cauchy filters may not be bounded.  A topological vector space where every Cauchy sequence converges is called sequentially complete; in general, it may not be complete (in the sense that all Cauchy filters converge). 
The vector space operation of addition is uniformly continuous and an open map. Scalar multiplication is Cauchy continuous but in general, it is almost never uniformly continuous.  Because of this, every topological vector space can be completed and is thus a dense linear subspace of a complete topological vector space. 
By F. Riesz's theorem, a Hausdorff topological vector space is finite-dimensional if and only if it is locally compact, which happens if and only if it has a compact neighborhood of the origin.  
A linear operator between two topological vector spaces which is continuous at one point is continuous on the whole domain.  Moreover, a linear operator     f   {\displaystyle f}   is continuous if     f ( X )   {\displaystyle f(X)}   is bounded (as defined below) for some neighborhood     X   {\displaystyle X}   of the origin. 
A hyperplane on a topological vector space     X   {\displaystyle X}   is either dense or closed.  A linear functional     f   {\displaystyle f}   on a topological vector space     X   {\displaystyle X}   has either dense or closed kernel.  Moreover,     f   {\displaystyle f}   is continuous if and only if its kernel is closed. 
Depending on the application additional constraints are usually enforced on the topological structure of the space.  In fact, several principal results in functional analysis fail to hold in general for topological vector spaces: the closed graph theorem, the open mapping theorem, and the fact that the dual space of the space separates points in the space. 
The open convex subsets of a TVS     X   {\displaystyle X}   (not necessarily Hausdorff or locally convex) are exactly those that are of the form  
If     K   {\displaystyle K}   is an absorbing disk in a TVS     X   {\displaystyle X}   and if     p :=  p  K     {\displaystyle p:=p_{K}}   is the Minkowski functional of     K   {\displaystyle K}   then 
If     S   {\displaystyle S}   is a disk in     X   {\displaystyle X}   that has non-empty interior then the origin belongs to the interior of     S .   {\displaystyle S.}   However, a closed balanced subset of     X   {\displaystyle X}   with non-empty interior may fail to contain the origin in its interior. 
Every relatively compact set is totally bounded and the closure of a totally bounded set is totally bounded.  The image of a totally bounded set under a uniformly continuous map (such as a continuous linear map for instance) is totally bounded. If     S   {\displaystyle S}   is a subset of a TVS     X   {\displaystyle X}   such that every sequence in     S   {\displaystyle S}   has a cluster point in     S   {\displaystyle S}   then     S   {\displaystyle S}   is totally bounded. 
The closure of any convex (respectively, any balanced, any absorbing) subset of any TVS has this same property. In particular, the closure of any convex, balanced, and absorbing subset is a barrel.  
In a locally convex space, convex hulls of bounded sets are bounded. This is not true for TVSs in general. 
In a general TVS, the closed convex hull of a compact set may fail to be compact.  The balanced hull of a compact (resp. totally bounded) set has that same property.  The convex hull of a finite union of compact convex sets is again compact and convex. 
A disk in a TVS is not nowhere dense if and only if its closure is a neighborhood of the origin.  A vector subspace of a TVS that is closed but not open is nowhere dense. 
Suppose     X   {\displaystyle X}   is a TVS that does not carry the indiscrete topology. Then     X   {\displaystyle X}   is a Baire space if and only if     X   {\displaystyle X}   has no balanced absorbing nowhere dense subset. 
In any non-trivial vector space     X ,   {\displaystyle X,}   there exist two disjoint non-empty convex subsets whose union is     X .   {\displaystyle X.}   
The following table, the color of each cell indicates whether or not a given property of subsets of     X   {\displaystyle X}   (indicated by the column name, "convex" for instance) is preserved under the set operator (indicated by the row's name, "closure" for instance).  If in every TVS, a property is preserved under the indicated set operator then that cell will be colored green; otherwise, it will be colored red. 
This biographical article relating to a Polish basketball figure is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Liu was born in Harbin, China, on April 19, 1989 and immigrated to Canada at the age of five after being raised by his grandparents for the first four years of his life. He was raised in Erin Mills, an area of Mississauga, Ontario, and is an only child. He attended University of Toronto Schools for high school and studied business administration at the Ivey Business School at the University of Western Ontario, graduating with honours in 2011.  
Liu initially worked as an accountant at Deloitte but was dissatisfied with his career and was eventually laid off. He began to explore other career options and decided to pursue a career as an actor and stuntman. 
Liu got his start in acting working as an extra and stuntman, appearing in movies and music videos such as Guillermo del Toro's Pacific Rim and Avicii's I Could Be The One.  His other early onscreen credits include Nikita (2012) and Beauty and the Beast (2014). He appeared as a stuntman in Sick: Survive the Night (2012) and the TV miniseries Heroes Reborn.  
Later in 2015, Liu was cast in his first main role as Jung Kim in CBC's popular sitcom Kim's Convenience, the TV adaptation of a popular play of the same name. It remains his most notable television success to date, with the series being nominated for and winning multiple awards internationally, including "Best Comedy Series" at the 2018 Canadian Screen Awards and "Most Popular Foreign Drama" at the 2019 Seoul International Drama Awards.  
In 2016, Liu was cast in a recurring role as the ex-CIA analyst Faaron, loosely modeled on real-life ex-analyst Rodney Faraon, in the NBC prequel series Taken based on the film franchise starring Liam Neeson. 
Even as he was cast in main and recurring roles, Liu continued to appear as an extra on several television shows, appearing in an episode of the hit BBC-Space series Orphan Black as well as in the Canadian science fiction series Dark Matter. 
In 2017, Liu joined the cast of the second season of Slasher as well as the CityTV miniseries Bad Blood, both as recurring characters. 
In 2018, he appeared in the science fiction television series The Expanse and Wong Fu Productions' YouTube series Yappie. 
In early 2019, Liu guest starred in the 100th episode of ABC's Fresh Off the Boat as a noodle vendor named Willie. He also guest starred in an episode of the TV series Awkwafina Is Nora from Queens as Garbage Boy. 
In September 2021, it was revealed that Liu will lead the English-language voice cast of Bright: Samurai Soul, a Netflix anime film scheduled to premiere on October 12. 
In 2014, Liu was paid 100 dollars to model for a set of stock photos for FatCamera, with the photos later appearing in subway stations, advertisements, storefronts, pamphlets, and textbook covers, as well as being the subject of widespread media coverage upon Liu's mainstream acting breakthrough in 2021. 
Alongside his acting and stunt career, Liu is also a filmmaker, producer, and writer. Liu's first work in this area was Open Gym, a short film he wrote, directed, produced, and starred in that debuted at the 2013 Toronto Reel Asian International Film Festival. He would go on to direct, produce and write several other shorts, including Crimson Defender vs. The Slightly Racist Family (2015). 
In 2016, Liu participated in the writing room for Blood and Water, during which he helped break the story for the show and wrote an episode for its second season. 
In 2017 Liu worked with Wong Fu Productions on their short Meeting Mommy (2017), which he wrote and produced with Tina Jung. It was released in February 2018 on the Wong Fu Productions YouTube channel, amassing over 250,000 views in its first week. 
In December 2017, Liu wrote an online piece for Maclean's magazine detailing his experiences growing up in an immigrant family. The article was later published in the magazine's January 2018 issue. He is currently writing a memoir, "We Were Dreamers: An Immigrant Superhero Origin Story", which is set to be published by HarperCollins on May 3, 2022. 
In 2018, he founded his own film production company, 4:12 Entertainment, and began developing long-form film projects under it. 
Liu was nominated for a Canadian Screen Award and an ACTRA Award in 2017 for his work in Blood and Water. He, along with his Kim's Convenience castmates, won the ACTRA Award for Outstanding Ensemble in 2017. Liu and his castmates were subsequently nominated for the same award in 2018 and 2019. Kim's Convenience also went on to win the award for Best Comedy Series at the 2018 Canadian Screen Awards. 
On stage, Liu was nominated for a Dora Mavor Moore Award in the Outstanding Ensemble category alongside his castmates in the 2016 Factory Theatre remount of the play Banana Boys. 
Liu was named one of Hello!'s 50 Most Beautiful Canadians and 25 Hottest Bachelors in 2017 and 2018. 
In May 2021, Liu became the first East Asian man to cover Men's Health magazine in over a decade since Jet Li in 2010. 
Completed on 6 June 1944, Take was assigned to Desron 11 of the Combined Fleet for a month's training, then was assigned to convoy escort duties. 
Take would continue performing escort duties for the remainder of the war, and was in Maizuru for the Surrender of Japan. 
Immediately postwar, Take was used as a repatriation ship.  In 1947, she was turned over to Great Britain and then scrapped. 
Andrew S. Levey is an American nephrologist who transformed Chronic Kidney Disease (CKD) clinical practice, research and public health by developing equations to estimate glomerular filtration rate (GFR), and leading the global standardization of CKD definition and staging. 
Levey graduated from the University of Chicago in 1972 with a Bachelor of Arts in Biological Sciences and graduated as a Doctor of Medicine (MD) in 1976 at the Boston University School of Medicine.He became a Professor of Medicine in the Tufts University School of Medicine in 1994, and was Chief of the Division of Nephrology from 1999 to 2017. 
Levey is known for developing the most widely used equations to estimate GFR (Renal function) globally. He pioneered work with the MDRD Study Equation: , led the CKD-Epidemiology Collaboration(CKD-EPI), which pooled measured kidney function CKD data from studies all over the world to develop equations to estimate kidney function from serum creatinine, cystatin C, and panels of metabolites and low molecular weight proteins . The 2009 CKD-EPI creatinine equation is shown below: 
He was a founding member of the CKD Prognosis Consortium, which includes over 80 cohorts and 10 million participants and has informed multiple clinical practice guidelines and regulatory policies. 
He led the U.S. National Kidney Foundation task force on cardiovascular disease in chronic kidney disease, which led to the recognition by the American Heart Association of CKD as a risk factor for cardiovascular disease. 
He co-chaired the U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention expert panel to develop comprehensive public health strategies for preventing the development, progression, and complications of CKD . 
He led scientific workshops sponsored by the U.S. National Kidney Foundation in collaboration with the U.S. Food and Drug Administration and European Medicines Association for the evaluation of Renal function as surrogate endpoints for clinical trials of kidney disease progression. 
He was editor-in-chief for American Journal of Kidney Diseases, the official journal of the U.S. National Kidney Foundation, from 2007-2016. 
Aspathines had a son names Prexaspes, who became an Admiral in the navy of Xerxes during the Second Persian invasion of Greece. 
Shimoda is located at the southern tip of the Izu Peninsula about 100 kilometres southwest of Tokyo. Shimoda's location, with the Amagi Mountains to the north, and the warm Kuroshio Current to the south give the city a humid, sub-tropical climate. 
Per Japanese census data, the population of Shimoda has been in slow decline over the past 40 years. 
Shimoda expanded in March 1955 through the merger of six neighboring towns and villages. In 1958, an All Nippon Airways DC-3 en route from Haneda to Nagoya crashed offshore from Shimoda, killing three passengers. Shimoda suffered damage from sizeable earthquakes in 1974 and in 1978. 
Shimoda has a mayor-council form of government with a directly elected mayor and a unicameral city legislature of 13 members. 
The economy of Shimoda is based on tourism (primarily centered on the hot spring resorts and marine sports) and commercial fishing. 
Shimoda has seven public elementary schools and four public middle schools operated by the city government and one public high school operated by the Shizuoka Prefectural Board of Education. The prefecture also operates one special education school. Tsukuba University and Nihon University both have marine biology research centers in Shimoda. 
Ferry service is available to Niijima and Shikinejima in the Izu Islands. There used to be a ferry service from Shimoda to Shimizu, Shizuoka; however, it is no longer in operation. 
Apart from its role in the opening of Japan, Shimoda is famous for its hot spring resorts and beaches. Tatadohama, Ohama and Iritahama beaches attract many tourists in summer and are popular surfing spots year round, and Iritahama has been voted most beautiful Japanese beach a number of years[citation needed]. 
Shimoda is also a setting for much of Yasunari Kawabata's famous short story The Dancing Girl of Izu. 
Shapwick Manor at Shapwick in the English county of Somerset is a medieval manor house which was largely remodelled in the 19th century by Henry Strangways on his return from South Australia in 1871. It is a Grade II* listed building. 
It is not to be confused with Shapwick House, formerly an hotel, and more recently a rental property, which lies to the north of the village. 
Shapwick Manor is a two-storey stone building that has an asymmetrical frontage, formerly with a glazed veranda supported on iron columns  to one side of the building. The stable block, which was built in the 17th century, is also a Grade II* listed. The dovecote is medieval but was restored in the 18th and 19th centuries, with a new roof being installed in the 20th century. The stone screen and flanking walls were built around 1658. 
Ariel Standen Levis is a Chilean senior athlete champion, born on September 12, 1929, in Punta Arenas, son of the Methodist minister Carlos Standen and Nelly Levis, he is the first Chilean senior athlete who won a world senior title. 
In 1953, Standen was nominated to join the national pre-team  for the sudamerican Tournament in Brazil. After being accepted, he competed with the champion and record of the world Adhemar Ferreira Da Silva.  His career was abruptly stopped in 1962 when he retired from athletics and from the national team due to problems with the federation about. 
Besides to these triumphs, he won 15 South American senior titles in the categories of 55, 60 and 65 years old. 
Education became a passion for Anderson and in 1926 he took a position as an associate professor at the University of Kansas in their department of education. After one year at Kansas, Anderson moved into an associate professor position at Ohio State, where he would remain for 35 years. During his time at Ohio State, Anderson would advance to become the chair of department of education in 1956, retiring from that post in 1962. 
Graduate House is a residential college and an academic and professional development meeting and gathering place in Melbourne, Victoria, Australia. 
It overlooks University Square and neighbours Melbourne Business School, the Grattan Institute and Melbourne School of Engineering. It is across the park from Melbourne Law School, the Faculty of Business and Economics and the Melbourne Careers Centre in the Alan Gilbert Building; and down the road from Melbourne Graduate School of Education. 
Graduate House has  different room types for different preferences and budgets, ranging from single and double ensuite and non-ensuite rooms to self-contained apartments. 
In a mature environment, graduate students pursue their studies, advance their career through living and meeting with colleagues from around the world, and make life-long friends. They also meet and network with renowned visiting academics, specialists and intellects from around the world and from all disciplines. 
Graduate House has meeting and function spaces and services that can cater for numbers ranging from 2 to 300. 
Graduate House is owned and run by a membership association called The Graduate Union of The University of Melbourne Inc. 
The Association is more than 110 years old and benefits graduates at any life stage. It is inclusive and egalitarian, and  enables networking of positive influence on careers, the mind and in developing collective projects. 
Being part of this long-standing Association means contacts, networks, career development and social opportunities. Members are guaranteed to meet other intelligent, influential and well-connected people who are genuinely interested and active in supporting graduates at all life stages. 
Noting membership of The Graduate Union in a resume or curriculum vitae, on LinkedIn and with the other initials at the end of the qualification list, is beneficial as it indicates membership of a collegium that values lifelong learning, research, innovation and their productive application for global good. 
Less than two months after the first meeting, the Melbourne University Graduates Association was formed with Sir John Monash as its first president for the three years before he commenced his war service in 1914. 
Brooklyn was also named one of the best films of 2015, featuring on more than 120 "Top 10" film critics' lists. The film was ranked 48th on BBC's 100 Greatest Films of the 21st Century. 
When her sister unexpectedly dies, Eilis tells Tony she must return home to help her mother. Tony shows her a plot of land on Long Island his family intends to develop and will include a house for them. He asks Eilis to marry him before she leaves. Eilis is hesitant but agrees, and they secretly marry at City Hall. While there, they happen to bump into an Irish couple with relatives in Enniscorthy. 
Once back in Ireland, Eilis falls into a new life, temporarily taking her late sister's bookkeeping job, and being set up with well-off bachelor Jim Farrell. It is a completely different life than the one she left behind for Brooklyn. She extends her stay to attend a friend's wedding, and avoids reading Tony's letters. Jim comes close to proposing marriage, but she is noncommittal. 
Principal photography filming began on 1 April 2014 in Ireland, and was shot for three weeks at different locations including Enniscorthy, Wexford, and Dublin. On the first day of shooting, Ronan was spotted in period costume on the set in Enniscorthy. After finishing production in Ireland, it then moved to Montreal, Quebec for four weeks further. Two days were spent shooting in New York at Coney Island. 
Brooklyn grossed $38.3 million in North America and $23.7 million in other territories, for a worldwide total of $62.1 million, against a budget of $11 million. 
Brooklyn was also named one of the best films of 2015, featuring on more than 120 "Top 10" film critics' lists. It is ranked fourth on Rotten Tomatoes and fifth on Metacritic's best reviewed films of 2015. 
This biographical article related to a South African cricket person born in the 1960s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Mordaunt was born at Wellesbourne Hastings in Warwickshire, the son of John Mordaunt who had played cricket for MCC. He was educated at Wellington College where he was in the cricket XI from 1887 to 1889, leading the school averages in his final season and captaining the side in 1888. He played for Hampshire County Cricket Club in 1887 whilst he was at school at a time when the county did not have first-class cricket status. 
He remained closely associated with Wellington College throughout his life and served as a Governor of the college. Mordaunt died at Marylebone in London in 1938 aged 67. 
This biographical article related to an English cricket person born in the 1870s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
History also includes the academic discipline which uses narrative to describe, examine, question, and analyze past events, and investigate their patterns of cause and effect. Historians  often debate which narrative best explains an event, as well as the significance of different causes and effects. Historians also debate the nature of history as an end in itself, as well as its usefulness to give perspective on the problems of the present. 
The line of demarcation between prehistoric and historical times is crossed when people cease to live only in the present, and become consciously interested both in their past and in their future. History begins with the handing down of tradition; and tradition means the carrying of the habits and lessons of the past into the future. Records of the past begin to be kept for the benefit of future generations.
The first four are known as historical criticism; the fifth, textual criticism; and, together, external criticism. The sixth and final inquiry about a source is called internal criticism. 
The historical method comprises the techniques and guidelines by which historians use primary sources and other evidence to research and then to write history. 
Saint Augustine was influential in Christian and Western thought at the beginning of the medieval period. Through the Medieval and Renaissance periods, history was often studied through a sacred or religious perspective. Around 1800, German philosopher and historian Georg Wilhelm Friedrich Hegel brought philosophy and a more secular approach in historical study. 
In the West, historians developed modern methods of historiography in the 17th and 18th centuries, especially in France and Germany. In 1851, Herbert Spencer summarized these methods: 
By the "rich ore" Spencer meant scientific theory of history. Meanwhile, Henry Thomas Buckle expressed a dream of history becoming one day science: 
 In regard to nature, events apparently the most irregular and capricious have been explained and have been shown to be in accordance with certain fixed and universal laws. This have been done because men of ability and, above all, men of patient, untiring thought have studied events with the view of discovering their regularity, and if human events were subject to a similar treatment, we have every right to expect similar results
 As Historians like Ranke and many who followed him have pursued it, no, history is not a science. Thus if Historians tell us that, given the manner in which he practices his craft, it cannot be considered a science, we must take him at his word. If he is not doing science, then, whatever else he is doing, he is not doing science. The traditional Historian is thus no scientist and history, as conventionally practiced, is not a science.
Today, most historians begin their research process in the archives, on either a physical or digital platform. They often propose an argument and use their research to support it. John H. Arnold proposed that history is an argument, which creates the possibility of creating change. Digital information companies, such as Google, have sparked controversy over the role of internet censorship in information access. 
Environmental historian William Cronon proposed three ways to combat bias and ensure authentic and accurate narratives: narratives must not contradict known fact, they must make ecological sense (specifically for environmental history), and published work must be reviewed by scholarly community and other historians to ensure accountability. 
These are approaches to history; not listed are histories of other fields, such as history of science, history of mathematics and history of philosophy. 
Military history concerns warfare, strategies, battles, weapons, and the psychology of combat. The "new military history" since the 1970s has been concerned with soldiers more than generals, with psychology more than tactics, and with the broader impact of warfare on society and culture. 
The history of religion has been a main theme for both secular and religious historians for centuries, and continues to be taught in seminaries and academe. Leading journals include Church History, The Catholic Historical Review, and History of Religions. Topics range widely from political and cultural and artistic dimensions, to theology and liturgy. This subject studies religions from all regions and areas of the world where humans have lived. 
Environmental history is a new field that emerged in the 1980s to look at the history of the environment, especially in the long run, and the impact of human activities upon it. It is an offshoot of the environmental movement, which was kickstarted by Rachel Carson's Silent Spring in the 1960s. 
World history is the study of major civilizations over the last 3000 years or so. World history is primarily a teaching field, rather than a research field. It gained popularity in the United States, Japan and other countries after the 1980s with the realization that students need a broader exposure to the world as globalization proceeds. 
It has led to highly controversial interpretations by Oswald Spengler and Arnold J. Toynbee, among others. 
The World History Association publishes the Journal of World History every quarter since 1990. The H-World discussion list serves as a network of communication among practitioners of world history, with discussions among scholars, announcements, syllabi, bibliographies and book reviews. 
Intellectual history and the history of ideas emerged in the mid-20th century, with the focus on the intellectuals and their books on the one hand, and on the other the study of ideas as disembodied objects with a career of their own. 
Since the 20th century, Western historians have disavowed the aspiration to provide the "judgement of history". The goals of historical judgements or interpretations are separate to those of legal judgements, that need to be formulated quickly after the events and be final. A related issue to that of the judgement of history is that of collective memory. 
Pseudohistory is a term applied to texts which purport to be historical in nature but which depart from standard historiographical conventions in a way which undermines their conclusions. It is closely related to deceptive historical revisionism. Works which draw controversial conclusions from new, speculative, or disputed historical evidence, particularly in the fields of national, political, military, and religious affairs, are often rejected as pseudohistory. 
In the United States, scholarship was concentrated at the major PhD-producing universities, while the large number of other colleges and universities focused on undergraduate teaching. A tendency in the 21st century was for the latter schools to increasingly demand scholarly productivity of their younger tenure-track faculty. Furthermore, universities have increasingly relied on inexpensive part-time adjuncts to do most of the classroom teaching. 
At the university level, historians debate the question of whether history belongs more to social science or to the humanities. Many view the field from both perspectives. 
In many countries, history textbooks are sponsored by the national government and are written to put the national heritage in the most favourable light. For example, in Japan, mention of the Nanking Massacre has been removed from textbooks and the entire Second World War is given cursory treatment. Other countries have complained. It was standard policy in communist countries to present only a rigid Marxist historiography. 
In the United States, textbooks published by the same company often differ in content from state to state. An example of content that is represented different in different regions of the country is the history of the Southern states, where slavery and the American Civil War are treated as controversial topics. McGraw-Hill Education for example, was criticised for describing Africans brought to American plantations as "workers" instead of slaves in a textbook. 
Academic historians have often fought against the politicization of the textbooks, sometimes with success. 
The story takes place in Carpathian Ruthenia, especially after, but including the duration of the World War One. 
The whole story is set in Ruthenia. This region is forgotten, and people here are very poor and their only livelihood is the forests, where they say God lives and where there are a variety of enchanted places where even the wildlife won't approach. The novel writes two separate stories- the legend of Nikola and his real life - that blend together. The book is an allegory for  legitimate justice and people's desire for freedom. 
See guidelines for writing about novels. Further suggestions might be found on the article's talk page.
Beatrix Mahlknecht was an Italian luger who competed during the mid-1990s. A natural track luger, she won the gold medal in the women's singles event at the 1994 FIL World Luge Natural Track Championships in Gsies, Italy. 
This biographical article relating to Italian luge is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Acidicapsa borealis  is a Gram-negative, short rods and non-motile bacterium from the genus of Acidicapsa which has been isolated from sphagnum peat from the Tver Region in Russia. 
Since finishing Kare Kano, she worked on the series Chotto Edo Made which appeared in LaLa from May 2008 through August 2011. She then  has started work on Hinoko, premiering in LaLa in March 2012. 
Erica Miechowsky (born September 30, 1961), known professionally as Erica Ehm, is a Canadian writer, actor, songwriter, entrepreneur and TV host. She is best known as a pioneering video jockey at the Canadian cable television station MuchMusic. 
She got her first job at CHOM-FM sorting records for DJs. She began her television career by contributing to Musi-Video, a local rock and video show produced in Montreal, Quebec. She graduated with a Bachelor of Arts degree in Communications from the University of Ottawa. 
Ehm moved to Toronto where she found a job working as a receptionist at Citytv, which owned the soon-to-launch cable channel MuchMusic, and when the new station began hiring video jockeys in 1984 she applied and became one of the station's first VJs. 
After having a child in 2000 with her spouse Terry Moshenberg, who founded The League of Rock, and another child in 2003, she runs the Yummy Mummy Club. She has written three stage musicals for the family market. After her first play, Caillou's Big Party, sold out in theatres across North America, she was commissioned to write two other shows, The Big Comfy Couch and Caillou's Big Book Club.[citation needed] 
Ehm authored She Should Talk: Conversations with Exceptional Women about Life, Dreams and Success, published by HarperCollins, as well as a children's book, The Mischievous Mom at the Art Gallery. In 2002, she hosted a weekly call-in show on CFRB 1010, a Toronto news/talk radio station, combining current events and lifestyle topics.[citation needed] 
Lesko Synagogue is a synagogue in Lesko, Poland. The synagogue had functioned as a place of worship until World War II. 
The synagogue was built during the years 1626-1654 by the Sephardic Jewish community of Lesko. By the twentieth century, it was one of six synagogues in the town, and the only one whose building survived the Second World War, although in a very damaged state; the interior was devastated by the German invaders of Poland. For almost two decades after the war, it was neglected. It was renovated from the 1960s onwards. 
This article about a synagogue or other Jewish place of worship in Poland is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
A few years later Salmon was dispatched from Belize to take custody of William Walker, an American citizen who had briefly been president of Nicaragua, but who was now attempting further conquests in Central America. The British Government regarded Walker as a menace to its own affairs in the region. Salmon captured Walker and delivered him to the authorities in Honduras, who promptly had him court-martialed and shot. 
Salmon went on to be Commander-in-Chief, Cape of Good Hope and West Coast of Africa Station, then Commander-in-Chief, China Station and finally Commander-in-Chief, Portsmouth. 
Date of Act of Bravery, 16 November 1857 For conspicuous gallantry at Lucknow, on the 16 November 1857, in climbing up a tree, touching the angle of the Shah Nujjiff, to reply to the fire of the enemy, for which most dangerous service, the late Captain Peel, K.C.B., had called for volunteers.
Promoted to rear admiral on 2 August 1879, Salmon became Commander-in-Chief, Cape of Good Hope and West Coast of Africa Station, with his flag in the corvette HMS Boadicea, in April 1882. Promoted to vice admiral on 1 July 1885, he was advanced to Knight Commander of the Order of the Bath on 21 June 1887. He went on to be Commander-in-Chief, China Station, with his flag in the armoured cruiser HMS Imperieuse, in December 1887. 
Salmon's Victoria Cross is on display in the Lord Ashcroft Gallery at the Imperial War Museum in London. 
Grant Ashley Brown (born 19 November 1969) is an English football coach and former professional footballer. 
After beginning his professional career with Leicester City in 1988, he made 14 appearances for the Foxes before then Lincoln City manager Colin Murphy persuaded him to join the team at Sincil Bank. 
She was awarded the Pulitzer Prize for History and the National Book Award for Nonfiction and 15 other prizes in 2009 for her work on the Hemings family of Monticello. In 2010, she received the National Humanities Medal and a MacArthur Fellowship. Since 2018, she has served as a trustee of the National Humanities Center in Research Triangle Park, NC. She was elected a Member of the American Philosophical Society in 2019. She is a Trustee of the Gilder Lehrman Institute of American History. 
Gordon-Reed was born in Livingston, Texas, to Bettye Jean Gordon and Alfred Gordon. She grew up in Jim Crow Conroe, Texas and was the first black child in her elementary school.  In third grade she became interested in Thomas Jefferson.  She graduated from Dartmouth College in 1981 and Harvard Law School in 1984, where she was a member of the Harvard Law Review. 
Gordon-Reed is married to Robert R. Reed, a justice of the Supreme Court of the State of New York, whom she met while at Harvard Law School. She lives on the Upper West Side of New York with her husband and two children, Gordon and Susan. 
In 2010, she joined Harvard University with joint appointments in history and law, and as Carol K. Pforzheimer Professor at the Radcliffe Institute for Advanced Study. In 2012, she was appointed the Charles Warren Professor of American Legal History at HLS. In 2014, she was the Harold Vyvyan Harmsworth Visiting Professor at Queen's College, University of Oxford. 
As some historians began to reinvestigate Jefferson in the late twentieth century, his defenders responded as if assertions of his paternity were intended to damage his historical reputation, despite the widespread acknowledgement by then of the numerous interracial liaisons in Jefferson's time. In 1974, Fawn M. Brodie wrote the first biography of Jefferson to seriously examine the evidence related to Sally Hemings; she thought the Hemings-Jefferson liaison was likely. 
Gordon-Reed "drew on her legal training to apply context and reasonable interpretation to the sparse documentation" and analyzed the historiography as well. The writer Christopher Hitchens in Slate described her analysis as "brilliant." 
Critics such as John Works and Robert F. Turner of the Thomas Jefferson Heritage Society have pointed out several transcription errors in Gordon-Reed's first book. Although Gordon-Reed said the errors were a "mistake," Works and Turner have alleged them to be alterations of historical documents. 
This memoir of Vernon Jordan, the civil rights activist, written with him, portrayed his life from childhood through the 1980s. It won the Best Nonfiction Book for 2001 from the Black Caucus of the American Library Association. In 2002 it won an Anisfield-Wolf Book Award and a Trailblazer Award from the Metropolitan Black Bar Association. 
Gordon-Reed was the first African American to win the Pulitzer Prize for History, for her 2008 work on the Hemings family. She won 15 additional awards for the book. 
On March 7, 2009, she was interviewed on the WBGO program Conversations with Allan Wolper. She discussed the intimate relationship between Thomas Jefferson and Sally Hemings, as well as issues that American black women face today. 
The Holy See has a history of difficult relations with Turkey, or rather with the Ottoman Empire, whose forces its European allies defeated at the naval battle of Lepanto in 1571 and the battle of Vienna in 1683. The Holy See maintained positive relations with Armenia, even when it was under Ottoman rule. It was also involved in the Balkans and Greece at a time when nationalities were emancipating themselves from Turkish domination. 
Pope Paul VI visited Turkey in July 1967 During his visit he met with Eastern Orthodox Patriarch Athenagoras I of Constantinople, Shenork I Kaloustian, Armenian Patriarch of Constantinople as well as members of the Muslim and Jewish communities. 
Pope John Paul II visited Turkey in November 1979. He met with Patriarch Dimitrios I of Constantinople and Armenian Patriarch Shenork I as well as celebrating the Eucharist in Ephesus. 
In 2006, Pope Benedict XVI visited Turkey and its famous Blue Mosque. It was only the second time a sitting Pope was known to have entered a mosque and was part of his efforts to mend Muslim-Christian relations, but was overshadowed by the controversy surrounding lecture at Regensburg which was interpreted by some as an attempt to link Islam and violence. He was met with 25,000 nationalist and Islamist protesters when he arrived at Ankara. 
The Church has also sought to have improved legal recognition of itself under Turkish law, which at present makes it difficult for Catholic bishops to be legally recognized in their exercise of Apostolic ministry, while at times the ownership of churches is put into question. Similar problems have come up with the Greek Patriarchate, whose seminary training was shut down by the Turkish state. 
Smicrips texana is a species of palmetto beetle in the family Smicripidae. It is found in North America. 
Little Barrie is an English rock group consisting of Barrie Cadogan (vocals, guitar) and Lewis Wharton (bass, vocals). Virgil Howe contributed drums and vocals from 2007 until his death in 2017. Their sound has drawn from a mixture of influences including freakbeat, garage rock, UK R&B, neo-psychedelia, surf rock, krautrock, funk and rock and roll. The band released Death Express in 2017. 
Following further tours across Europe, Japan and Australia in 2007 the band backed Paul Weller on the title track of his album 22 Dreams. In late 2007 Virgil Howe, son of Yes guitarist Steve Howe, replaced Skinner on drums. The first recordings featuring the new lineup were in March 2008, when alongside Martin Duffy on keys the trio backed French Polynesian artist Mareva Galanter on her album Happy Fiu. 
Following the release of King of the Waves they hit the road again in Japan and across Europe. In November 2011, the band opened for rising New York soul singer Charles Bradley and his band The Extroadinaires for two shows in Spain. Little Barrie were the opening band on Charles Bradley's US tour on the east coast in February - March 2012. Two more US tours followed that year, spanning the east and west coasts as well as performing in Texas and the mid west. 
During 2012, work began on writing new songs for the band's fourth album Shadow. The band continued tour, including a return to the US for shows in Texas and also opening for Dinosaur Jr and The Jon Spencer Blues Explosion before supporting The Stone Roses at La Cigalle in Paris in June. The group then performed in Vietnam and Japan before returning to rehearse tracks for the new album to be recorded that summer. 
In January 2015 the band wrote and performed the main title theme music to the Breaking Bad spin-off Better Call Saul. The full length version of the song was opening track on the album Better Call Saul - Original Television Soundtrack: Season 1, released in November 2015. Season two of the series also featured "Why Don't You Do It" from "Stand Your Ground". 
On 12 September 2017 Virgil Howe's unexpected death was announced by Yes, of which Virgil Howe's father Steve is a member. 
Virgil Howe was the son of guitarist Steve Howe and worked on a number of projects with him.   Nexus, by Virgil and Steve Howe was released on 17 November 2017. 
Pasur is a panchayat town in the Erode district in the Indian state of Tamil Nadu. Nearby areas include Molasi, Solasiramani and Karumandampalyam 
As of 2001[update] India census, Pasur had a population of 3852. Males constitute 51% of the population and females 49%. Pasur has an average literacy rate of 56%, lower than the national average of 59.5%: male literacy is 65%, and female literacy is 47%. In Pasur, 8% of the population is under 6 years of age. 
Englert made her debut on the German team in 2001. She received a bronze medal at the 2007 World Championship. 
This biographical article related to German team handball is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The airport is currently the main hub for Thai Airways International, Thai Smile Airways, Bangkok Airways and Thai Vietjet Air. It also serves as regional gateway and connecting point for various foreign carriers connecting to Asia, Oceania, Europe and Africa. 
Suvarnabhumi was officially opened for limited domestic flight service on 15 September 2006, and opened for most domestic and all international commercial flights on 28 September 2006. 
Suvarnabhumi is the 17th busiest airport in the world, eleventh busiest airport in Asia, and the busiest in the country, having handled 60 million passengers in 2017, and is also a major air cargo hub, with a total of 95 airlines. On social networks, Suvarnabhumi was the world's most popular site for taking Instagram photographs in 2012. 
The airport inherited the airport code, BKK, from Don Mueang after the previous airport ceased international commercial flights. Motorway 7 connects the airport, Bangkok, and the heavily industrial eastern seaboard of Thailand, where most export manufacturing takes place. 
The need for the new airport was recognized in 1973 when 8,000 acres of land was purchased 40 kilometres east of Bangkok. The site, known as Cobra Swamp, was drained and named Suvarnabhumi, meaning "realm of gold". On 14 October 1973, student-led protests led to the overthrow of the military government of Prime Minister Thanom Kittikachorn and the project was shelved. 
After a series of ups and downs, the "New Bangkok International Airport" company (NBIA) was formed in 1996. Due to political and economic instabilities, notably the Asian financial crisis of 1997, construction did not begin until six years later in January 2002 by the government of Thaksin Shinawatra. 
The airport was due to open in late 2004, but a series of budget overruns, construction flaws, and allegations of corruption plagued the project. 
A further delay was caused by the discovery that the airport had been built over an old graveyard. Superstitious construction workers claimed to have seen ghosts there. On 23 September 2005, the Thai airports authority held a ceremony where 99 Buddhist monks chanted to appease the spirits. 
On 15 September 2006, the airport started limited daily operations with Jetstar Asia Airways operating three Singapore to Bangkok flights.  Bangkok Airways moved to the airport on 21 September. AirAsia and Thai AirAsia followed on 25 September and on 26 September Nok Air moved to Suvarnabhumi Airport. During this initial phase, as well as in the previous tests, the airport used the temporary IATA code NBK.[citation needed] 
Suvarnabhumi officially opened at 03:00 on 28 September 2006, taking over all flights from Don Mueang. The first flight to arrive was a Lufthansa Cargo flight LH8442 from Mumbai at 03:05. The first commercial arrival was Japan Airlines at 03:30. The first passenger arrival was Aerosvit flight VV171 from Kyiv at 04:30, and the first cargo departure was Saudi Arabian Airlines flight SV-984 to Riyadh at 05:00. Aerosvit also had the first passenger departure (VV172 to Kyiv) around 05:30. 
In January 2007, ruts were discovered in the runways at Suvarnabhumi. The east runway was scheduled to close for repairs. Expert opinions varied as to the cause of the ruts. Airport authorities and airline representatives maintained that the airport was still safe and resisted suggestions that the airport should be completely closed and all flights moved back to Don Mueang. 
On 27 January 2007, the Department of Civil Aviation declined to renew the airport's safety certificate, which had expired the previous day. The ICAO requires that international airports hold aerodrome safety certificates, but Suvarnabhumi continued to operate because the ICAO requirement had yet to be adopted as part of Thai law. 
As of early 2016, tarmac problems persisted at Suvarnabhumi. Soft spots on the tarmac, taxiways, and apron area had not been permanently fixed. Aircraft were getting stuck on the soft surfaces that are the result of sub-standard materials. "The constant resurfacing of the tarmac, taxiways and apron area with asphalt is an unacceptable patchwork solution. We literally need a "concrete" solution," said Tony Tyler, IATA's director general and CEO. 
Airports of Thailand found that the cost of fixing 60 identified problems at the airport would be less than one percent of the total airline cost and the problems could be fixed in up to four to five years. Dr Narupol Chaiyut, a member of a committee overseeing service problems at the new airport, estimated that 70 percent of the problems would be fixed in 2007. Twenty of the 60 problems were successfully fixed by February 2007. 
On 25 January 2007, due to work upgrading the taxiways which suffered from small cracks, a few incoming flights were delayed and several flights were safely diverted to U-Tapao International Airport in Rayong Province. 
In January 2021, a motorist drove his car through security gates and onto the tarmac at the airport while it was in use. It was later revealed that the driver had been under the influence of methamphetamine, which were also discovered in the trunk of the car. The driver claimed that he had taken a wrong turn. 
On 1 October 2010, two hundred armed men occupied the airport's parking area for an hour, blocking the building's entrances and seizing ticket booths to collect fares from motorists. Airport security personnel failed to respond, reportedly because of an internal dispute within the parking management company, the firm contracted to run the parking facilities. 
The airport's two runways can accommodate 64 flights per hour. At peak times the runways average 63 flights per hour. In April 2019 the Thai cabinet approved a sum of 21.8 billion baht for the construction of a third runway. Construction will start in 2019 and be completed in 2021. The third runway will accommodate a maximum of 30 flights per hour. The project will be managed by Airports of Thailand (AOT). 
From the opening of Suvarnabhumi in 2006 to early 2017, eight people had fallen to their deaths from upper-floor walkways, prompting the airport to spend 33 million baht in 2013 building glass barriers to prevent people from falling and/or taking their lives. 
By mid-2015, the airport was handling more than 800 flights per day, higher than its 600-flight capacity. It has exceeded its capacity of 45 million passengers per year. 
The new passenger terminal will be used only by Bangkok Airways and flag carrier Thai Airways (and its regional subsidiary Thai Smile). Upon completion of the satellite terminal, other Star Alliance members will be given the check-in concourse of Thai Airways. 
The ARL Station is located on the Underground floor of Suvarnabhumi Airport which also links to the Airports' Novotel Hotel adjacent to the Main Terminal. 
Northeast of the Airport is Suvarnabhumi Public Transport Center, which is the Airport's Main Bus Terminal. 
A free bus service connecting Suvarnabhumi Airport and Don Mueang Airport operates from 05.00 until midnight. Three air-conditioned city bus routes are operated by Bangkok Mass Transit Authority (BMTA) serve the airport's dedicated bus terminal. There are also direct buses between the airports operated by Airport Shuttle Bus. 
Located on Level 1 (Ground Level) are where the Public Taxis are located. A ticket printed from the ticket queue machine (located on the same floor) is required before queuing up for a taxi. 
The airport has five main access routes. Among these the most convenient route is via the Bangkok Chon Buri Motorway (Motorway 7). Another main airport entrance is in Samut Prakan Province via the expressway from Bang Na to Bang Pakong. 
The Airport has 7 different car park zones, with zone 2 & 3 having direct access to the departure/arrival terminal. Located northeast of the airport is the Longterm Car Park Zone, next to the Bus Terminal. 
The airport has provided five entrance routes. The main route is via the motorway in the north of Bangkok, directly connecting Bangkok's downtown and Chonburi Province, the industrial and harbor city in eastern Thailand. However, another main airport entrance is in Samut Prakan Province, connecting an elevated highway in the south of Bangkok from Bang Na to Bang Pakong. 
 Media related to Suvarnabhumi International Airport at Wikimedia Commons  Suvarnabhumi Airport travel guide from Wikivoyage 
Randers Museum of Art (Danish: Randers Kunstmuseum) is a Danish art museum in Randers in northeastern Jutland, Denmark. The museum is located in the cultural centre of Kulturhuset (The House of Culture) in the town centre and displays many of the major works of Danish painters, especially those of the 19th and 20th centuries. 
Located at Stemannsgade 2, 2, Randers, the museum collection is open to visitors free of charge from 10 am to 4 pm, Tuesday to Sunday (and until 8 pm on the last Wednesday each month). Closed from 24 to 26 December, 31 December, 1 January, 1 May and 5 June. 
The river is crossed three times by the Calder Freeway near Kyneton; and by the McIvor Highway near Eppalock. The Midland Highway and Northern Highway duplex crosses the river at Elmore and the Murray Valley Highway and Northern Highway duplex crosses the river at Echuca. 
As the river is relatively long, indigenous peoples from various cultural groups lived near the river course. In the indigenous Yorta Yorta language, the name for the river is Yalka or Yalooka, meaning "dry leaf." In the Daungwurrung language the name for the river is Boregam, with no clearly defined meaning. While in the Daungwurrung and Ngurai-illamwurrung language, the river is named Yerrin, with no clearly defined meaning. 
Ruralco is a diversified agricultural company that provides real estate, insurance, auctioneer services, agricultural equipment and other services to the Australian rural community. Ruralco became a wholly owned subsidiary of Canadian company Nutrien in 2019. 
Ruralco was founded in 1970. By 2001 it had 384 rural supply stores under the brands CRT and Town & Country. In September of that year it merged with Grow Force Australia. 
In May 2006 it reverse merged with Australia's oldest publicly listed company, Tasmanian agricultural corporation Roberts Limited. 
In 2008 it was described as having quietly begun to rival the 'big two' of agricultural industry in Australia, Elders Limited and Landmark. By 2014 it owned 10.1% of Elders, unsuccessfully attempting to purchase the rural services section of Elders for 250 million in 2013. Following falling profits from Elders and the knockback of its purchase offer, it sold all 10.1% of the company. 
In February 2014 it acquired Total Eden, a water supplies company, from Anchorage Capital Partners for AUD$57.4 million. 
In June 2019, Agrium Australia Pty Ltd (formerly Landmark, now a wholly owned subsidiary of Canadian company Nutrien) announced the proposed acquisition of Ruralco. 
Ruralco shareholders voted overwhelmingly in favour of the $469 million takeover and Ruralco was delisted from the Australian Securities Exchange on 1 October 2019. 
Alverstone railway station, was an intermediate station situated on the edge of Alverstone village      on the Isle of Wight, off the south coast of England. 
Served by the line from Newport  to Sandown, the station was incorporated by the Isle of Wight (Newport Junction) Railway in 1868 opened in 1875. Absorbed by the Isle of Wight Central Railway, it became part of the Southern Railway during the Grouping of 1923. Passing on to the Southern Region of British Railways on nationalisation in 1948, it was then  closed 81 years after opening by the British Transport Commission. 
During a Second World War blackout a train ran through Alverstone and  a railwayman had to escort the passengers back to there from Newchurch. 
The station house is now a private residence. It is a prominent landmark on the walking route and cycle path that runs through Borthwood Copse and into Alverstone Mead. 
This article on a railway station in South East England is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Anglican Diocese of Oleh is one of 12 within the Anglican Province of Bendel, itself one of 14 provinces within the Church of Nigeria. The  current bishop is John Usiwoma Aruakpor. 
The 2010 European Pairs Speedway Championship was the seventh UEM European Pairs Speedway Championship season. The Final took place on 18 September 2010 in Stralsund, Germany. The Championship was won by the defending Champion Czech Republic who beat host team Germany and Croatia. 
This annulment of French claims over Turkish land was later officially recognised in the Armistice of Mudanya. The new border was recognized in the subsequent Treaty of Lausanne in 1923. 
The story is a parable about the dangers of new technologies and the unintended consequences that scientific innovations can produce. 
The Gusevogoroskoye mine is a large iron mine located in western Russia in the Sverdlovsk Oblast. Gusevogoroskoye represents one of the largest iron ore reserves in Russia and in the world having estimated reserves of 2.82 billion tonnes of ore grading 15.7% iron metal. 
The Heritage Council (Irish: An Comhairle Oidhreachta) is an organisation created by the Irish government to "engage, educate and advocate to develop a wider understanding of the vital contribution that our heritage makes to our social, environmental and economic well-being." 
The Heritage Council was established under the Heritage Act 1995. Its current CEO is Virginia Teehan. 
The Council's purview includes monuments, archaeological objects, heritage objects such as art and industrial works, documents and genealogical records, architectural heritage, flora, fauna, wildlife habitats, landscapes, seascapes, wrecks, geology, heritage gardens, parks and inland waterways. 
The Heritage Council established the Museums Standards Programme for Ireland (MSPI) in 2007, to benchmark and promote professional standards in the care of collections and to recognise through accreditation the achievement of those standards within the Irish museum sector. As of 2020, 43 museums have been fully accredited through the MSPI programme. 
Marie McMahon (born Marie Elizabeth Rita McMahon) is an Australian artist known for her paintings, prints, posters, drawings, and design work. Born in Melbourne, she has worked in various communities of Australian Aboriginal people and today works in Sydney, Australia. Her work has focused on social, political, and environmental issues. Her posters about Aboriginal rights and Aboriginal life appear in major gallery collections in Australia. 
McMahon was born in Melbourne, Australia, in September 1953. She grew up on Australian Air Force bases in Darwin, Australia, at Richmond near Sydney, and at HMAS Albatross, a naval base on the South Coast of New South Wales. During the 1960s her family lived in the Philippines until they returned to Sydney. 
Among her many well-known posters are You are on Aboriginal land and the Australian Government's health promotion Beat the grog and Condoman AIDS awareness campaign, developed in collaboration with Aboriginal and Torres Strait Islander health workers. 
Marie also produced prints at the Australian Print Workshop in Fitzroy, Victoria and so was included in a major exhibition Place Made: Australian Print Workshop held in early 2004 at the National Gallery of Australia (NGA). When the NGA acquired many prints from the Workshop, they acquired more than 90 of McMahon's prints. 
In 1976 McMahon and artist Frances (Budden) Phoenix initiated The Women's Domestic Needlework Group (WDNG) Their aim was to reclaim the creative, but historically undervalued, practices of embroidery, knitting, crochet, lace making and needlework. 
The most significant of their four exhibitions was the D'Oyley exhibition at Watters Gallery in Sydney in 1979. The exhibition, focusing on women's 'fancywork' featured more than 700 handmade doilies that were collected from various thrift shops. The exhibition was sponsored the Crafts Board of the Australia Council. 
McMahon's prints and posters are held in the National Gallery of Victoria, the Bendigo Regional Gallery, the National Gallery of Australia, the Art Gallery of New South Wales, and the Museum of Contemporary Art in Sydney. as well as in various regional galleries in Australia and in private collections. 
The Meath county football team represents Meath in men's Gaelic football and is governed by Meath GAA, the county board of the Gaelic Athletic Association. The team competes in the three major annual inter-county competitions; the All-Ireland Senior Football Championship, the Leinster Senior Football Championship and the National Football League. 
The team last won the Leinster Senior Championship in 2010, the All-Ireland Senior Championship in 1999 and the National League in 1994. 
During this period, their Leinster Championship rivalry with Louth became legendary: in the six provincial championships between 1948 and 1953 the sides met each year. The 1949 match went to three meetings, while those of 1950 and 1951 were replayed. 
Meath's team of the 1960s was characterised by a chronic inability to score until after half-time, but might have reached the 1964 All-Ireland final had a goal by Jack Quinn not been controversially disallowed in the semi-final. Meath were beaten in the 1966 All-Ireland final by a legendary Galway team that was winning its third All-Ireland title in a row. 
After the 1966 final defeat, centre-back Bertie Cunningham declared that "next year, we will come back and win the All-Ireland". Sure enough, Terry Kearns secured the Sam Maguire Cup for Meath with a punched goal in the 1967 final to defeat Cork. 
Meath won the National Football League in 1975 and looked a promising prospect for the All-Ireland. Defeat at the hands of Kevin Heffernan's Dublin team, however, was an indication of what was to come. Heffo's Dubs prevented Meath from winning provincial titles, before a talented Offaly team emerged to win more Leinster titles and become the only team capable of challenging the great Kerry team that dominated football between 1975 and 1986. 
Meath looked far from All-Ireland Championship material when losing to Wexford in 1981 and Longford in 1982. By the time the 1983 Leinster began, Meath had appointed the hurling team's masseur, Sean Boylan, as football manager, and few could have predicted the success that would come to the county under his reign. 
In 1984 the GAA initiated a one-off competition called the Centenary Cup, to celebrate the 100th anniversary of the GAA's foundation. Despite a concerted effort by the Kerry team (who had won four All-Irelands in a row from 1978 to 1981), the Centenary Cup final was ultimately played between Meath and Monaghan. Meath emerged victorious, and when Boylan was asked for comment, he replied that Meath intended to retain their title another hundred years later. 
A tired Meath had finally qualified for the First Round of the Leinster Championship, and played the next match against Wicklow, which also ended in a draw, before Meath emerged victorious in yet another replay. Meath then proceeded to beat Offaly in the semi-final, before overcoming Laois to win their hardest-fought Leinster title yet. Victory over Roscommon in the All-Ireland semi-final set up a meeting with Down in the All-Ireland final. 
The 1992 Championship started with a three-point home defeat to Laois which proved the final outing for many of the great side who then retired from inter-county football. 
Meath won a League title in 1994 with Robbie O'Malley of St. Colmcille's captaining the side to victory over Armagh. In the Championship, though, 1994 Meath were beaten by Dublin and the last of the team of 1986-94 retired. 
A new team was formed for 1995. This team included many new stars like Trevor Giles Graham Geraghty. However, these younger players were largely inexperienced for championship football and came up short against a Dublin team determined to win the Championship outright. The resultant 10-point drubbing left a strong impression on the younger Meath players of how much work was needed to win silverware. 
Deep into injury time in the 74th minute of the match, a goal was awarded to Meath by the referee after brief consultation with only one of the match umpires. Television coverage of the game proved that the ball was carried over the line by Meath player Joe Sherdian. Prior to the goal being awarded Meath had trailed by 1 point and with the referee blowing his whistle shortly afterwards this proved to be the decisive score. 
In September 2010, speculations begun whether or not Eamonn O'Brien would continue as manager for 2011. On 7 September 2010 O'Brien was surprisingly axed as manager after the club's board voted him out. 
One commonly reported suggestion for the decline in Meath football was the advent of the Celtic Tiger, held to have softened the players the county produced. 
RET Player has since retired from the county team. INJ Player has had an injury which has affected recent involvement with the county team. WD Player has since withdrawn from the county team due to a non-injury issue. 
She is the holder of national record in discus throw set on May 30, 1999 in Krasnodar, Russia. She participated at the 2000 Summer Olympics in Sydney, Australia without success. 
This biographical article relating to Turkish athletics and track and field is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Most botanists have treated Welwitschia as a distinct monotypic genus in a monotypic family or even order.  Most recent systems place Welwitschia mirabilis in its own family Welwitschiaceae in the gymnosperm order Gnetales, although other extinct species have been placed in this family. 
Welwitschia has been classified as a CAM plant (crassulacean acid metabolism) after reconciliation of some initially contradictory and confusing data. There are however some very puzzling aspects to the matter; for example, the employment of the CAM metabolism is very slight, which was part of the reason that it took so long to establish its presence at all; it is not understood why this should be. 
The population of Welwitschia mirabilis in the wild is reasonably satisfactory at present. The international trade in the plant is controlled under the Convention on International Trade in Endangered Species of Wild Fauna and Flora. Plants in Angola are better protected than those in Namibia, because of the relatively high concentration of land mines in Angola, which keep collectors away. 
The Harvard law professor Alan Dershowitz wrote, in a letter to the editor of the Boston Globe, "Surely Dean Thiemann would not have been asked to resign if he had been found using his Harvard-owned computer to keep track of his private stamp collection. Nor would he have been asked to leave if a cleaning person had found a copy of a pornographic magazine in the desk drawer of his Harvard-owned residence. What, then, is the principle, and where are the lines to be drawn?" 
This biographical article relating to American golf is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Megachile papuae is a species of bee in the family Megachilidae. It was described by Charles Duncan Michener in 1965. 
Lawyer Mike McBride is a curmudgeon with a heart of gold. He takes cases based on their merit rather than on their monetary value, which often leads to terse notices from bill collectors. A disillusioned member of the LAPD, McBride left the force after 12 years and went back to school to become a lawyer. McBride, sidekick Phil Newberry, and McBride's former girlfriend Detective Roberta Hansen, solve crimes through investigation and research. 
The station was built by the Interborough Rapid Transit Company (IRT) as part of the Dual Contracts with New York City, and opened on July 1, 1918. The station had its platforms extended in the 1960s, and was renovated in 1994. 
This underground station has two side platforms and four tracks. In a fashion similar to the former 91st Street on the same line and 33rd Street on the Lexington Avenue Line, the two center tracks appears to descend within the confines of the station. As a result, the express tracks are at a lower elevation than the local tracks in the northern half of the station. The center tracks are used by the 2 and 3 express trains during daytime hours. 
Both platforms have golden mosaic trim lines with blue and green borders and "H" tablets on a light blue background at regular intervals. The large name tablets read "HOUSTON ST." in gold font on a dark blue background and gold border. There are also directional tablets in the same style. Yellow I-beam columns run along both platforms at regular intervals with alternating ones having the standard black station name plate with white Helvetica lettering. 
The station's artwork, installed during a 1994 in-house renovation, is entitled Platform Diving by Deborah Brown. It consists of murals on both platforms depicting sea creatures in an underwater subway system. 
All fare control areas in this station are at platform level and there are no crossovers or crossunders. On both sides, a turnstile bank leads to a two staircases going up to West Houston and Varick Streets, either western corners on the South Ferry-bound side and either eastern corners on the Bronx-bound side. Only the Bronx-bound side has a token booth; the South Ferry-bound side is unstaffed. 
Both platforms have an unstaffed secondary fare control area towards their south ends. Two high entry/exit turnstiles and one exit-only turnstile leads to two staircases going up to Varick and King Streets, either western corners on the South Ferry-bound side and either eastern corners on the Bronx-bound side. 
Market Harborough is a market town in the Harborough district of Leicestershire, England, in the far southeast of the county, forming part of the border with Northamptonshire. 
Market Harborough was formerly part of Rockingham Forest, a royal hunting forest used by the medieval monarchs starting with William I, whose original boundaries stretched from Market Harborough through to Stamford and included Corby, Kettering, Desborough, Rothwell, Thrapston and Oundle. 
Market Harborough has two villages within its confines: Great Bowden lies over a hill about a mile from the town centre; Little Bowden is less than half a mile from the town centre. The three centres have largely coalesced through ribbon development and infill, although Great Bowden continues to retain a strong village identity. 
A market was established by 1204 and has been held on a Tuesday ever since 1221. Eventually this market lead to the modern name of Market Harborough.  The trades people of Harborough had large tofts or farm yards at the rear of their property where goods were made and stored. Many of these yards remain but have been subdivided down their length over the years to give frontage to the High Street. 
An independent church was established in the Harborough area following the Act of Uniformity 1662 and a meeting house was built in Bowden Lane in 1694. 
During the 18th century the timber mud and thatch buildings of the town were largely replaced with brick buildings. After roads were turnpiked and regularly repaired (making wheeled traffic easier all year round) Harborough became a staging point for coach travel on the road to London from the North West and the Midlands. In 1776 the Open Fields of Great Bowden were allotted to individual owners and fenced with hedges planted, followed by those of Little Bowden in 1780. 
Market Harborough became a centre for fox hunting with hounds during the 19th century when Mr Tailby of Skeffington Hall established a hunt in South East Leicestershire in 1856. The country between Billesdon and Harborough was considered severe, involving jumping the specially designed ox fences.  His hunting diary is recognised as an important document in the history of hunting. The Hunt was renamed the Fernie after a subsequent Master. 
The Grand National Hunt Steeple Chase was held to the south west of the town in 1860, 1861 and 1863. This race and the meeting eventually developed into the Cheltenham Festival and the organisers were part of the founding of organised steeplechasing through the Grand National Hunt Committee. 
In 1898, Walter Haddon opened the Caxton Works type foundry on Lathkill Street. The company later diversified into the manufacture of lead acid batteries, changing its name to Tungstone Products. The factory was closed down in 2002. 
A covered market hall was opened at the western end of the Cattlemarket in 1938, replacing the market stalls on the Square on Tuesdays and Saturdays. 
Following serious flooding in the town centre on 2 July 1958, a flood relief scheme was begun and the river bed was straightened and deepened. 
In 1968 the centre of Market Harborough was declared a conservation area. Major developments included the development of headquarters for Golden Wonder crisp makers, and the demolition of the old Symington factory in Adam and Eve Street for redevelopment as Eden Court shops and flats. 
During the 1970s, draft proposals were made for an inner relief road to avoid traffic congestion in the town centre. However, it was rejected in favour of a bypass outside the town. 
In 1993 the former cattle market, bus station, indoor market and several properties next to the old post office and the former Peacock Hotel were re-developed to form a new pedestrianised shopping centre called St Mary's Place. This included a Sainsbury's supermarket. 
A footpath and cycleway alongside the canal to Foxton became part of the National Cycle Network Route 6.  The path continues south following the Brampton Valley Way a long and narrow recreation area on the route of the former railway line to Northampton. 
The canal basin was restored as a boating centre called Union Wharf. This consists of workshops, restaurant, studios and flats. There are residential moorings and canal boats can be hired. 
A cycle and footway along the river through the town was created called the Millennium Mile and links Welland Park with the railway station. In 2007 Welland Park was awarded Green Flag Award status and in 2008 a large new children's play area was opened. 
The Midland Main Line railway connects to London St Pancras. A branch of the Grand Union Canal terminates in the north part of the town and connects to the main canal near Foxton and the Foxton Locks. (see below) 
The Parliamentary Constituency is Harborough which includes the town, surrounding rural areas as well as the urban areas of Oadby, Wigston and South Wigston, all southern suburbs of the city of Leicester to the north. 
The town is in the southern area of Leicestershire County Council close to the border with Northamptonshire. 
One of the town's most notable features is an unusual former grammar school located in the town centre which stands on wooden stilts. The school room had to be built upon posts to allow the butter market to be held on the ground floor. The school was founded in 1607 and built in 1614, through the generosity of Robert Smyth, a poor native of the town who became Comptroller of the Lord Mayor's Court of the City of London and member of the Merchant Taylors' Company. 
The subjects taught were Latin, Greek and Hebrew, and many boys were sent to Oxford and Cambridge universities. The most distinguished of these was John Moore, who became Bishop of Norwich in 1691, and Bishop of Ely in 1707 and also William Henry Bragg, Nobel Prize winner. This is commemorated by a plaque inside the old schoolroom. 
The grammar school has since moved sites and is now the Robert Smyth Academy for 11- to 18-year-olds. The school badge is the arms of the City of London. The school is divided into houses one of which is named "Bragg". 
HM Prison Gartree is west of the town near Foxton and the site of a prisoner escape by helicopter in 1987. The prison caters for prisoners on life sentences. 
There are 4,750 VAT or PAYE registered businesses in the Harborough district. Compared to the United Kingdom the Harborough district has a greater proportion of smaller organisations with fewer than 10 employees; 87.16% vs. 82.8% in the UK overall. 
Golden Wonder was based at Edinburgh House from 1970 until 2006 when it went into administration under Kroll. The former headquarters has become a Travelodge. 
Rubitek Solutions Limited is based in Market Harborough.  They are a SaaS company, delivering solutions for employers and training providers which improve qualification achievement rates for apprentices and other work-based learners. 
Market Harborough has an Orchestra and The Harborough Collective, a professional classical ensemble formed by violinist David le Page. BabyGigs is a local initiative bringing live classical music performed by professional players to babies and young children. The Great Bowden Recital Trust is a charitable music organisation. 
The town's brass band, The Harborough Band, was formed in 1897 and Market Harborough Choral Society is also long established. 
The town is home to The Harborough Singers, a chamber choir. Other choirs include The Dolly Mixtures, the Songbirds ladies' choir, the 90-strong choir of the Great Bowden Recital Trust and a Rock Choir. 
Market Harborough Musical Theatre has been active since 1948. Its theatre is located close to St. Dionysius' Church. The theatre is also home to Parsnips Youth Theatre and Octagon films, a club where residents may view films. From 1939 until 1978 the town had a cinema known as the Ritz, now demolished and replaced with residential apartments and shops. 
Live music gigs take place at a number of venues and pubs across the town including Joules Yard, The Nag's Head, the Congregational Hall and the Waterfront. 
In the 1967 film Robbery, a fictionalised dramatisation of the Great Train Robbery, the scenes at the railway bridge where the robbery took place were shot in the village of Theddingworth, 5 miles west of Market Harborough. 
Michael Wood's six-part documentary Story of England tells the story of one place, the village of Kibworth, 6 miles NW of Market Harborough. Filmed largely in around the villages of Kibworth Harcourt, Kibworth Beauchamp and Smeeton Westerby, it was first screened in 2010. 
In 2015 J. K. Rowling visited the town and, writing as Robert Galbraith, set part of her third Cormoran Strike novel Career of Evil in Market Harborough. 
Hockey: Market Harbrough Hockey Club (MHHC) are based in the town and participate in both winter and summer leagues. The club offers both competitive hockey as well as social hockey. There are three men's teams, three ladies teams, a mixed team, and a mixed U16 Badgers team, as well being popular with juniors.  
Football: Market Harborough has two teams: Harborough Town and Borough Alliance. Both cater for a variety of ages. Harborough Town F.C. has three senior teams, including a women's team. The Northampton Road clubhouse has received Football foundation, council and Bowden's Charity grants and awards, as well as sponsorship money, for improvements. Borough Alliance FC was founded in 2003 playing at Meadowdale School before moving to Symington's recreation ground in 2007. 
Squash and Racketball Club. Located in Fairfield Road, it has 5 courts and a bar area. In 2017 the Club was awarded National Club of the Year Award by The Squash Player Magazine.[citation needed] 
Cricket: Market Harborough Cricket Club has two cricket teams; Market Harborough CC and Harborough South CC. The former plays in the Leicestershire Premier Cricket League. 
Rugby: Market Harborough Rugby Club is near the leisure centre and until recently known as Kibworth Rugby Union Club. 
Golf: Market Harborough Golf Club sits to the south of the town itself; much of the golf course crosses over into Northamptonshire and is only about a mile from the Northants village of Great Oxendon. It is an 18-hole course and was set up in 1898. 
Running and Athletics: Harborough AC meets every Tuesday at 7.00pm at the Training Shed on St Mary's Road. The club caters for all abilities of runner from beginner to experienced club runners and provides coaching for road, cross country and track running. The club also runs a Junior Section. 
Market Harborough station is on the Midland Main Line and operated by East Midlands Railway. London St Pancras is 70 minutes south. Northbound trains operate to Leicester, Nottingham and Sheffield. 
Most bus services around the town are operated by Centrebus under contract from Leicestershire County Council while Arriva Midlands operate sapphire route X3 into Leicester and Stagecoach in Northamptonshire operate routes into Leicester, Kettering & Northampton. The town has its own community bus. 
The local newspaper the Harborough Mail, founded in 1854, is the oldest media outlet in the area. Published every Thursday, it became part of the JPI Media Group in 2018. It covers south Leicestershire and north Northamptonshire with a mix of local news and sport. It was originally published in broadsheet format, becoming a tabloid in 1942. 
The local radio station is much newer. HFM on 102.3FM was formed in November 1994 to provide a local FM station for Market Harborough and South Leicestershire, as it was felt[by whom?] that the established local independent and BBC stations did not cater for the area. OFCOM awarded the station a full-time licence on 15 July 2005 for 24 hours, 365 days a year operation. It is run largely by volunteers but has some freelance presenters. 
The station launched full-time on Saturday 10 February 2007, with a live broadcast from The Square in Market Harborough's town centre. The first official voice on the station was that of Chris Jones, Programme Controller, and the first record played was "Are You Ready For Love" by Elton John. 
Market Harborough Magazine is a glossy monthly publication covering Market Harborough and its surrounding area. 
HLA-DQ3 (DQ3) is a broad serotype category with split antigens HLA-DQ7, DQ8, and DQ9. Historically, originally recognized as MB3 a DC4 serotype, DQw3 was one of three early determined antigens recognized as HLA-DQ along with HLA-DQ1 and HLA-DQ2. While the DQ3 molecules are structurally similar in beta chain, the DQ molecules differ markedly in function, even when present with the same DQ alpha subunit. For this reason they are best treated independently. 
The serotyping efficiency of DQ3 recognition relative to DQ2, DQ7, DQ8, and DQ9 is shown to the left. Compared to DQ2 serotyping of DQB1*0201 positive individuals (98%), the efficiency of DQ3 recognition is relatively low and error prone. This compares to genotyping efficiency of 100%. The recognition of DQB1*0303 by DQ9 and or DQ3 is poorest, DQ2 which recognizes a different DBB1*group recognizes DQB1*0303 as efficiently as DQ3. 
For this reason DQ3 serotyping is a poor method of typing for transplantation or disease association prediction or study. Nonetheless, it is still widely used and association purported in the literature. 
McGowan got his first job in radio in May 1957, when he started as an office boy at 3UZ at the age of 14. His mother had heard about the job while listening to the station. Then he worked at the following radio stations in order: 3TR, 7BU, 7HO, 6PR, 3TR (again), 2NM, 2KA, 2HD, 2UW, 3MP, 3DB, 3AK, 3AW. 
McGowan first made a name for himself in Perth at 6PR in the mid-1960s, where he and his station, then known as The Home of the Good Guys rose to the top of the ratings. After his retirement, McGowan stated that his days at 6PR from 1964 to 1968 were the highlight of his career. 
McGowan retired in July 2011, after presenting the Overnighters program on 3AW for 21 years. His final program was broadcast on Friday, 22 July 2011. McGowan said the highlight of his career was that after 54 years of broadcasting, "I chose my own time to give it all away". 
In the 1960s McGowan hosted a show called Teen Time On Ten on regional Victorian television station GLV-10. 
He also compiled and released a nostalgia CD containing tracks by various artists, called And Then Came Rock n Roll. 
McGowan published six books, known as the Overnighters books. Titles include Thanks for the Memories, You Must Remember This, Motherhood and Apple Pie "The way we were" Good on You, Dad and "Down memory lane". 
Following his retirement he was a regular contributor on radioinfo a website for broadcast professionals. 
McGowan married his wife, Angela, in February 2006 on a paddle steamer in Echuca, Victoria. He had a son and a daughter from his first marriage, to Jill. 
McGowan bred and raced standard-bred (harness) horses and travelled extensively throughout Australia, particularly in the outback. He supported the St Kilda Football Club and Melbourne Storm.[citation needed] 
Overnight on 19 December 2013, McGowan suffered a stroke in his sleep and died at approximately 11.00pm on 22 December 2013, after his life support was switched off. 
McGowan was recognised in the 2014 Queen's Birthday Honours with an OAM for his service to broadcast media spanning 54 years. 
This article related to members of the fly subfamily Phasiinae is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Peri-implantitis is a destructive inflammatory process affecting the soft and hard tissues surrounding dental implants. The soft tissues become inflamed whereas the alveolar bone (hard tissue), which surrounds the implant for the purposes of retention, is lost over time.  
 The bone loss involved in peri-implantitis differentiates this condition from peri-mucositis, a reversible inflammatory reaction involving only the soft tissues around the implant.
Peri-implantitis does not present in the same way for all patients. Patients are recommended to regularly attend dental appointments and to seek advice from their dentist if they have any concerns for their oral health. 
Before the signs and symptoms are explained, it is worth noting that healthy peri-implant tissue should not be swollen, bleeding, producing pus, or have a reddened appearance. 
From a patient's perspective, he/she may notice loosening or wobbling of the implant. This symptom does not usually present at the early stages of peri-implantitis as the implant will still be fused to bone at its deeper aspects. It is more likely that the patient will notice bleeding whilst brushing their teeth. A patient may also notice swelling around the implant, bad breath and/or foul taste. 
Other reported features include pain and gingival hyperplasia. Pain is thought to be a rare symptom and is usually linked to an acute infection. 
In healthy situation, there should be no sign of bone loss other than potential bone remodelling at the alveolar crest following implant placement. 
The shape of the alveolar bone in regions of bone loss varies depending on the buccal-lingual length (or cheek-to-tongue length) of the bone. Where this length is greater than the extent of the peri-implantitis, the region of bone loss can take the shape of a crater, with walls of bone surrounding the pathology; this is the most common presentation of bone loss. Where the buccal-lingual length is smaller, there may be no walls of bone surrounding the pathology. 
Bleeding on probing is considered normal whilst tissues are healing shortly after implant placement, however, if bleeding is present months or years after placement, inflammation should be suspected. Other features which may be present whilst probing include pus, the presence of a pocket around the implant and/or recession of the gums. The dental professional may also notice swelling and redness of the gums, the latter of which is termed erythema. 
During probing, it is important to note that the pocket depth around an implant is typically greater than around natural teeth. Also, the value for the pocket depth around an implant is variable in health, therefore, diagnosis of a pocket is reliant on a change in pocket depth when comparing measurements from different appointments. For this reason, a Basic Periodontal Examination (BPE) is not appropriate, and a 4 or 6 point pocket chart is instead recommended. 
Studies in both human and animal specimens found that the presence of plaque and its conglomeration around tissues invariably concluded in inflammation around the peri-implant soft tissue. 
To find the pathology of peri-implantitis, experiments were compared to peri-mucositis, and found that in peri-implantitis, there were more neutrophil granulocytes and a bigger proportion of (CD19+) B-cells. Similarly in periodontitis, peri-implantitis lesions contained many plasma cells and lymphocytes, however there were a larger ratio of macrophage cells and leukocytic cells. 
Lack of regular maintenance therapy. To avoid this, regular dental visits should be arranged to enable early detection and management of peri-implantitis. 
Excess cement. The cement is used to retain the implant, although its potentially rough surface may aid with plaque retention. Therefore, any residual cement surrounding the implant abutment interface can give rise to peri-implantitis.  The alternative to cement is a screw-retained implant, although some studies have reported a higher risk of peri-implantitis with these compared to cement-retained implants. 
Further research is required to establish whether the following are indeed risk factors for peri-implantitis: 
Despite its association with a number of oral maladies, there is some debate as to whether smoking is a risk factor for peri-implantitis despite its association with periodontitis. 
Peri-implant disease is an umbrella term for inflammatory diseases of tissues including both peri-implantitis and peri-implant mucositis. Peri-implant mucositis is a disease where inflammation is limited to the surrounding mucosa of an implant whereby peri-implantitis an inflammatory disease affecting mucosa as well as bone. 
Peri-implant mucositis becomes peri-implantitis when bone resorption is identified around the implant on a radiograph as well as all the signs associated with peri-implant mucositis is seen. Often, pus may also exude from the tissues surrounding the implant. However, mobility of the implant is not a sign of peri-implantitis as this disease begins at the margins of the implant. Only in the most severe cases of peri-implantitis, implant mobility may be observed where minimal bone tissue remains. 
If peri-implant mucositis is present, it must be treated to deter it from progressing to peri-implantitis, for which currently, there are no treatments to reverse its effects. 
Dentists are responsible for ensuring that different elements of the implant should be of the correct size to avoid creating additional surfaces which bacteria can colonise. Margins of the restoration should be placed supra-gingivally in order to remove any extruded cement during placement. After implant placement, dentists must carefully and regularly monitor the health of the peri-implant mucosa at suitable intervals, e.g. every 3/6/12 months. 
Cumulative interceptive supportive therapy, a protocol of therapeutic measures, provides guidance for clinicians to decide which regime should be used to treat peri-implantitis, depending on the mucosal condition (whether there is a presence of dental plaque, bleeding on gentle probing, suppuration), peri-implant probing depth, and evidence of radiographic bone loss. 
To prevent roughening and damaging of the implant surface, ultrasonic scalers with a non-metallic tip or resin/carbon fiber curettes are used for calculus removal. Conventional steel curettes or ultrasonic instruments with metal tips should be avoided as implant surface can be damaged, and any residual marks increase implant susceptibility to plaque accumulation in the future. Polishing with rubber cups and polishing paste also aids in plaque removal. 
Aruba has competed at the World Athletics Championships on eleven occasions. It did not send a delegation for the 1983 championships or the editions from 2001 to 2009. Its competing country code is ARU. The country has not won any medals at the competition and as of 2019 no Aruban athlete has reached the top eight of an event. Its best performance is by Cornelia Melis, who placed 21st in the 1991 women's marathon. 
One athlete represented Aruba at the 1991 World Championships in Athletics: Cornelia Melis ran a time of 2:58:18 to finish 21st in the women's marathon. 
One athlete represented Aruba at the 1997 World Championships in Athletics: Miguel Janssen ran a time of 10.47 to finish 56th overall in men's 100 metres heats. 
Two athletes represented Aruba at the 2011 World Championships in Athletics. Geronimo Goeloe ran in the men's 100 metres, progressing beyond the preliminary round before being eliminated in the heats stage. Shariska Winterdal competed in the women's marathon, finishing in 46th place with a time of 3:49:48. 
One athlete represented Aruba at the 2015 World Championships in Athletics: Quincy Breell failed to record a valid jump in men's long jump qualifying. 
One athlete represented Aruba at the 2019 World Athletics Championships: in the heats of the men's 5000 metres, Jonathan Busby struggled to finish the distance on his own and fellow competitor Braima Suncar Dabo of Guinea-Bissau helped him to the finish line, which ultimately resulted in his disqualification. Dabo's act of kindness was widely reported and the pair were present for Dabo receiving the International Fair Play Award at the World Athletics Awards later that year. 
From 2010 he is assistant director of the Federation for University Sport of France (FFSU) charged with Handi-U, the Federations disability sports initiative. 
Lotte Eriksen (born 24 January 1987, in Stavanger) is a professional squash player who represents Norway. She reached a career-high world ranking of World No. 53 in December 2014. 
This biographical article relating to Norwegian sport is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Pulyaev is married and graduated from the University of the Interior Ministry branch in Ryazan. He is a member of the Ryazan police force department. 
Turitea Wind Farm is a wind farm being built by Mercury Energy which, when complete, will become the largest wind farm in New Zealand. Most of the land is located in the Turitea Reserve, near Turitea, in Palmerston North, New Zealand.  The project was initially planned for 131 wind turbines with a capacity of over 300 MW, while final approval was given for 60 turbines. 
The wind farm is proposed for both land owned by the Palmerston North District Council and surrounding private farm land.  In 2005, and following a competitive bid process, the Council selected Mercury (then called Mighty River Power) to develop the project. 
Construction of the Northern stage, consisting of 33 turbines, began in October 2019. Commissioning was initially expected in early 2021, however this was revised after challenges with the overland transport of turbine blades and commissioning is now expected in October 2021. Construction of the Southern stage of 27 turbines will follow. 
Work on the wind farm was halted when the country went into lockdown in March 2020. In December 2020, a ship fire at the Port of Napier destroyed 12 nacelles and 11 hubs destined for the Southern stage. 
The wind-farm generated its first electricity on 30 July 2021. The northern stage was completed in October 2021. 
In January 2005 after receiving multiple approaches from New Zealand electricity generators, the Palmerston North City Council sought a commercial partner for the construction of a wind farm in the Turitea Reserve. In August 2005 it signed a deal with Mighty River Power for development of the wind farm. The deal included plans for an eco-park funded by the city from wind-farm revenues, and for "milestone payments" from Mighty River to the council at various stages of the consent process. 
The council began consultation on changes to the reserve's management plan in August 2006. The proposal was opposed by Forest and Bird and the Department of Conservation as damaging the integrity of the reserve and potentially contravening the Reserves Act 1977. In October 2006 the Palmerston North City Council changed the purpose of the reserve to include renewable electricity generation. A subsequent court challenge to the decision was unsuccessful. 
Mighty River Power applied for resource consents for 131 turbines in 2008, and later applied to the Environment Minister for the project to be called in under the Resource Management Act.  The call in process can result in faster processing of major projects, but in this case it coincided with the 2008 election and change of government.  The Palmerston North City Council decided to continue with processing of the application, despite Mighty River Power's application for call-in. 
In December 2008, the Minister for the Environment, Nick Smith, directed that the project be called in and the Board of Inquiry invited submissions and commenced sitting in 2009.  The hearing adjourned for a period in 2009, to enable Mighty River Power to redesign the proposal, reducing it to 104 turbines.  In 2010, the Board resumed the hearing, with a draft decision in February 2011 permitting 61 turbines. 
In 2011, the Board issued its final decision, approving a wind farm of 60 turbines, up to 3MW each. In October 2011, Mighty River Power stated in its annual report that the Turitea Wind Farm was not likely to be economically viable before 2015. 
The black-and-white owl is mostly found in gallery forests and rainforest, but is also found in wet deciduous and mangrove forests, usually at an altitude between sea level and 2400 meters. Small ponds are also often visited by this species when hunting. It usually nests in the foliage of large, tall trees such as mahogany. This owl is not afraid of living near human habitations. 
Its range extends from central Mexico south to the northwestern section of Peru and western Colombia, a range it partially shares with another related species: the mottled owl (Strix virgata).  In total, it is found in 12 countries: Belize, Colombia, Costa Rica, Ecuador, El Salvador, Guatemala, Honduras, Mexico, Nicaragua, Panama, Peru, and Venezuela. This bird of prey also stays faithful to its range all year long as it is a non-migratory bird. 
Its call consists of a series of rapid, guttural, low calls, followed by a short pause and a low, airy call and a faint, short hoot. Occasionally, it is shortened to just the last two notes, leaving out the opening series. Moreover, the female's call usually sounds louder than the male's and individuals make fainter "hoots" near their nest. Just like their parents, younglings can produce strident cries, but also communicate by clacking their beak. 
Princess Margaret Blvd. is a Canadian drama short film, directed by Kazik Radwanski and released in 2008. Made as a class project by Radwanski and producer Daniel Montgomery for their final year of film studies at Ryerson University, the film stars Gina Sylvester as Isabelle Rodarte, a woman coming to terms with her diagnosis with Alzheimer's disease. 
The film was named to the Toronto International Film Festival's year-end Canada's Top Ten list for 2008, and received a Genie Award nomination for Best Live Action Short Drama at the 30th Genie Awards. 
This article related to a Canadian film of the 2000s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Anneke van Giersbergen & Agua de Annique was the solo project of the former The Gathering vocalist, Anneke van Giersbergen. 
The project was announced on 5 June 2007, the same day that both The Gathering and Anneke van Giersbergen issued separate announcements that van Giersbergen would leave the band in August. 
For the week ending 2 July 2009, Pure Air (a compilation of tracks from Air but also of songs featuring Anneke with other artists like Within Temptation) entered the GfK Dutch Charts at No.42 during the first week of release, her highest ever chart position. 
A second album, titled In Your Room, was released on 30 October 2009. Under the name Anneke van Giersbergen & Agua de Annique, they released the concert album Live in Europe in 2010. 
In 2011, Anneke signed to PIAS Records as a solo artist. Her debut album under her own name, Everything Is Changing, was released on 20 January 2012. 
Much of the church's expense was donated by James Bandinel in dedication to his father Dr. Bandinel, who served as vicar of Netherbury. The vicar had envisioned the construction of a church to serve Melplash since the 1790s, however he died before he could bring his plans to fruition. Bandinel also gifted the plot of land for the church and financed a permanent endowment. 
The foundation stone was laid by the Revd S. Hay on 15 May 1845 in the presence of 4,000 people and the church built by Mr. Davis of Langport to the designs of Benjamin Ferrey. Christ Church was consecrated by the Bishop of Salisbury, the Rt Revd Edward Denison, on 20 October 1846. 
To serve the educational needs of the village, Bandinel donated further land and paid for the construction of a school adjacent to the church, dated 1849 and now converted into a house. The church's original parsonage, a converted farmhouse at Camesworth also provided by Bandinel, was burnt down in 1882 and replaced with a new residence on a nearby site. A new vicarage was later built adjoining the church in 1924. 
In 1975, the church underwent internal alterations to allow the nave to be screened off for use as a hall and badminton court. 
Christ Church is built of local stone with Ham stone dressings and roofs of slate and lead, in a Neo-Norman style. It was built with a cruciform plan, containing a central tower, four-bay nave, apsidal chancel, north and south transepts, north vestry and south porch. 
NBA 2K2 is a sports video game developed by Visual Concepts and published by Sega for Dreamcast, PlayStation 2, Xbox and GameCube. NBA 2K2 featured more street courts such as Mosswood, Fonde Rec Center, Venice Beach, etc. The cover athlete is Allen Iverson of the Philadelphia 76ers. 
It is also one of the few games to cross all the 6th generation platforms, alongside Puyo Pop Fever and Capcom vs. SNK 2. 
Modes of play include Exhibition, an adjustable Season (from 14 to 82 games), Practice, Tourney, Playoffs, Fantasy, where players can create a custom tournament or league after drafting, and Franchise, which involves signing free agents, cutting players, making trades, and scouting for new talent before embarking on consecutive seasons. Players can also edit or create a team using ten custom logos as well as design their own star athlete from scratch. 
The game received "universal acclaim" on all platforms except the PlayStation 2 version, which received "generally favorable reviews", according to video game review aggregator Metacritic. GameSpot named it 2001's best traditional sports game released for game consoles. It was a runner-up for the publication's "Best Dreamcast Game" award, but lost to Phantasy Star Online. 
In 2016, it was proposed that all London rail services be transferred to Transport for London to create a London Suburban Metro, which would bring the line back under the jurisdiction of TfL. 
The GN&CR generating station closed when the MR took over, and became the studio of Gainsborough Pictures. After lying derelict for many years, it became a temporary venue for the Almeida Theatre. It has since been redeveloped as apartments. 
In 1970 the line was connected (as intended by its original promoters) to the mainline via the high level platforms at Finsbury Park as part of a wider plan to electrify ECML suburban services. The line was renamed Northern line (Highbury Branch) and the following year an agreement was made to transfer it to British Rail. Commuter trains were run to/from Moorgate instead of King's Cross, relieving congestion at King's Cross. 
From Finsbury Park to Drayton Park traction current is supplied at 25 kV AC via overhead line, controlled by York Electrical Control Room. 
From Drayton Park to Moorgate traction current is supplied at 750 V DC via third rail. There are two electrical sections, separated by a gap at Poole Street: 
Trains change from AC to DC traction supply, or vice versa, whilst standing at Drayton Park station. The platform starting signal on the Up platform at Drayton Park is held at danger (red) as the train approaches. This ensures that all trains stop to lower the pantograph before going into the tunnel. 
Signalling is controlled from Kings Cross power box. Between Drayton Park and Moorgate, there is no Automatic Warning System or Train Protection & Warning System equipment provided, due to the position of the auxiliary return rail. All signals are multiple aspect colour light signals fitted with train stop arms. 
Because mainline trains operate over the infrastructure inherited from London Underground, there are some practices on the NCL which differ from Railway Rulebook instructions, and these are contained in an additional publication. These include: 
Platform starting signals, which let the train into a tunnel, can only be passed at danger with the signaller's authority. 
On reaching the failed train, the assisting driver will stop short then clip their tunnel telephone onto the tunnel wires so that they can discuss with the driver of the failed train how to carry out the assistance in order to get the trains moving again. Then the two trains are coupled together and the drivers can talk to each other over the usual cab-to-cab handsets before proceeding. 
The original fleet of 76 carriages was withdrawn and replaced by London Underground Standard Stock on 15 May 1939. These became the last pre-1938 trains running on the Underground, being phased out during the last weeks of October 1966 through 3 November. 1938 tube stock serviced the line, in variously three-, four- and six-car formations, until its temporary closure on 4 October 1975. 
The Moorgate tube crash, the most serious accident on the London Underground, occurred at Moorgate on 28 February 1975, when a Highbury Branch train ran through the terminus at speed and crashed into the dead end of the tunnel beyond. The cause of the crash, which killed 43 people, was never determined. A report found that there was insufficient evidence to say if it was a deliberate act of the driver or due to a medical condition. 
This is the number of passengers using stations on the line from the year beginning April 2002 to the year beginning April 2019. 
This biographical article related to a Japanese association football midfielder born in the 1990s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The city got its name from Khusrau Shah, king of the Justanids during the 10th century. The words "Khosrow" and "Shah" are both Iranian words that mean "king". 
Maria's father died aged 26 in 1612 when she was only three years old, and was succeeded as Duke of Mantua by his two brothers, who had no issue. This made Maria and her husband Charles of Nevers in 1627 successors to the two Duchies. Maria was already Duchess of Montferrat since 1612. This led to the War of Mantuan Succession. 
The outcome was that, after the death of her husband Charles in 1631, his father Charles became the new Duke of Mantua until his death in 1637. 
Maria exercised the regency of Mantua on behalf of her son for ten years, until 1647. She died in 1660, aged 51. 
Syrnola adamsi is a species of sea snail, a marine gastropod mollusk in the family Pyramidellidae, the pyrams and their allies. 
Indra Gunawan (born October 12, 1982) is an Indonesian footballer who currently plays for PSAP Sigli in the Indonesia Super League. 
This biographical article related to association football in Indonesia, about a midfielder, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In theoretical computer science, Actor model theory concerns theoretical issues for the Actor model. 
Actors are the primitives that form the basis of the Actor model of concurrent digital computation.  In response to a message that it receives, an Actor can make local decisions, create more Actors, send more messages, and designate how to respond to the next message received.  Actor model theory incorporates theories of the events and structures of Actor computations, their proof theory, and denotational models. 
From the definition of an Actor, it can be seen that numerous events take place:  local decisions, creating Actors, sending messages, receiving messages, and designating how to respond to the next message received. 
However, this article focuses on just those events that are the arrival of a message sent to an Actor. 
However, [Clinger 1981] surprisingly proved that the Law of Finite Chains Between Events in the Combined Ordering is independent of the previous laws, i.e., 
Theorem.  The Law of Finite Chains Between Events in the Combined Ordering does not follow from the previously stated laws. 
Proof.  It is sufficient to show that there is an Actor computation that satisfies the previously stated laws but violates the Law of Finite Chains Between Events in the Combined Ordering. 
However, we know from physics that infinite energy cannot be expended along a finite trajectory.  Therefore, since the Actor model is based on physics, the Law of Finite Chains Between Events in the Combined Ordering was taken as an axiom of the Actor model. 
The Law of Finite Chains Between Events in the Combined Ordering is closely related to the following law: 
The law of discreteness rules out Zeno machines and is related to results on Petri nets [Best et al. 1984, 1987]. 
The Law of Discreteness implies the property of unbounded nondeterminism.  The combined ordering is used by [Clinger 1981] in the construction of a denotational model of Actors (see denotational semantics). 
Clinger  used the Actor event model described above to construct a denotational model for Actors using power domains.   Subsequently Hewitt  augmented the diagrams with arrival times to construct a technically simpler denotational model that is easier to understand. 
Capt'n Sailorbird is an American syndicated animated television series which debuted in 1959.  An anthology series of sorts, the Sailorbird character introduced (via newly animated wraparound segments) foreign language cartoons which were reedited and dubbed into English for the series by Paul Killiam. 190 five-minute episodes were produced, which were inserted into individual stations' children's shows.  Longer cartoons were serialized over the course of multiple episodes. 
In his review for AllMusic, William Ruhlmann called the album "his most polished effort yet as a performer". Ruhlmann noted the "lush tracks full of tasty playing and warm string charts", and continued: 
The gorge is known primarily for a cave that was the only inland site in Australia with evidence of continuous human occupation for over 46,000 years, including through the last Ice Age. The cave was permanently destroyed by mining company Rio Tinto in May 2020.  Ministerial consent had been given to expand Rio Tinto's mine in 2013 under WA legislation. 
Prior to its destruction, the cave in Juukan Gorge was a sacred site for the traditional owners of the land, the Puutu Kunti Kurrama and Pinikura (Binigura) peoples. 
The archaeological significance of the Juukan Gorge was known at least since 2009, when Slack et al. reported on the "two rock shelters  with Aboriginal occupation starting at least 32,000 years ago and extending throughout the Last Glacial period". 
PKKP heritage manager Heather Builth told Rio Tinto that the site was one of the "top five" most significant in the whole of the Pilbara region, and archaeologist Michael Slack had told them that one of the rock shelters, Juukan 2, was of "the highest archaeological significance in Australia", saying that its significance "could not be overstated", being "[the only] site of this age with faunal remains in unequivocal association with stone tools". 
After this aroused widespread international media coverage and public outcry, Rio Tinto apologised to the Puutu Kunti Kurrama and the Pinikura peoples for the destruction of the caves and for causing distress. The CEO of the iron ore group apologised on behalf of the company on 17 June. The National Native Title Council (NNTC) issued a request to the federal government asking for national legislation for Indigenous cultural heritage. 
Submission 152 showed that Rio Tinto had received ministerial consent to damage the site in 2013 under Section 18 in the pursuit of expanding their iron ore mining operations. The PKKP had not objected to the Section 18, despite having taken part to the excavation works in 2009 (see Slack report above). 
The report also recommends that the Western Australian Government review and reform the current state heritage laws, and that the federal government review the Aboriginal and Torres Strait Islander Heritage Protection Act 1984. It also outlines deficiencies in the WA Act. 
After the publication of the report, Senator Pat Dodson tweeted "The destruction of these ancient sites was a disaster for our nation and the world". 
The inquiry continues to investigate the failings of state and Commonwealth heritage protection laws, as Rio Tinto's action was technically legal, after they had obtained permission in 2013, under Section 18 of WA's Aboriginal Heritage Act 1972 to go ahead with their blasting operations. The full report is due to be published in 2021. 
Withdrawn from the front to Sankt Petersburg, the soldiers of the regiment rebelled, killed their officers and took part in the Bolshevik Revolution. The forces of the regiment remained in Petersburg until October, when the unit was disbanded and its forces formed the core of the local Red Army units. 
Correa is originally from Yuba City, Ca. She moved from San Diego, where she had attended college, to Los Angeles and formed the band Correatown in 2007. The name of the band was taken from a nickname a friend had given her. 
She also provided the singing voice for Darlene Madison (played onscreen by Jenna Fischer) in the movie Walk Hard: The Dewey Cox Story. 
Correa is also a member of the folk duo Les Shelleys, a project created with Tom Brosseau in 2003. Their debut record Les Shelleys was released in Fall 2010 on Brighton's FatCat Records. They toured both the US and Europe extensively in support of the album throughout 2010. 
The Saint Paul's Church (Dutch: Sint-Pauluskerk) is a Roman Catholic church building in Vaals, Netherlands. The neogothic cross shaped church was built in 1891-1893 by Johannes Kayser, replacing an earlier Saint Paul's Church nearby. The building is used as parish church for the local Saint Paul parish. Patron saint for the church is Saint Paul. It has been listed as a rijksmonument, making it a national heritage site of the Netherlands. 
Norman Leslie Smith was born 13 July 1890 in North Richmond, Sydney, Australia to Bill Smith and his spouse Cecilia, the youngest of nine children. Both his parents were farmers. Smith was a protege of motor vehicle importer Issac Phizackerley. 
In March 1930, Smith filed a request to be allowed to continue naming his race car Anzac. His request was denied on the grounds that it was a breach of the Australian law. In addition to driving, Smith also penned journal entries for newspapers like The Sun and The Sunday Times. 
He was born at Rocca Contrada (modern Arcevia, then part of the Papal States), and was a follower of the styles of Pietro Perugino and Raphael. He is asserted to have been still alive in 1588. 
This article about an Italian painter born in the 16th century is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
As a disjunct, it is the only genus of the family outside of South America, as the genus's only known species is Maschalocephalus dinklagei, native to West Africa (Guinea, Ivory Coast, Liberia, Sierra Leone). 
A trigger is a mechanism that actuates the function of a ranged weapon such as a firearm, airgun, crossbow, or speargun. The word may also be used to describe a switch that initiates the operation of other non-shooting devices such as a trap, a power tool or a quick release. A small amount of energy applied to the trigger leads to the release of much more energy. 
When considering practical accuracy of a firearm, the trigger takeup is often considered the least critical stage of the trigger pull. Often triggers are classified as either single-stage or two-stage based on the takeup. 
A single-stage trigger is often called direct trigger, and is popular on hunting rifles. A two-stage trigger is often called pressure trigger, and is popular on competition rifles. 
Some fully adjustable triggers can be adjusted to function as either a single-stage or two-stage trigger by adjusting the takeup. Setting the takeup travel (also known as the first stage) to near zero essentially makes the trigger a single-stage trigger. Some single-stage triggers (e.g. Glock trigger, Savage AccuTrigger) has an integral safety with a noticeable spring resistance that can functionally mimic a two-stage trigger. 
The trigger break is named for the sudden loss of resistance when the sear reaches the point of release, which is described as resembling the breaking of rigid materials when the strength fails under stress. The actuation force required to overcome the sear resistance during the break is known as the trigger weight, which is usually measured in pounds with a force gauge. 
When user releases the trigger and it travels to its resting position. On semiauto firearms the movement eventually passes by reset position where trigger-disconnector mechanism resets itself to its resting state, in which pulling the trigger releases the sear. The reset event does not occur in double action firearms and in full auto firearms. 
A single-action (SA) trigger is the earliest and mechanically simplest of trigger types. It is called the "single-action" because it performs the single function of releasing the hammer/striker (and nothing else), while the hammer/striker must be cocked by separate means. Almost all single-shot and repeating long arms (rifles, shotguns, submachine guns, machine guns, etc.) use this type of trigger. 
A double-action/single-action (DA/SA) trigger is a hybrid design combining the features of both single- and double-action mechanisms. It is also known as traditional double-action (TDA), as the vast majority of modern "double-action" handguns (both revolvers and semi-automatic pistols) use this type of triggers instead of "double-action only" (DAO). 
A release trigger releases the hammer or striker when the trigger is released by the shooter, rather than when it is pulled. Release triggers are largely used on shotguns intended for trap and skeet shooting.[citation needed] 
A set trigger allows a shooter to have a greatly reduced trigger pull (the resistance of the trigger) while maintaining a degree of safety in the field compared to having a conventional, very light trigger. There are two types: single set and double set. Set triggers are most likely to be seen on customized weapons and competition rifles where a light trigger pull is beneficial to accuracy. 
A double-crescent trigger provides select fire capability without the need for a fire mode selector switch. Pressing the upper segment of the trigger produced semi-automatic fire, while holding the lower segment of the trigger produced fully automatic fire. Though considered innovative at the time, the feature was eliminated on most firearms due to its complexity. Examples include MG 34, Kg m/40 light machine gun, M1946 Sieg automatic rifle, and Star Model Z-70. 
A progressive, or staged trigger allows different firing rates based on how far it is depressed. For example, when pulled lightly, the weapon will fire a single shot. When depressed further, the weapon fires at a fully automatic rate. Examples include FN P90, Jatimatic, CZ Model 25, PM-63, BXP, F1 submachine gun, Vigneron submachine gun, Wimmersperg Spz-kr, and Steyr AUG. 
Double-action triggers provide the ability to fire the gun whether the hammer is cocked or uncocked. This feature is desirable for military, police, or self-defense pistols. The primary disadvantage of any double-action trigger is the extra length the trigger must be pulled and the extra weight required to overcome the spring tension of the hammer or striker. 
This order Pleuronectiformes (flatfish) related article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Lavrentiev graduated from the Moscow Power Engineering Institute in 1931 and became a teacher at the Institute. 
From 1938 to 1939, he worked as an employee of the apparatus of the People's Commissariat of Heavy Industry of the USSR. In 1939 he was the head of the Eastern European department of the USSR People's Commissariat of Foreign Affairs. 
From 1939 to 1940 he was the ambassador of the USSR in Bulgaria. From 1940 to 1941 years he served as Plenipotentiary representative of the USSR in Romania and from 1941 he served as the Extraordinary and Plenipotentiary Envoy of the USSR in Romania. 
In 1943 he served as the Head of the European Department of the USSR People's Commissariat of Foreign Affairs. From 1943 to 1944 he served as Head of the Middle East Department of the USSR People's Commissariat of Foreign Affairs. 
From 1944 to 1946 he served as People's Commissar for Foreign Affairs of the Russian SFSR. From 1946 to 1949 he served as Extraordinary and Plenipotentiary Ambassador of the USSR in Yugoslavia. 
From 1951 to 1952 he served as Extraordinary and Plenipotentiary Ambassador of the USSR in Czechoslovakia. From 1952 to 1953 he served as Extraordinary and Plenipotentiary Ambassador of the USSR in Romania. 
Hammers Over the Anvil is a 1993 Australian biographical romantic drama film starring Russell Crowe and directed by Ann Turner, who also writer with Peter Hepworth. The film is based on the novel of the same name by Alan Marshall. The original music score is composed by Not Drowning, Waving. 
The project had been around for a number of years. The script was originally written by Peter Hepworth then rewritten by Ann Turner. 
It is set and filming in South Australia's Red Creek in seven weeks on 11 October and 29 November 1991. 
This article related to an Australian film of the 1990s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article related to a Norwegian association football midfielder is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Jordan Jeremiah Brown (born 12 November 1991) is a German footballer who plays as a midfielder for Eintracht Norderstedt. 
This biographical article related to association football in Germany, about a midfielder born in the 1990s, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Eisenberg graduated with a BA in Psychology from Stanford University in 1990 and a JD from Harvard Law School in 1993. 
Starting in 1995 Eisenberg wrote one of the earliest blogs called "Read Me." She continued until 2000, at which time she signed off, explaining she had found "a life." The term "blog" had not yet been coined. It was known at the time as an "online diary." In 1999 she was ranked as one of the 25 most important women on the web for her contributions to technology journalism. 
Northrise University is a private, Christian, university in Ndola, Zambia. It was founded in 2003 by Dr Moffat Zimba and Mrs Doreen Zimba. 
NU has local and international students who receive training in academic disciplines at undergraduate and postgraduate levels. While Northrise offers a nationally accredited  education that is founded upon Christian principles, the university accepts students of all faiths. Northrise University as at August 16, 2017 has 700 students and 77 academic faculty members. The university has produced a  total of 314 graduates working in different sectors of Zambia's economy. 
The university is in partnership with Dordt College in Sioux Center, Iowa; California Polytechnic State University, San Luis Obispo, California, United States; Shanghai Normal University, China; and Fontys University of Applied Sciences in the Netherlands and Baylor University in Waco, TX. 
Northrise University offers two-year diplomas and both bachelor's and master's degrees from the Schools of Business and Theology. 
Northrise University is in Ndola, Zambia. The campus, in the business centre of the town, is on Buteko Avenue in Caravelle House, opposite the Savoy Hotel. 
Caravelle House, wholly owned by Northrise University, is a four-storey building able to cater for 300 students. As of 2018, the building is currently not in use. 
The campus construction is taking place in phases. After completion it will be able to enroll 1000 students and a total capacity of 300 boarding places. 
Northrise University offers opportunities for donors to sponsor students, as most Zambians cannot afford full tuition on their own. Those who receive financial aid are required to contribute to their tuition, which gives students a greater sense of ownership and accomplishment.[citation needed] 
Northrise Services is a company owned by Northrise University. Because of the poor state of the economy, most Zambians cannot afford to pay tuition to attend classes. Since tuition alone cannot fund University operations, Northrise has had to find additional sources of funding other than donations. Therefore, NS was created to help ensure that the university has the financial support it needs to continue.[citation needed] 
Maron was born in Greensboro, North Carolina and grew up in central Johnston County; she had also lived in Italy. She and her husband, artist Joe Maron, lived in Brooklyn before returning to her home state in 1972. Maron died of complications from a stroke. 
Maron was the author of numerous short stories and more than 20 mystery novels to date.[as of?] One series of novels features Sigrid Harald, a loner lieutenant in the NYPD whose policeman father was killed in the line of duty when she was a toddler (The Right Jack: a Sigrid Harald Mystery). Another series follows the adventures of Judge Deborah Knott, attorney and daughter of an infamous North Carolina bootlegger. 
Her works have been translated into a dozen languages and are on the reading lists of many courses in contemporary Southern literature, as well as Crime and Mystery literature courses. 
Maron was a founding member and past president of Sisters in Crime and of the American Crime Writers' League, and a director on the national board for Mystery Writers of America. She was a keynote speaker at the Great Manhattan Mystery Conclave in 2004. 
Maron received a number of awards for her work from the various awarding bodies of the mystery fiction genre. 
Her first novel to receive recognition was Corpus Christmas, which was nominated for the 1989 Agatha Award and the 1990 Anthony Award in the "Best Novel" category. Her first short story to be met with critical acclaim was "Deborah's Judgment", which won the 1991 Agatha Award and was also nominated for the Anthony Award and the Macavity Award the following year for "Best Short-story". 
Her novel Bootlegger's Daughter was very well received, winning the 1992 Agatha and the Anthony, Edgar and Macavity awards for "Best Novel" the following year. Additionally in 1993, Marons short story "...That Married Dear Old Dad" was nominated for the "Best Short-story" Agatha and her novel Southern Discomfort was nominated for the "Best Novel" Agatha award. Southern Discomfort was again honoured the following year, picking up a nomination at the 1994 Anthony Awards, again for "Best Novel". 
Last Lessons of Summer  was nominated for an Agatha Award in 2003; High Country Fall was nominated for an Agatha Award in 2004 and also picked up a Macavity nomination the following year, the same year in which her novel Rituals of the Season picked up yet another Agatha nomination. Hard Row also received an Agatha Award nomination, this time in 2007. Three-Day Town won the 2011 Agatha Award for "Best Novel". 
Maron received an honorary doctorate from and gave the commencement address to the University of North Carolina at Greensboro in May 2010, where she was a student for two years. In 2016, she was inducted into the North Carolina Literary Hall of Fame. 
The Victoria River, a perennial river of the North-East Murray catchment of the Murray-Darling basin, is located in the East Gippsland and alpine regions of Victoria, Australia. 
The river is traversed by Great Alpine Road near Cobungra. The Victoria River Track, a walking trail, follows much of the course of the river. 
This article related to a river in Victoria (Australia) is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The transaction from Caesars Entertainment to GSR Corp involving the $151 million sale of the Reno Hilton was lengthy. The sale was announced in early May 2005 but wasn't completed until June 2006 due to finance and licensing problems. 
After all problems were addressed with all parties involved, the Reno Hilton became the Grand Sierra Resort and Casino on June 24, 2006. 
In Spring 2013, it was announced Meruelo Group had a firm deal to acquire an Atlantic City Casino and Hotel Trump Plaza for $20 million, however, in April 2013, that deal was put on hold as the parent company's mortgage holder put a stop to the deal. Meruelo was still committed to acquiring it and expanding their network of hotel/casinos. Another renovation for the meeting space occurred in the summer of 2015. 
Grand Sierra Cinema is a two auditorium theater located in the lower level mall. The theater features movies that recently left mainstream theaters but haven't yet reached DVD for just $4. Movies are played once on weeknights and twice on weekend nights. 
Fun Quest is the resort's family entertainment center. Attractions in the FEC include a Laser Tag arena. Formerly Q-Zar/Quazar, it was converted to a Lazer Runner system in January 2007. In addition, a second arena was recently added for Battlefield Live. 
A recent addition in the form of an escape room, Breakthrough Reno, now resides inside of the Grand Sierra Resort across from the Fun Quest center themed around an old hotel. 
Grand Adventure Land is located at the northwest corner of the resort's property. Essentially a miniature amusement park featuring upcharge attractions, the park contains a 180-foot Skycoaster, and three go-cart tracks. 
Grand Bay Driving Range is located at the southeast corner of the resort property along the north shore of the Grand Bay. The outdoor range features eight island greens, each varying in distance and difficulty, dotted along a large body of water. The range also features club rentals, a pro shop and snacks and beverages. 
Grand Sierra Wedding Chapel offers two venues to host weddings. One is located inside on the lower level of the hotel and the other is outside near their pool. 
A 2,995-seat concert and show venue, the beautifully renovated, yet historic Grand Theatre is home to the world's largest indoor stage with more than a full acre of usable space. The theater was constructed to host MGM's "Hello Hollywood Hello" Production from 1978 to 1987. The Meruelo Group remodeled the Grand Theatre at Grand Sierra Resort. 
The Grand Sierra is home to the local furry convention, aptly named Biggest Little Fur Con, since its inception in 2013. 
The Grand Sierra is home to the local anime convention, aptly named Sierra Nevada Anime Fans Unite, since its inception in 2010. 
Rodney Tom (born July 25, 1963) is an American businessman and politician who represented Washington's 48th Legislative District in the state Senate. 
Tom earned a Bachelor of Arts degree from the University of Washington in 1985 and went on to earn his MBA from the University of Southern California in 1988. 
In 2002, Tom was elected to the state House of Representatives as a Republican by defeating Democrat Connie Espe by a 52 to 42% margin with 5% going to a third-party candidate. 
He was reelected in 2004, edging out Democratic Party challenger Debi Golden with a 51.76% to 48.24% margin (1816 votes). 
On July 17, 2007, Tom publicly announced his campaign for the 8th District's congressional seat.  He soon ended the campaign and endorsed Darcy Burner (D), who was the challenger to Dave Reichert (R) in 2006 and had a major lead in fundraising. 
On November 2, 2010, Tom ran in the Washington State Senate in the 48th Legislative District to win against Gregg Bennett by 52.55% to 47.30%. 
In 2012, two Conservative-Democrat Senators, Tom and Tim Sheldon announced they would switch caucuses and join 23 Republicans to form the Majority Coalition Caucus, giving them a 25-24 vote majority over the Democrats. 
On April 14, 2014 Tom announced he would not seek reelection citing health concerns and the need to take care of his father. 
On March 29, 2018 Tom announced his intention to run for state senate again in 48th Legislative District, but was not elected. 
On December 10, 2012, Tom announced that he would caucus with the Republicans to form the Majority Coalition Caucus (MCC). Tom became the new senate majority leader. 
On February 4, 2013, both Tom and Tim Sheldon, another Democratic senator who joined Republicans to form the MCC, were censured by the state Democratic Party for "gross disloyalty" and "perfidious behavior," cutting off their future access to party funds and mailing lists. This followed separate votes to censure Tom by the 5th and 43rd District Democratic organizations, Democrats in Tom's own 48th District, and the Pierce County Democrats. 
A statue of Olav Tryggvason  is located in Trondheim, Norway. Sculpted by sculptor Wilhelm Rasmussen, it honors King Olav Tryggvason who was the city's founder.  
The 18-metre (58-foot) high statue is  mounted on top of an obelisk. It stands at the center of the city square (Torvet i Trondheim)  at the intersection of the two main streets, Munkegata and Kongens gate.  The statue was unveiled in 1921. Around the statue base is a cobblestone mosaic, dating from 1930, which forms a gigantic sun dial . The sun dial is calibrated to UTC+1, meaning that the reading is inaccurate by one hour in the summer. 
Brian Douglas Kinchen (born August 6, 1965) is a former professional American football tight end and long snapper. He played in the National Football League (NFL) for the Miami Dolphins, Cleveland Browns, Baltimore Ravens, Carolina Panthers and New England Patriots. As a tight end, he caught 160 passes for 1,648 yards and seven touchdowns. 
Kinchen was born in Baton Rouge to parents Gaynell "Gus" Kinchen and Tori Kinchen. He attended and played football at University High School. His father was a member of the 1958 LSU Tigers football team and one of the famed Chinese Bandits. 
At LSU, Kinchen was an All-SEC tight end. He tallied 523 yards and six touchdowns on 48 receptions over 33 career games.  
In 1988, the Miami Dolphins selected Kinchen in the 12th round of the 1988 NFL Draft with the 320th overall pick. In three seasons, he caught two passes for 15 yards over 36 games. 
Kinchen was a member of the inaugural Baltimore Ravens team in 1996 which resulted from the Cleveland Browns relocating to Baltimore. In 1996, he had his best season as a tight end with 55 receptions for 581 yards (both career highs) and one touchdown. In three years with the Ravens, Kinchen totaled 79 catches for 786 yards and two touchdowns. 
In his two seasons with the Carolina Panthers, Kinchen spent most of his time at long snapper and on special teams. As a tight end, he had six catches for 52 yards and one touchdown. After suffering an injury, he was released at the end of the 2000 season. 
In 2003, Kinchen came out of retirement to replace injured New England Patriots long snappers Lonie Paxton and Sean McDermott. He joined the team with two regular season games in the season and continued that role throughout the playoffs. With 0:09 left to play, Kinchen snapped the game-winning field goal in Super Bowl XXXVIII. 
David (Dudu) Mezach (born 1955) is an Israeli multidisciplinary artist. He was the head of the Screen-Based Arts Department at Bezalel Academy of Arts and Design until September 2017. 
In The Empire of Glass, Braxiatel became involved with galactic politics. He organised the Armageddon Convention, which he tried to get the Doctor to chair, but by mistake his agents brought a physically similar man. The Convention was not particularly successful, although we know that it did outlaw the use of cyberbombs (Revenge of the Cybermen). Braxiatel decided to go back to collecting. 
At some point, Braxiatel became the head of the Department of Theatrology at St. Oscar's University on Dellah. After Benny obtained a post at the archaeology department in 2593, the pair of them became entangled in many adventures.  After the destruction of the planet Dellah, Braxiatel invited Benny to join him at the Braxiatel Collection. 
Braxiatel also appears, as Cardinal Braxiatel, in the Doctor Who audio drama Zagreus and in the spin-off series Gallifrey. In these stories, which are set prior to the Bernice Summerfield stories in Braxiatel's timeline, he is a member of the High Council of Time Lords and a confidante of President Romana. 
In Gallifrey: The Inquiry, it was revealed that the disastrous test of a timeonic fusion device which destroyed the planet Minyos prompted Braxiatel to begin collecting and preserving historical artifacts in case such widespread destruction ever happened. He also admitted that he had transgressed the Laws of Time by being in contact with his future regenerations. 
In Gallifrey: Pandora, Braxiatel became Chancellor, but mere hours later had to use his mind to contain the past and present forms of an ancient Gallifreyan evil known as Pandora. As Pandora would be able to escape if he ever connected to the Matrix or telepathically communicated with another Time Lord mind, Braxiatel exiled himself from Gallifrey. 
In Gallifrey: Warfare Romana destroyed the future form of Pandora (as well as its intelligence), at the cost of also destroying the Matrix.  When Romana was removed from office in Gallifrey: Mindbomb, Braxiatel returned briefly to Gallifrey and assumed the post of Lord President, since there was no longer anywhere for the Pandora entity to escape to. 
However, the ambitious Inquisitor Darkel goaded Braxiatel into losing control of Pandora, believing that it would destroy itself and Braxiatel's mind in the process. Braxiatel then revealed that only a remnant of the entity had ever been in his mind; the bulk of it had sought refuge in Darkel and Braxiatel had merely been the key that kept it restrained. So freed, Pandora consumed both Darkel and itself. Braxiatel returned to his exile, retaining the last fragments of Pandora within him. 
Big Finish's series of Bernice Summerfield books and audios have brought Bernice to the Braxiatel Collection, with Braxiatel himself becoming a key part of the regular cast. He is aloof and mysterious but is still considered one of Benny's closest friends. 
Braxiatel soon reveals that Benny plays a critical role in his plans, and lures her into a trap.  She is freed from this trap in Resurrecting the Past, which directly follows the animated short Dead and Buried.  This version of Braxiatel finally meets his maker in Escaping the Future. 
From Judgement Day onwards, an alternative version of Braxiatel has appeared, claiming to be the version from the Gallifrey continuity.  The exact nature of the relationship between these and other hinted at versions of Braxiatel is currently unknown. 
Braxiatel is voiced by actor Miles Richardson, whose interpretation of the role has influenced the changing nature of the character. 
The 1995 South Australian National Football League (SANFL) Grand Final saw the Port Adelaide Magpies defeat the Central District Bulldogs by 48 points. The match was played on Sunday 1 October 1995 at Football Park in front of a crowd of 45,786. . 
This was Port Adelaide's 33rd premiership, and Central District's first grand final since their admission to the league in 1964. 
Port Adelaide was captained by Tim Ginever and coached by John Cahill.  Central District was captained by Roger Girdham and coached by Alan Stewart. 
The Jack Oatey Medal for best player in the Grand Final was awarded to Anthony Darcy of Port Adelaide. For the third year in a row, the St Kilda Football Club in the AFL drafted the Jack Oatey medallist, following on from Steven Sziller and Darryl Wakelin. 
Three players also played in at league one game in Major League Baseball during their careers. These players and their seasons with Dyersburg were: 
Simratpal "Simmer" Singh is a practicing Sikh United States Army officer and combat veteran. He won a federal lawsuit, Singh v. Carter, against the U.S. Department of Defense to be allowed to wear a religious beard and turban in uniform. 
In January 2017, the Army issued new regulations stating that all Sikh soldiers can wear their religious articles while serving. 
This biographical article related to the United States Army is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Cody later worked as a clerk. During the First World War, he enlisted in 1916 as a gunner in the Australian Imperial Force, and rose to the rank of lieutenant upon returning to Australia in 1919. 
This biographical article relating to Australian rugby union is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Oncerometopus is a genus of plant bugs in the family Miridae. There are about 12 described species in Oncerometopus. 
The season saw the first tournament with a $3,000,000 purse, the U.S. Women's Open. There were three first-time winners in 2002: Laura Diaz, Cristie Kerr, and Patricia Meunier-Lebouc. 
The following table shows all the official money events for the 2002 season. "Date" is the ending date of the tournament. The numbers in parentheses after the winners' names are the number of wins they had on the tour up to and including that event. Majors are shown in bold. 
He was the son of Thomas Wyatt the younger, who led the unsuccessful Wyatt's rebellion in 1554 and his wife Jane Haute. 
This article about an English writer, poet or playwright is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Soil formations resulting from the erosion of the high mountains in the park primarily consist of tropical ferruginous soils in catenas, hydromorphic soils and vertisols. Heavy clays are the dominant soil type in the park. 
The mammal population in the park is one of the largest in central West Africa. There are 30 species of mammals in the park. Some of the species of interest from the conservation angle are the red-fronted gazelle (Gazella rufifrons) (VU), whose population is on the rise, and the korrigum (Damaliscus lunatus korrigum) (VU), which is stable. The endangered African bush elephant, which feeds in the Vachellia seyal shrublands, creates conflicts even with farmers located far away. 
Amphibians include the eponymous frog Kassina wazae and Waza toad Bufo wazae, the latter now included in Sclerophrys xeros. 
The grassland species of birds reported are: Ortyxelos meiffrenii, Ardeotis arabs, Struthio camelus population in very large number of Dendrocygna viduata and Balearica pavonina. Water bird species seen throughout the year is reported to be more than 20,000. 
Under this project, a management plan has been evolved. A local steering committee has become functional. The project has envisaged controlled harvesting of a few natural products such as straw and gum arabic under field trials, though their extraction has continued even after the park was established. 
In 2012 Nayna filmed an abusive attack on a Melbourne bus, producing a viral video that made headlines around the world. 
In 2014, Nayna produced, directed, and edited Dayne's World for ABC TV, winning the ABC iview Award and the award for best editing at Melbourne WebFest. Later that year he produced, directed, and edited the Fancy Boy pilot for Fresh Blood Pilot Season, which went on to be picked up for a six-part series for ABC TV and Pivot 
In 2016 Nayna co-founded social media network Letter.wiki with brothers Dayne and Clyde Rathbone, which was later acquired by media platform Substack. 
In 2018, Nayna revealed his behind-the-scenes involvement in the grievance studies affair, revealing the project alongside The Wall Street Journal. 
Nayna is working on a feature film on the scandal, which will be released in 2021. Nayna has appeared on several podcasts to discuss the film, including Triggernometry, and PhilosophyInsights with Stephen Hicks. 
Aralia excelsa is a species of flowering plant in the family Araliaceae. It is native to Mexico, Central America, northern South America and parts of the Caribbean. 
Moirangthem Meghachandra is an Indian politician. He was a Member of Parliament, representing Inner Manipur in the Lok Sabha the lower house of India's Parliament. 
Live at the Tracking Room is the first live album by One Sonic Society. Essential Worship Records released the album on 17 July 2012. 
Apparition of Face and Fruit Dish on a Beach is part of the Ella Gallup Sumner and Mary Catlin Sumner Collection of the Wadsworth Atheneum Museum of Art in Hartford, Connecticut. 
Hillman's first marriage, in April 1866, was to his cousin Elizabeth Hillman (July 24, 1843 - June 1873). He had one daughter by this marriage who died as a child in 1874. His second marriage, in Orleans parish on July 25, 1875, was to Rosalie Frye (October 11, 1854 - May 4, 1928).   By his second marriage he had four recorded children of whom two - one son and one daughter - survived to adulthood. 
He was born in the manse at West Calder the son of Rev Andrew Gloag (d.1770), the parish minister, and Christian Ronald, daughter of Thomas Ronald, Provost of Linlithgow. He was educated locally then studed at Edinburgh University - training as a minister. 
He was ordained as minister of Cockpen in April 1758 and translated to Lady Yester's Kirk in Edinburgh in October 1767 in place of Rev John Drysdale. In February 1770 Edinburgh University awarded him an honorary Doctor of Divinity. In July 1772 he moved to New (West) Kirk of St Giles one of the four parishes then contained within St Giles Cathedral on the Royal Mile in Edinburgh. 
In May 1781 he was made Junior Clerk of the General Assembly. He was then living at upper Baxters Close off the Royal Mile. 
In February 1799 he was created King's Almoner in Scotland to King George III. In this role he was responsible for distributing monies (alms) in the name of the King to people or charities. 
Gloag died at 3 Park Street in Edinburgh on 27 April 1802. Sir Henry Moncrieff-Wellwood preached at Gloag's funeral service on 2 May 1802. 
In November 1773 he married Euphemia Wilson, daughter of William Wilson of Soonhope, an Edinburgh "writer" (lawyer). Their children included: 
Behind Sandown Raceway, which has most commonly hosted the Sandown 500 and Sandown Challenge, Symmons Plains has hosted the most events in championship history with 47 as of 2019. The only hiatus for the event was between 2000 and 2003 during which the circuit received a A$3 million upgrade. The event is seen as one of Tasmania's largest sporting events, providing a variety of benefits to the local economy. 
The 2020 event was postponed until November to the COVID-19 pandemic, before later being cancelled altogether. 
"Peek a Boo" is a song by American rapper Lil Yachty featuring American rap trio Migos, released as a single from Lil Yachty's album Teenage Emotions on April 14, 2017. It reached number 78 on the Billboard Hot 100 and was certified Gold by the RIAA. The music video for the song was released the same day the song was released. 
The song received particular attention for Lil Yachty's line "She blow that dick like a cello", with Lil Yachty later stating to Genius that he thought a cello was a woodwind instrument, and blaming his A&R for "listen[ing] to that song many times" and "allow[ing him] to say that". 
While the protagonist of the book is in many ways a portrait of its author, Dreiser also loosely based Eugene Witla on some of the painters, artists working in an Ashcan realist style, whom he knew in New York at the time and whose studios he visited.  The most likely candidate for a model is Everett Shinn, who painted urban scenes of the kind attributed to Witla and who was known as a promiscuous man. 
John Cowper Powys was one of the few major critics to be unqualified in his praise of the book, comparing Dreiser's fearlessness about sex and even his admittedly excessive detail to Walt Whitman's erotic openness and love of long poetic catalogs. Edgar Lee Masters, author of Spoon River Anthology, and literary radical Randolph Bourne wrote in Dreiser's defense as well, as did noted publisher and editor Marion Reedy. 
A foreword to the 1923 reissue of the novel addressed the censorship issue directly: "It has been urged that this book is detrimental to the morals of the young and might have had a bad effect upon people with weak moral sense, but are thousands of perfectly normal and responsible people to be denied this form of aesthetic stimulation simply because it is harmful to children and perverts?" 
Peter Voss, Thief of Millions (German: Peter Voss, der Millionendieb) is a 1958 West German comedy crime film directed by Wolfgang Becker and starring O. W. Fischer, Ingrid Andree and Margit Saad. It was based on the 1913 novel Peter Voss, Thief of Millions by Ewald Gerhard Seeliger, which had been previously adapted into three films. The film was a popular success, and was followed by a sequel Peter Voss, Hero of the Day with Fischer reprising his role. 
This article related to a German film of the 1950s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Virginia Smith Dam (also known as Calamus Dam; National ID # NE02287) is a dam in Garfield County, Nebraska, about five miles northwest of Burwell. 
The lake and surrounding public lands are a part of the Calamus State Recreation Area, managed by the Nebraska Game and Parks Commission. 
Hillyard is a neighborhood in Spokane, Washington which existed as a separate town between 1892 and 1924. 
The town came about due to the Great Northern Railway and was named for James J. Hill, then-head of the railroad.  Between 1904 and 1912, many of the town's houses were built, to house railroad workers working in the local yard.  Hillyard was the home of the Great Northern's famed shops where locomotives were manufactured, repaired, and refurbished.  At the time, the Hillyard shop was the largest in the nation. 
The North Spokane Corridor has forced some relocations in the south end of the neighborhood. It is hoped that the freeway's presence will help revitalize areas of the neighborhood. 
Harlow Council has produced a 'Sculpture Trail' for visitors to the town which features many of the sculptures held in the collection.  These include: 
On 26 March 2009 Harlow Council voted to approve a proposal made by Harlow Art Trust to rebrand Harlow Town as 'Harlow Sculpture Town'. This is to highlight the significant collection of public sculptures cited around the town.  
The new title will be used on council and other tourist publications from the Summer of 2009 onwards, and aims to emulate the former name of Harlow (Harlow New Town). This not only celebrates the sculptures owned by Harlow Art Trust but other sculpture collections in Harlow, including those of the Council, the Gibberd Garden and Parndon Mill. 
In rebranding the town the aim of Harlow Art Trust is to associate Harlow with the name Sculpture Town as readily as the town of Hay-on-Wye is known as Booktown. 
The Harlow Art Trust also runs The Gibberd Gallery (named in honour of Sir Frederick Gibberd). The Trust has run the Gibberd Gallery since 2011 after taking it over from Harlow Council. The gallery houses the town's sculpture and permanent watercolour collection. One of its trustees is the sculptor Angela Godfrey. 
Eudonia cyptastis is a moth in the family Crambidae. It was described by Edward Meyrick in 1909. This species is endemic to New Zealand. 
Alex Kay-Jelski is a British sports journalist, currently the editor-in-chief of The Athletic. He was previously the sports editor of The Times and the Daily Mail newspapers. 
Kay-Jelski was educated at University College School in London, and then graduated with an MA in French and Spanish at the University of Edinburgh in 2007. 
Kay-Jelski began his career as a graduate trainee and sub-editor at the Daily Mail in 2007. He was promoted to deputy sports news editor in 2009 before being named sports editor in 2015. He left the Mail less than a year later to become sports editor at The Times. 
Key-Jelski was recruited in June 2019 to join the startup US sports website The Athletic. He has also appeared on Sky Sports and TalkSport radio. 
Year 1182 (MCLXXXII) was a common year starting on Friday (link will display the full calendar) of the Julian calendar. 
Fluorine biology is also relevant to a number of cutting-edge technologies. PFCs (perfluorocarbons) are capable of holding enough oxygen to support human liquid breathing. Organofluorine in the form of its radioisotope 18F is also at the heart of a modern medical imaging technique known as positron emission tomography (PET). A PET scan produces three-dimensional colored images of parts of the body that use a lot of sugar, particularly the brain or tumors. 
Of all commercialized pharmaceutical drugs, twenty percent contain fluorine, including important drugs in many different pharmaceutical classes. Fluorine is often added to drug molecules during drug design, as even a single atom can greatly change the chemical properties of the molecule in desirable ways. 
Fluorines also find their uses in common mineralocorticoids, a class of drugs that increase the blood pressure. Adding a fluorine increases both its medical power and anti-inflammatory effects. Fluorine-containing fludrocortisone is one of the most common of these drugs. Dexamethasone and triamcinolone, which are among the most potent of the related synthetic corticosteroid class of drugs, contain fluorine as well. 
Several inhaled general anesthetic agents, including the most commonly used inhaled agents, also contain fluorine. The first fluorinated anesthetic agent, halothane, proved to be much safer (neither explosive nor flammable) and longer-lasting than those previously used. Modern fluorinated anesthetics are longer-lasting still and almost insoluble in blood, which accelerates the awakening. Examples include sevoflurane, desflurane, enflurane, and isoflurane, all hydrofluorocarbon derivatives. 
Liquid fluorocarbons have a very high capacity for holding gas in solution. They can hold more oxygen or carbon dioxide than blood does. For that reason, they have attracted ongoing interest related to the possibility of artificial blood or of liquid breathing. 
Blood substitutes are the subject of research because the demand for blood transfusions grows faster than donations. In some scenarios, artificial blood may be more convenient or safe. Because fluorocarbons do not normally mix with water, they must be mixed into emulsions (small droplets of perfluorocarbon suspended in water) in order to be used as blood. One such product, Oxycyte, has been through initial clinical trials. 
Nanocrystals represent a possible method of delivering water- or fat-soluble drugs within a perfluorochemical fluid. The use of these particles is being developed to help treat babies with damaged lungs. 
An estimated 30% of agrichemical compounds contain fluorine. Most of them are used as poisons, but a few stimulate growth instead.  
Trifluralin was widely used in the 20th century, for example, in over half of U.S. cotton field acreage in 1998.) Because of its suspected carcinogenic properties some Northern European countries banned it in 1993. As of 2015, the European Union has banned it, although Dow made a case to cancel the decision in 2011. 
The fluoride ion is readily absorbed by the stomach and intestines. Ingested fluoride forms hydrofluoric acid in the stomach. In this form, fluoride crosses cell membranes and then binds with calcium and interferes with various enzymes. Fluoride is excreted through urine. Fluoride exposure limits are based on urine testing, which is used to determine the human body's capacity for ridding itself of fluoride. 
Historically, most cases of fluoride poisoning have been caused by accidental ingestion of insecticides containing inorganic fluoride. Most calls to poison control centers for possible fluoride poisoning come from the ingestion of fluoride-containing toothpaste. Malfunction of water fluoridation equipment has occurred several times, including an Alaskan incident that sickened nearly 300 people and killed one. 
The potential health impact of PFCs is unclear. Unlike chlorinated hydrocarbons, PFCs are not lipophilic (stored in fat), nor genotoxic (damaging genes). Both PFOA and PFOS in high doses cause cancer and the death of newborns in rodents. Studies on humans have not been able to prove an impact at current exposures. Bottlenose dolphins have some of the highest PFOS concentrations of any wildlife studied; one study suggests an impact on their immune systems. 
The biochemical causes of toxicity are also unclear and may differ by molecule, health effect, and even animal. PPAR-alpha is a protein that interacts with PFAAs and is commonly implicated in contaminant-caused rodent cancers. 
Less fluorinated chemicals (i.e. not perfluorinated compounds) can also be detected in the environment. Because biological systems do not metabolize fluorinated molecules easily, fluorinated pharmaceuticals like antibiotics and antidepressants can be found in treated city sewage and wastewater. Fluorine-containing agrichemicals are measurable in farmland runoff and nearby rivers.[full citation needed] 
With the sudden death of John Ballance on 27 April the 13 years of Richard Seddon as Prime Minister begins. On 28 November New Zealand women become the first in the world to vote in a national election. 
The Electoral Bill granting women the franchise is given Royal Assent by Governor Lord Glasgow on 19 September, and women voted for the first time on 28 November (see Women's suffrage in New Zealand).  
The first Australia and New Zealand Championships are held. Tim O'Connor (in the Shot Put) is the first New Zealander to win an event. These combined Championships are held biennially until 1927 except during World War I. 
The New Zealand Amateur Championships are held for the first time. They are hosted by the Otago Golf Club and staged at the Balmacewan course. 
He was son of Henry Shepherd (d. 1764), vicar of Mareham-le-Fen, Lincolnshire, and matriculated from Corpus Christi College, Oxford, on 1 December 1749, at the age of seventeen. He graduated B.A. 1753, M.A. 1757, B.D. 1765, and D.D. 1788, and was elected probationary fellow of his college in 1760. 
By the gift of Lord-chancellor Edward Thurlow, 1st Baron Thurlow he was instituted in 1792 to the rectory of Wetherden and Helmingham in Suffolk, and held these preferments until his death at Wetherden, on 3 January 1809, in his seventy-eighth year. 
George Selwyn, the first Bishop of New Zealand, purchased part of the site of the church in 1845 and Governor George Grey added to it in 1853, at which time the land stood on a prominent cliff-top overlooking Wellington harbour.  Agreement to build the church was reached by 1861 and the Reverend Frederick Thatcher, then vicar of St Paul's, Thorndon, was engaged as the architect. 
The foundation stone was laid by Governor Grey on 21 August 1865. The building work was executed by John McLaggan and a team of eight carpenters, and the church was consecrated by Bishop Abraham on 6 June 1866. 
In 1964 the Diocese of Wellington moved to the new St Paul's Cathedral nearby.  After a significant battle to prevent its demolition, Old St Paul's was purchased by the New Zealand Government in 1967, and subsequently restored by the Ministry of Works under the guidance of Peter Sheppard. 
Old St Paul's is built in a Gothic style, albeit with a subdued effect due to the limited resources available. It is constructed from New Zealand native timbers, with stunning stained-glass windows. The interior has been likened to the upturned hull of an Elizabethan galleon, with exposed curving rimu trusses and kauri roof sarking. 
Old St Paul's is now managed by Heritage New Zealand Pouhere Taonga. While no longer used as a parish church, it remains consecrated, and is a popular venue for weddings, funerals and other services. In 2016 a celebration service of evensong was held in the cathedral to commemorate 150 years since it was consecrated. 
The flags displayed in the nave include the ensigns of the Royal Navy, the  New Zealand Merchant Navy and the United States Marine Corps (second division), which was stationed in Wellington during World War II. The church retains close links with the New Zealand Defence Force. 
Some of the walls and columns of Old St Paul's are decorated with memorial plaques, including many dedicated to those who fought and died in World War I.  There is a plaque in memory of Wellington historian John Beaglehole, most famous for his biography of explorer James Cook, but who also played a significant role in the fight to save Old St Paul's from demolition. 
Interrogation Room 109 is a 2015 American independent urban drama written and directed by Anthony Malachi and produced by O-Park Productionz, in association with Joey Grant Entertainment. 
The movie premiered on March 1, 2015 at Saint Peter's University in Jersey City, New Jersey, United States. 
With a car full of illegal drugs, Slice intentionally runs a red light and they are picked up by the police. During his interrogations, G-low begins to second guess himself and the interrogation tests his mettle and takes a toll on him. Meanwhile, during his detainment, Slice conspires with cop Detective. Monroe to ensure his own preservation, and to further set G-low up. Slice has Detective Jones mark two kilos in evidence, when there were really three in their possession. 
Feeling the pressure of being incarcerated and interrogated, G-low allows himself to be blackmailed by Det. Jones and agrees to pay him $5,000, and then plans to run. Slice figures that G-low will run, leave Sharon behind, and then he can blame G-low for the missing drugs when it comes time to answer to their supplier's inevitable inquiries about his missing drugs and money. And, of course- Slice figures he could win back Sharon, even though he has a very jealous live-in girlfriend, Lisa. 
G-low unknowingly throws a wrench in Slice's plan and pays their supplier, Rico, a visit to update him and smooth things over. This is when G-low learns that there were three kilos in the car- not two like he originally thought. It dawns on G-low that Slice has set him up. As he's coming out of Rico's apartment, he runs into Slice who realizes the cat is out of the bag. 
Up until now, neither detective was aware that his partner has a non-kosher relationship with their respective detainees, which feeds into the distrust between Slice and G-low. Slice figures out that there's something fishy and pays Detective Monroe a visit to get the rest of the drugs Monroe was holding, and to kill him. His next target is G-low. 
G-low now has more problems than he ever expected. Sharon leaves him in the midst of the chaos and he is still left to deal with a crooked cop, who upped the ante on him, and a former business partner with a major personal vendetta against him. Detective Jones drags G-low to Slice's apartment to get in on the deal with the extra kilo that Slice took from Detective Monroe. 
In the meantime, a young kid who is trying to make a name for himself in the streets learned that Slice killed his homey. He seeks the help of an Wildpit, an OG, and Banks, a wanna-be gangsta to seek revenge on Slice. When Wildpit and C-note make their move, they find Slice with G-low and Detective Jones and open fire. 
The budget for the indie film was approximately $6,000. The movie was shot and edited by Safiyah Chiniere, a self-taught videographer using a single camera. The movie was filmed throughout Jersey, though it was mostly shot in Jersey City. Hudson Pride Connections Center, a Jersey City community center located near Journal Square was used for various scenes throughout the movie serving as Officer Monroe's apartment, the police office, and Rico's home. 
The director raised close to $3000 with a Kickstarter Campaign to help offset post-production costs, related events, promotions and marketing. 
The film received some favorable press including write ups for NJ.com, The Jersey Journal, Broadway World, and others. Anthony Malachi was also interviewed by Larry Mendte on WJLP 3. 
The movie premiered on March 1, 2015 at Saint Peter's University in Jersey City, New Jersey, United States. 
Vivek Vedagiri (born 9 September 1981) is a Singaporean cricketer. He made his List A debut in the 2006 ACC Trophy and was a member of the Singaporean cricket team at the 2009 ICC World Cricket League Division Six tournament. 
Vedagiri was a member of the national team which won gold medal in the men's T20 cricket tournament and was also part of the national side which won the silver medal in the men's 50 over tournament after an embarrassing defeat with a margin of 251 runs in the finals against Malaysia. 
This biographical article related to Singaporean cricket is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Piacenza Calcio crashed out of Serie A, following a dismal season. With ex-Inter coach Luigi Simoni at the helm, the club was looking to climb into midtable in Serie A, but the absence of Simone Inzaghi and the ageing of several key players rendered disastrous form, and Simoni was soon sacked. In the end, Piacenza finished rock bottom of the table and their five-year stint in the top flight was ended. 
He served as a Senator of the Philippines and was elected as a delegate in the 1971 Constitutional Convention and 1986 Philippine Constitutional Commission. 
Dr. Domocao Alonto was born on August 1, 1914, in Ditsaan-Ramain, Lanao del Sur. He was the eldest son of the six children of Senator Sultan Alauya Alonto of Ramain and Bai Hajja Amina Bariga Alangadi, a sixth-generation descendant of Sultan Muhammad Dipatuan Kudarat of Maguindanao. 
At an early age, he was 